 National Semiconductor Corp. of Santa Clara, Calif., plans to relocate some semiconductor manufacturing from Singapore to Malaysia, making its Penang factory its largest semiconductor factory in the world, according to a news report.  Ian Burgess, general manager of National Semiconductor Penang, a subsidiary of National Semiconductor, said in an interview published in the Business Times daily that with a production expansion of 50%, turnover for the 1990 financial year is expected to top the 1.2 billion-ringgit ($445 million) mark, up 1.5 times from this year.  The bulk of National Semiconductor Penang's additional output will be accounted for by logic chips of higher performance and speed.  The production of the chips will be relocated to the Penang plant, northwest of Kuala Lumpur, from its present Singapore operations, Mr. Burgess said.  If you like to show affection for your fellow workers, better think twice about how you do it.  Henry Schall will.  He might even make use of the Fort Wayne, Ind., post office where he works as a maintenance man to send a thank-you note the next time a colleague does him a favor.  Last December, Mr. Schall, a retired Fort Wayne policeman, was arrested for what he says was intended as a simple gesture of appreciation.  He kissed the hand of a female co-worker who he says moved a coffee urn to help him clean an office.  "I told her, 'You don't have to do that, I'll do it.' But she said she would.  Just to show my appreciation I told her, 'I'll give you a kiss on the cheek,' and she held out her hand."  Mr. Schall, who says he assumed she was offering her hand instead, said to her, "Well then, I'll kiss your hand."  Within an hour, Mr. Schall had been handcuffed and escorted from the building by five police officers.  The charge: sexual battery.  Before the police arrived, Mr. Schall had met the woman in the hall and said he was sorry she had been offended by his action.  He explained that because his family is quite affectionate, kissing comes naturally to him.  "In our family, a kiss is nothing more than a friendly gesture."  Mr. Schall's attorney, William F. McNagny, says the arrest wasn't only humiliating, but "caught him {Mr.  Schall} completely by surprise."  The attorney claims that the repercussions have caused his client such severe emotional distress that Mr. Schall is now under the care of a psychologist.  Even though the charge was dismissed the next day by the Allen County prosecutor's office, Mr. Schall filed a federal civil-rights lawsuit against the city of Fort Wayne seeking an unspecified amount of damages.  Mr. Schall claims the arrest and the way it was done was an abuse of power to deliberately harass and humiliate him.  The suit alleges that the police lieutenant who ordered the arrest may have had a personal grudge against Mr. Schall.  It also claims the lieutenant ordered the arrest despite the protests of fellow officers and the woman's insistence that she didn't want to press charges.  An attorney for the city declines to comment on the suit.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  American General Corp., offering of up to $300 million of debt securities, on terms to be determined at the time of sale.  First Interstate Bancorp., offering of up to $1 billion of debt securities.  Hotelecopy Inc., initial offering of 860,000 common shares, via Josephthal & Co. and Emmett A. Larkin Co.  Joy Technologies Inc., proposed offering of $120 million of resettable senior secured notes, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Conquest Exploration Co., offering of $50 million of convertible debentures, via PaineWebber Inc.  Westvaco Corp., offering of up to $200 million of debt securities, on terms to be determined at the time of sale, via Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Westinghouse Electric Corp., offering covering $600 million of senior and non-convertible debt securities, on terms to be determined at the time of sale.  LABOR'S FUTURE remains rocky, many unions and employers agree.  As Labor Day nears, problems beset organized labor: reduced membership, the long Eastern Airlines and Pittston strikes, and anti-union bosses like those at Nissan's Smyrna, Tenn., plant.  For 10 years more, "it's going to be tough," says Aubrey McKneely, president of Graphics Communications union Local 96B in Atlanta.  Auto Workers locals in Lansing, Mich., and Oklahoma City say an unfriendly Supreme Court and internal squabbles are special woes.  "We have the upper hand.  I don't see that changing," says Hecla Mining Co. personnel manager Jon Langstaff.  Workers want to talk directly to employers, so unions will "deteriorate" more, says an official of Teco Energy Inc., in Tampa, Fla.  But Greg Yuckert, a Weyerhaeuser labor-relations man, sees a stable union membership.  Sherri Chiesa, president of Hotel and Restaurant Local 2 in San Francisco, senses a labor rebound in her area.  PLATEAUED PERSONNEL probably provide productive performance.  Plodders?  Perhaps, says Beverly Kaye, a career consultant, in Personnel Journal.  Though promotions aren't in store for many employees, a "burned-out" label need not apply: Early retirement or placement help may not make sense.  "Productively plateaued" workers get ample excitement from their work, while "partially plateaued" workers enjoy one aspect of a job.  A third group, the "pleasantly plateaued," drift along, Ms. Kaye says.  The more one's job is valued by peers and the more he or she is a team player, the higher the plateau.  A fourth group, the "passively plateaued," trapped in personal inaction, is a special problem for employers, she says.  REDUCED WORK FORCES put companies in trim for any recession.  Many firms say past layoffs, including recent ones announced by Unisys and Eastman Kodak, will make it easier to withstand a downturn, compared with the 1981-1982 slump.  Warner-Lambert says it "bit the bullet" with a recent major restructuring, so it's "pretty lean."  Campeau Corp., which cut 8,000 employees in the past 18 months due to acquisitions, says it's in "a good position."  SmartCard International, maker of bank and computer access cards, has halved its staff, increases use of consultants as needed, and has slotted itself in robust markets.  Leaseway Transportation tightened labor-cost controls after a leveraged buy-out.  Auto-parts maker ABS Industries and retailer Ann Taylor say they're in top-notch market shape for any recession.  Dukane Corp., St. Charles, Ill., would pare its 700 employees by 20%, mostly middle managers, if sales fell 20%.  GREENER PASTURES: In a survey of 190 personnel officers and plant managers in labor-tight Northeast and West Coast areas, consultant PHH Fantus said 25% either have relocated or consider relocating to find help.  But 65% instead plan to lower hiring standards, 64% will spend more on recruiting, and 64% will boost compensation.  FAMILY CARE, wide-scale, is offered by Travelers Corp. in a new package to help it recruit and keep employees.  Features include paying as much as 30% of child- and elder-care costs; a separate $5,000 tax-free spending account for dependent care; one-year leaves to care for a family member; and more insurance choices.  TROUBLE ABROAD: Fully 57% of 331 Japanese companies operating in the U.S. face possible worker lawsuits on race, color, religion, age, sex and other equal-employment issues, a survey for the Japanese Labor Ministry showed.  Over 70% urged the ministry to tell them how to avoid "unnecessary trouble."  SUMMER YOUTH EMPLOYMENT reached 69.2% in July, a summer record for the second straight year.  The number of working 16-to-24-year-olds fell by 313,000, but as the population in the group declined, its unemployment rate hit 10.7%, the lowest in 20 years.  The jobless rate for black youths declined to 22.8%.  FUND OR PERISH: A message for law-firm retirement plans.  Half of 95 large firms canvassed by Hildebrandt Inc., Somerville, N.J., legal consultant, have unfunded pension plans.  Law firms long enjoyed predictable income flows and few partner defections, so they didn't fund retirement plans.  But major changes in the field have caused uneven cash flows, and partners have begun switching firms rapidly, the consultant says.  It says firms with liberal policies may pay pensions for departing partners; when they bring in experienced hires, they may also take on new, heavy retirement loads.  Pension burdens are being dumped on young partners, who some day will retire in droves and try to draw from an already depleted -- or empty -- fund.  Unfunded plans are "time bombs waiting to go off," says Lawrence Bright, Hildebrandt vice president.  About 75% of surveyed firms try to control retirement costs by limiting yearly payments.  THE CHECKOFF: The Labor Department on Thursday will pay the final $1.93 billion its unemployment-benefit account owes the Treasury; the debt has lingered since 1975. . . .  Belgian food workers stage strikes backing U.S. Food Workers union charges of low-wage policies against Food Lion, a unit of Belgium's Delhaize. . . .  A new law allows federal and military retirees to take temporary jobs with the Census Bureau in 1990 without endangering pensions or benefits.  Moulinex S.A., a French household electrical appliances company, said it acquired the Swan Housewares Ltd. division of Astec/BSR International PLC of Britain.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Swan makes small electrical kitchen appliances under the Swan and Girmi trade names in Britain and Italy.  The acquisition gives Moulinex a manufacturing presence in Britain, as its activity thus far has been limited to marketing and distributing products made in France.  Moulinex said the move is part of its broader strategy of developing its European activities prior to the creation of a single European market at the end of 1992.  The Swan acquisition gives Moulinex two factories near Birmingham, England, as well as a production unit in Omegna, in northern Italy.  In addition to its 13 French facilities, Moulinex has two factories in Spain and one in Ireland.  Moulinex has said it anticipates continued strong growth this year, with revenue increasing at least 20% to more than five billion French francs ($757 million).  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills last week fell 4.7% to 1,689,000 tons from 1,773,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's production was down 8.7% from the 1,849,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 76% of its capability last week, compared with 79.8% the previous week and 86.7% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Aug. 26 ............ 1,689,000 76.0%  @ Week to Aug. 19 ............ 1,773,000 79.8%  @ Year to date ............... 65,839,000 87.1%  @ Year earlier to date ....... 65,453,000 89.5%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  Market authorities in Britain are conducting a review of unusual trading activity in shares of Honda Motor Co. last week, but regulatory officials in the U.S. declined to comment.  Honda Motor Co. said last Thursday its consolidated pretax profit in the fiscal first quarter ended June 30 fell 40% to 28.390 billion yen ($197.22 million) from 47.329 billion yen a year earlier, despite record revenue.  Net income fell 42%.  A British financial official said U.K. market authorities are looking into unusual trading activity in Honda shares prior to the earnings announcement.  The review is to examine whether there is sufficient grounds for any further insider-trading inquiry.  The official added that the review was preliminary and didn't follow from any specific pressure from the Japanese.  A London Stock Exchange spokesman declined to confirm or deny any inquiry into the Honda trading.  In Tokyo last week, Honda closed at 2,150 yen Tuesday, but slipped 30 to 2,120 yen Wednesday.  The stock fell 80 yen Thursday to 2,040 yen, and then fell 100 yen to close at 1,940 Friday.  Honda fell 10 yen yesterday to close at 1,930 yen.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, the stock closed at $27.125, down 12.5 cents.  This is equivalent to 1,960 yen, 30 yen more than Tokyo's closing price.  "There was definitely unusual activity in the stock," said one dealer who trades Honda shares in New York in the form of American depositary receipts.  "There does seem to be some dishonest play."  The ADRs traded at nearly three times their average daily volume in New York last Friday.  The New York Stock Exchange -- which routinely investigates trading in stocks that exceed their normal parameters -- would neither confirm nor deny an exchange inquiry into the abnormal volume.  An investor relations official for Honda in New York said he is unaware of any probe into trading activity in Honda stock by the New York Stock Exchange.  Honda shares aren't officially listed in London, but are traded on the exchange's SEAQ system, a London-based automated quotation network.  Brokers said that it would have been easier for individuals with inside information to sell the stock short in London because there isn't any rule requiring short sales be done at a price higher than the immediately preceding transaction.  Short sellers sell borrowed stock in anticipation of a price decline, hoping to replace them later more cheaply.  Shigeaki Kato, spokesman for Honda Motor Co. in Tokyo, said that after an internal investigation, Honda determined that any information about its first-quarter results prior to Thursday's announcement did not come from inside the company.  A spokesman for the Tokyo Stock Exchange said there is currently no probe into trading in Honda shares.  He said the information on which investors may have traded did not constitute "inside information" under new definitions implemented in April.  Mitsui Bank and Taiyo Kobe Bank said they plan to merge into what would be the world's second-largest bank.  Under an agreement announced today in Tokyo, the two second-tier Japanese banks will combine April 1 into a banking giant with assets of 53.17 trillion yen ($369.7 billion).  At least temporarily, the new bank will retain Mitsui's name.  But within three years, the new bank will be renamed Taiyo Kobe Mitsui Bank.  Shareholders in Taiyo Kobe initially will receive eight Mitsui shares for every 10 Taiyo Kobe shares they own.  There is no cash pay-out and there will be no change in holdings for Mitsui shareholders.  The new bank, to be called Taiyo Kobe Mitsui Bank, also will have the biggest domestic branch network of any Japanese branch -- a major reason for the merger, analysts said.  Faced with profit-squeezing regulatory changes, many Japanese banks recently have been trying to shift from corporate to individual lending, where profit margins are higher.  But getting to individuals takes a large retail network.  "It's strictly for size," said Stuart Matthews, an analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd., a securities house owned by Britain's Barclays Bank.  "Banks are hell-for-leather to put more and more branches in Tokyo."  With 588 branches, 348 of them in Tokyo, Taiyo Kobe Mitsui Bank will have the most extensive network of retail offices in Japan -- 221 branches more than its closest rival, Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank.  Financially, Mitsui is the larger of the two banks in the proposed merger.  With assets of 29.04 trillion yen and net income of 79.42 billion yen in the year ended March 31, Mitsui is moderately larger and slightly more profitable than Taiyo Kobe, which had assets of 24.13 trillion yen and profit of 53.53 billion yen in the same period.  That would make the bank the second-largest in Japan and in the world to Dai-Ichi Kangyo, which had assets of 54.8 trillion yen at the end of March.  In terms of deposits, the new bank will have 39.6 trillion yen -- making it No. 2 behind Dai-Ichi Kangyo, with 41.2 trillion yen.  Dai-Ichi Kangyo itself is the product of a merger in October 1971.  In a statement, the two banks said they believe the merger will enable them to make "a quick response to the needs of a society, which is diversifying."  The banks said they hope to offer better services to customers and believe management will benefit from the merger.  The chairman of the new bank will be Yasuo Matsushita, Taiyo Kobe's president.  Its president will be Kenichi Suematsu, who is now president of Mitsui.  When the new bank is formed, it will be the first major merger of two Japanese city banks -- the 13 big commercial banks here -- since 1973, when Taiyo Bank and Kobe Bank merged to form Taiyo Kobe.  Analysts said Taiyo Kobe's experience may smooth its merger with Mitsui.  Still, analysts aren't predicting a wave of financial-industry mergers.  Indeed, they noted that the absence of a cash pay-out in the merger between Mitsui and Taiyo Kobe probably would keep a lid on stock-market speculation in other bank stocks.  "If it's a merger where there's no special dividend, there's no point in bidding up other bank stocks," one Japanese financial analyst said.  Trading in the shares of Mitsui and Taiyo Kobe was suspended Tuesday morning.  Mitsui's share price closed Monday at 2,350 yen, down 20 yen, while Taiyo Kobe's stock finished at 1,630 yen, up 10.  Analysts said the merger demonstrates a major shift in the way Japanese banks do business.  Until recently, Japan's banks had been aggressive lenders, rich with the cash generated by years of overflowing current-account surpluses.  Many financial institutions, like Mitsui, form the heart of industrial empires, pumping life-blood money throughout expansive groups of related companies.  Margins have been razor-thin; increased lending has always been the key to increased profits.  Today, though, goaded by a March 1993 deadline to meet strict new capital-adequacy ratios laid down by the Bank for International Settlements, Japanese banks are changing their business practices.  With modest fanfare, they have surfaced in capital markets around the globe, squirreling away billions of dollars in fresh capital in order to meet the BIS standards, which will require banks to have capital roughly equal to 8% of their total assets.  As a result, they are revamping lending practices.  Institutions that once would lend any amount to an industrial cousin have looked for ways to cut back corporate exposure, in some cases renegotiating interest rates.  At the same time, banks that once relied comfortably on income from the narrow but fixed spread of government-set interest rates are confronting deregulation that exposes them to riskier ebb and flow of floating, market-determined rates.  To maintain high profits, the banks have started focusing on consumers and small businesses, who are willing to pay more for credit and who don't have access to the international capital markets that Japanese companies can use to raise money.  Susil Trikha, president and chief operating officer of the developer of factory management and control systems, was named to the additional post of chief executive officer.  Centel Corp. said in Chicago that its Centel Cable unit completed the sale of its cable television operations in central Florida to Time-Warner Inc.'s American Television & Communications Corp. subsidiary for $251 million.  The telecommunications concern said the cable systems serve nearly 100,000 customers.  Centel announced last March that it planned to sell its cable TV operations in six groups for more than $1.4 billion.  In addition to the central Florida operations, the company has definitive agreements to sell its operations in southeastern Florida, Illinois, Kentucky, Michigan and Ohio.  All of the sales are expected to be completed by the fourth quarter, Centel said.  James P. Alexis, 45 years old, was named president and chief executive officer of this closely held financial printer.  Boris Berkovitch, a director, was elected chairman.  They succeed Anthony K. Moulton, 45, who is "having some discussions with the board" about his future with the company, according to Mr. Alexis.  Mr. Alexis most recently was a consultant at Saugatuck Capital Co., Stamford, Conn.  Previously, he held senior posts at printers R.R. Donnelley & Sons Co. and Charles P. Young Co.  He unsuccessfully tried to take Young private in a leveraged buy-out.  Mr. Berkovitch is a former vice chairman of J.P. Morgan & Co.  Tele-Communications Inc. said it called for early redemption $150 million of 12.375% senior subordinated debentures due in 2003.  Tele-Communications, which owns and operates cable television systems, said it will pay the redemption price of 107.071% of par value plus accrued interest on Sept. 25.  The company said it called for early redemption of the debt because it has significantly lower interest rates available from other sources.  Tele-Communications said the early redemption and the company's recent tender offer for its 11.125% subordinated debt will allow the company to refinance a total of $600 million debt at interest rates about two percentage points lower than rates on either of the issues.  That will yield savings in excess of $12 million a year over the next 10 years, the company said.  Whittaker Corp. said fiscal third-quarter net income fell 28%, to $5 million, or 62 cents a share, reflecting costs from its recent recapitalization.  A year ago, the defense-electronics and chemicals concern reported profit of $7 million, or $1 a share.  Revenue in the latest quarter, ended July 31, rose 2% to $50.8 million from $49.9 million.  The latest quarter's net included a loss from continuing operations of $2.6 million, compared with profit of $2.2 million from continuing operations in the year-earlier quarter.  Whittaker borrowed $360 million for the recapitalization in June under a credit facility provided by a syndicate of banks led by Security Pacific National Bank, Citibank and First National Bank of Chicago.  At the time, Whittaker warned that the recapitalization would significantly increase its long-term debt and create a negative balance in stockholders' equity and could result in losses from continuing operations and negative cash flow for a period of time.  For the nine months, Whittaker posted a 48% increase in net income, to $22.4 million, or $3.03 a share, from $15.2 million, or $2.18 a share.  Revenue rose 2%, to $150.3 million from $147.3 million.  Separately, Whittaker said it agreed in principle to sell its metals unit for an undisclosed price to RTZ Corp., a London-based metals and mining holding company.  The sale, part of Whittaker's divestiture program, is subject to several conditions, including a definitive agreement.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Whittaker closed at $11.875, up 12.5 cents.  The Canadian pig herd totaled 10,634,500 at July 1, down 2% from a year earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  Sows for breeding and bred gilts totaled 1,040,200.  Farrowing intentions were projected to be down 5% in the third and fourth quarters.  Cattle and calves in Canada totaled 12,195,100, up 1% from a year earlier.  Beef cows totaled 3,473,500, up 4%.  Beef heifers for breeding totaled 734,000, up 6%.  Sheep and lambs totaled 728,200 at July 1, up 5%.  The banking industry is in a snit about a possible loophole in federal law allowing savings and loan associations to advertise that they are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  The thrift-reform bill that Congress recently passed set up two insurance funds to be administered by the FDIC: the Bank Insurance Fund for the banks and the Savings Association Insurance Fund for the thrifts.  The bill bars thrifts from using the FDIC logo or decal, but the thrift industry claims that it doesn't expressly bar the phrasing in ads.  A spokesman for the FDIC said earlier this month that the agency has reviewed the law "and we find no bar" to thrifts' use of the phrasing.  Some S&L's around the country already have begun running ads asserting their deposits are insured by the FDIC.  As a result, banking groups have protested to federal regulators.  Mary-Liz Meany, spokeswoman for the American Bankers Association, says "both {funds} are separate.  There's no commingling of funds."  But "the thrifts have said we now have this loophole because we're both under the same administrative boss."  Ms. Meany says the thrift industry's interpretation of the law "goes against congressional intent."  Congress barred the use of the decal, she said, and "it appears schizophrenic that they would allow the use of the phrasing in ads."  She says that such use "might mislead consumers because they might think that there's just one fund insuring these deposits."  But Barney R. Beeksma, chairman of the U.S. League of Savings Institutions, said in a letter to FDIC Chairman L. William Seidman that the law "states clearly and without equivocation that the FDIC is the insurer of savings associations formerly covered" by the defunct Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. Ms. Meany says that "banks have long felt that they should have exclusive use of the FDIC logo and reputation.  They look at it as the industry's Good Housekeeping Seal of Approval."  Robert Anrig was named president and chief executive officer of the Riverhead Savings Bank unit.  He succeeds John T. Morgan, who becomes chairman of Riverhead and remains chairman and chief executive of American Savings.  Peter Costigan, an attorney, had been chairman of Riverhead and remains a director.  Mr. Anrig had been senior vice president and head of the real estate division of North Fork Bank & Trust Co., a unit of North Fork Bancorp.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. is planning to plunge into certain forms of program trading, just as controversy about such computer-assisted stock strategies is flaring again.  Drexel stresses that it's avoiding the "knee-jerk" kinds of futures-related program trading that small investors fear.  But its move is sure to add to the debate over program trading, an activity involving the rapid trading of huge blocks of stock that critics say has contributed to market volatility -- including the October 1987 stock market crash.  Just like the junk bond market that Drexel dominates, program trading has its fervent advocates as well as detractors.  But in any case, it makes money.  "What we're basically trying to do is identify, research and develop new proprietary ways of trading," said a Drexel spokesman.  He disputed a report in Wall Street Letter, an industry newsletter, that Drexel will form a new "program-trading unit."  However, Drexel does plan a new group that will take advantage of the work of George Douglas, Drexel's head of quantitative research, by offering clients various computer-assisted ways to rapidly reconfigure their portfolios.  "I think of it personally along the lines of 'package trading'" rather than program trading, Mr. Douglas said.  Drexel to this point has been only a minor player in the program game.  For July, the latest data available, it was the 14th-biggest program-trading firm on the New York Stock Exchange, well below such active firms as General Electric Co.'s Kidder, Peabody & Co., Morgan Stanley & Co. and Bear, Stearns & Co.  Index arbitrage accounts for 50% to 60% of the program trading that goes on overall; it's a strategy in which millions of dollars in stocks and stock-index futures are bought and sold in quick bursts, to capitalize on tiny price differences between the two markets.  But there are other forms of program trading.  Drexel's recent program trading, for example, has been mostly non-arbitrage activity, such as the rapid restructuring of portfolios by buying or selling huge blocks of stock.  Drexel insists the new group being formed won't contribute to the market volatility associated with index arbitrage.  Despite the howls of program-fearing small investors -- which Drexel need no longer worry about because it has sold its brokerage network -- program trading has been growing after a post-crash pullback.  Just last week, Kidder Peabody underscored its commitment to computerized stock strategies by setting up a new unit that will do various forms of program trading overseas.  In contrast, some firms that cater to individual investors have been trying to score points by taking a stand against the computers.  Charles Schwab & Co. has been among these program-bashers, with its chairman calling program trading "the great white shark of Wall Street."  More significant, Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co. that had done a good deal of program trading this year, last month pulled out of the activity because it "threatens the integrity of the markets in the customer's mind."  The firm may play up the theme in a big advertising campaign.  ---  @ Top Program Traders  @ The 15 most active program-trading firms in July on the NewYork Stock Exchange, by monthly volume in millions of shares  @ MEMBER INDEX OTHER  @ FIRMS ARBITRAGE STRATEGIES TOTAL  @ Kidder Peabody 52.5 9.6 62.1  @ Morgan Stanley 27.5 14.0 41.5  @ Bear Stearns* 15.3 19.8 35.1  @ Merrill Lynch** 11.7 16.0 27.7  @ Salomon** 8.7 15.5 24.2  @ Susquehanna 23.4 0.8 24.2  @ PaineWebber 0.6 19.0 19.6  @ First Boston 15.9 1.1 17.0  @ LIT America** 14.8 - 14.8  @ Goldman Sachs** 1.7 11.9 13.6  @ Shearson** 0.2 8.6 8.8  @ Miller Tabak** 4.3 - 4.3  @ Oppenheimer 2.6 - 2.6  @ Drexel Burnham* 0.7 1.7 2.4  @ Nikko** - 2.4 2.4  @ * Split evenly between own account and those of customers  @ ** Primarily for customer accounts  @ Source: New York Stock Exchange  Robert R. Johnson and Bernard J. Greenblott were elected directors of this manufacturer of flat-panel electronic displays.  Mr. Johnson and Mr. Greenblott, both 61 years old, will increase the board's size to five from three members.  Mr. Johnson was president of Ovonic Imaging from its inception in 1984 to 1986.  He is now a professor and chairman of the Department of Computer Science at the University of Utah.  Mr. Greenblott, formerly an executive at IBM Corp., has been a professor of industrial engineering at Florida International University in Miami for the past three years.  The past couple of years have been tough on precious-metals investors.  Since 1987 silver prices have declined almost 35% and gold has slumped more than 20%.  But some investors see currently low prices as an opportunity to buy.  Robert Gordon, president of Twenty-First Securities Inc. in New York, is one who now looks favorably on the metals for his clients.  But he isn't suggesting people just buy gold or silver and hope for the best.  He recommends a low-risk strategy involving coins.  Coin investments come in two types: Numismatic coins depend on their condition and rarity for most of their value, and bullion coins derive almost all their worth from their precious-metal content.  Periodically, however, when interest in precious metals picks up, bullion coins will sell at a substantial premium to their precious-metal content.  In July and August 1985, for example, the premium increased to more than $1 an ounce, about 17%, over the price of silver for immediate delivery, the so-called spot price.  It is during such times that investors playing the coin strategy take profits.  Currently, bullion coins sell close to the value of their metal content, which is why Mr. Gordon says now is the time to initiate the strategy.  The coins recommended for this strategy are bags of U.S. silver coins minted before 1965 that are 90% silver by weight.  Most coin dealers sell these bags, each of which contains $1,000 face value of coins and about 715 ounces of silver if melted down.  Currently, these coins are selling at a very small premium to the spot price of silver.  In buying such bags an investor risks the difference between the value of the silver in the bag (currently about $3,750) and the $1,000 face value of the coins.  Mr. Gordon suggests that investors hedge this risk by selling an appropriate number of silver futures contracts to protect themselves against falling prices.  Futures contracts are obligations to buy (for those who purchase) or deliver (for those who sell) a specified quantity of a commodity at the agreed-upon price by a certain date.  Most contracts are simply nullified by an opposite trade before they come due.  In a normal market for a non-agricultural commodity that isn't in short supply, the price of each futures contract rises with the number of months remaining until the contract expires.  Thus, for example, while the price of silver for September delivery on New York's Commodity Exchange closed yesterday at $5.095, the price was $5.22 for December, a 2.5% premium, and $5.335 for next March, a 4.7% premium.  As the nearby table shows, no matter how silver's price changes, a gross profit will be realized equal to the difference between the cost of the coins and the price for which the futures contract was sold.  In the real world, however, these transactions cost money to carry out.  The largest cost is the difference between the price at which the bags of coins can be bought and the price at which they can be sold -- the bid-ask spread.  This spread, like much else in the coin market, is negotiable.  Several dealers said that if an investor wanted only one bag -- that is, 715 ounces of silver -- the spread would be about 5.4% currently.  But for seven bags, which is almost exactly 5,000 ounces of silver, a bid-ask spread of 3% could be negotiated.  In addition to paying for the coins, an investor would have to put up good faith money, called initial margin, of at least $2,500 for each 5,000-ounce silver contract sold on the Comex.  A commission of about $35 would also have to be paid for discount brokers to handle the futures trade.  There might also be shipping costs associated with delivery of the coins, or storage costs if an investor decides to leave the coins with the dealer from which they were bought.  Mr. Gordon prefers to take delivery of them to eliminate any problems that might arise from the dealer going bankrupt.  Neither Mr. Gordon nor anyone else knows when, or if, silver coin prices will move once again to a premium over their melt value.  If the futures contract sold to hedge the coins expires before the premium fattens, that contract will have to be closed out -- with an offsetting purchase -- and another, more distant contract sold in its place.  This practice, called "rolling forward" the short position in futures, requires payment of another commission.  "If silver were to make (an upward) move of a couple of dollars (an ounce), I could see the premium for these coins increasing to 10% or 15% over melt value," says Luis Vigdor, executive vice president of MTB Banking Corp. of New York.  He calls silver coins a "sleeper" investment for that reason.  When it's time to collect profits, the investor buys back the futures contract sold to hedge the coins, and sells the coins to a dealer.  The coins can't be delivered against the futures contract.  Mr. Gordon says the gross return on this strategy exceeds the rate on Treasury bills while investors wait for the premium to reappear.  Once it does, as the accompanying table shows, the returns can be very attractive.  The strategy can be carried out with gold coins as well, but it will cost more because the value of a 100-ounce gold contract is about $37,000.  Bruce Kaplan, president of Kaplan & Co., a West Coast precious-metals analysis firm, suggests that the strategy could be used successfully with uncirculated George V sovereign coins minted between 1911 and 1932.  He says that because these are semi-numismatic coins they are likely to develop a larger premium more quickly than the bags of U.S. silver coins.  But he adds: "The bags (of silver coins) are super liquid" -- that is, investors can sell them easily at most dealers.  "They are recognized everywhere."  Jerome Lederman, president of Mocatta Corp. in New York, says that investors who own silver bars might want to swap them for silver coins.  Coins can move to a premium over their silver value, he notes, but bars don't.  ---  @ Speculating in Silver at Low Risk  The risk of owning silver can be minimized by buying bags of U.S. silver coins and simultaneously selling a futures contract.  Each bag contains 715 ounces of silver.  When the futures contract expires, its price will be equivalent to the spot price of silver.  The capital required to do the trade is the cost of the bags of silver coins plus $2,500 in good-faith money to secure the futures contract.  @When an ounce of silver $4.50 $5.00 $5.50 $6.00  @ Sells  @Buy 7 bags of coins at  @$5.24 an ounce = $26, 226  @Profit (loss) on coins  @alone when they sell at no  @premium to spot price of  @silver .....................(3,704) (1,201) 1,301 3,804  @Profit (loss) on coins  @alone when they sell for  @15% above spot price of  @silver ..................... (325) 2,553 5,430 8,308  @Profit (loss) on futures contract sold at $5.75  @an ounce .................... 6,250 3,750 1,250 (1,250)  @Trade costs: bid/ask spread  @plus futures commission ..... 812 898 984 1,071  @Net profit with coins at  @spot price .................. 1,734 1,651 1,567 1,483  @Net profit with coins at  @15% premium ................. 5,113 5,405 5,696 5,987  @Return on investment with  @coins at spot price ........ 6.0% 5.7% 5.5% 5.2%  @Return on investment with  @coins at 15% premium ........ 17.8% 18.8% 19.8% 20.8%  K. Philip Hwang, chairman and chief executive officer of this maker of networking equipment and other computer gear, reassumed the post of president following the resignation of Dallas Talley.  Mr. Talley, president since November 1988, resigned "to pursue his personal interests outside the company," a company spokesman said.  Additionally, William T. Bayer, president of Scientific Micro Systems Inc., was named a director, succeeding Mr. Talley on the board.  TeleVideo recently acquired most of Scientific Micro's assets.  In the past 42 months, TeleVideo has had aggregate net losses of about $64.5 million.  Sir James Black, a 1988 winner of a Nobel Prize in medicine, was elected a director of this health products company.  The board increases to 17.  Dr. Black is professor of analytical pharmacology at King's College School of Medicine, Rayne Institute in London.  In 1987, Johnson & Johnson agreed to fund the James Black Foundation in Great Britain and will be entitled to market any pharmaceutical products developed by the research unit.  Driven by record exports, the U.S. merchandise trade deficit narrowed in the second quarter to its smallest level in more than four years, the government reported.  Calculated on a balance-of-payments basis, the difference between U.S. imports and exports shrank to $27.72 billion in the three-month period from April through June, from $28.38 billion in the first three months of the year, the Commerce Department said.  It was the smallest trade gap since the first quarter of 1985.  The improvement came despite record imports.  Reflecting an increase in oil prices, the goods the U.S. bought from abroad grew 2% to $118.58 billion.  But exports grew 3.4% to a record $90.87 billion.  The report backed up trends sketched by the government's recent monthly merchandise trade reports, numbers followed more closely by the financial markets and some economists than the quarterly report.  The quarterly balance-of-payment report is slightly different from the monthly numbers because it excludes military trade between governments and makes other minor adjustments, such as adding certain transportation costs.  All the numbers were adjusted for seasonal fluctuations.  For the first half of this year, the deficit was running at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of $112.19 billion, substantially narrower than the $127.22 billion for all of 1988.  Measured in 1982 dollars to remove the effects of inflation, the trade gap narrowed in the second quarter to $25.73 billion, compared with $27.02 billion in the first quarter.  For the first half of the year, it equaled an annual rate of $105.51 billion, compared with $124.39 billion for all of 1988.  The battle for Cie.  Industrielle and Groupe Victoire was thrown into confusion after French stock market authorities decided to suspend trading in Cie.  Industrielle shares until at least Thursday.  The trading suspension raises new questions over what defensive strategy Cie.  Industrielle Chairman Jean-Marc Vernes will adopt to fight off a two-pronged 23.7 billion French franc ($3.59 billion) takeover bid for both companies by Cie.  Financiere de Suez.  The takeover is the biggest ever attempted in France.  Until now, Mr. Vernes had hinted that he hoped to avoid having to launch a formal counter-offer by seeking to buy, together with allies, enough Cie.  Industrielle shares on the open market to prevent Suez from succeeding.  Mr. Vernes hoped that these purchases, added to the stake in Cie.  Industrielle already held by his allies, would allow him to retain control of the holding company, whose main asset is a 40% stake in the Victoire insurance group.  But the trading suspension, which comes after complaints from Suez -- upheld by market authorities -- that the only fair response to a takeover bid is a counter-offer, effectively deprives Mr. Vernes of this option.  Under French stock market regulations, Mr. Vernes has until tomorrow to unveil a counter-bid, which must be at least 5% higher than Suez's offer.  Mr. Vernes has scheduled a press conference for tomorrow morning.  Aides wouldn't comment on his plans.  In a communique, Mr. Vernes said the defensive group has "committed itself to respecting takeover legislation" and won't make "significant purchases on the market."  The main obstacle to a full counter-bid is cost.  Mr. Vernes, who is also chairman of the Beghin-Say SA sugar group, currently runs Cie.  Industrielle by virtue of a delicate shareholding balance that has been upset by the takeover bid.  He himself doesn't have the money to launch a counter-bid and has had difficulty finding allies willing to put up the money and leave Mr. Vernes in charge.  Another stumbling block is that Mr. Vernes has pledged that any group he puts together will have a French majority, but potential French white knights are rare.  One option, financial sources say, would be for Mr. Vernes to seek to take over Centenaire Blanzy, a holding company that holds 16% of Cie.  Industrielle.  Together with the 25% held by Societe Centrale d'Investissement, in which Mr. Vernes himself is a big shareholder, and the 3% to 5% held by Cie. de Navigation Mixte, which is believed to be allied with Mr. Vernes, he would be close to a majority.  But Suez holds a 34% stake in Centenaire Blanzy and Victoire itself holds 25%, making a takeover complicated.  Suez already owns 30% of Victoire.  It launched its double-barreled bid earlier this month after a dispute broke out with Mr. Vernes over the funding of Victoire's recent acquisition of West German insurer Colonia Versicherung AG.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  NEITHER NISSAN MOTOR executives nor any one else knew what a huge success Japanese cars would have in the U.S. when Nissan sent Yutaka Katayama to Los Angeles in 1960 to test the auto market for its Datsun.  Nissan picked Datsun, derived from the Japanese for "running away fast," as the name for its special U.S. brand.  The car was crude, underpowered, hard to start and stop.  Katayama, a likable man known as Mr. K in the U.S., where he had a 10,000-name Christmas card list, became more accepted by Americans than by his Tokyo superiors.  He badgered them for seven years before he got the engine and style he wanted.  Datsuns by 1970 took third place in U.S. imports, up from sixth in 1966; and in 1983 the Datsun name was dropped in favor of Nissan.  Toyota Motors, Japan's leading car maker, also had a faltering U.S. start, inserting a toe in 1958, dropping out in 1961 to retool for the U.S. market and returning in 1964.  It was followed by Honda, Mazda and other makes.  New U.S. clean air rules in 1970 and the fuel panic after the five-month 1973-1974 Arab oil embargo gave Japanese brands a special lift.  A Honda engine passed U.S. clean air tests without a converter.  A Datsun won the highest fuel mileage rating in the first, 1974 U.S. test.  Detroit kept making gas guzzlers; its own 1969-1970 stabs at some small cars were mostly feeble.  Voluntary quotas, started in 1981, tried to slow the invasion; so the Japanese began making them in the U.S.: Honda (1982); Nissan (1983); Toyota (1984); Mazda (1987); Mitsubishi/Chrysler (1988); and Subaru/Isuzu (1989).  Currently, Japanese autos take 20% of the U.S. market, down from a peak of 22.6% in 1982 but far above the 3.7% in 1970, according to the Motor Vehicle Manufacturers Association.  Gerry W. Bass, president of the General Hydraulics Corp. unit, was named to the additional post of executive vice president, parts, of the Aviation Leasing & Services Division, a new post.  Ryder is a diversified transportation and business-services concern.  Roy E. Parrott was named president and chief operating officer of this automotive parts manufacturer, effective Friday.  He succeeds Robert W. Navarre, who stepped down as president last month, but will remain chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Parrott, 48 years old, had been president, distribution and logistics operation, for Federal-Mogul Corp., an auto and aerospace parts maker.  This environmental cleanup concern said its president and chief executive officer, Paul Sanders, intends to resign his management posts this fall to pursue personal interests.  Groundwater said Mr. Sanders, 47 years old, will continue to serve as a director and a consultant to the company.  He will remain in his management posts until a successor is named.  Groundwater said the company will begin a search for a successor immediately.  This maker of hard disk drives used to store computer data said two directors, Albert Harris and Renn Zaphiropoulos, resigned for personal reasons after serving about a year on the board, reducing its membership to three.  Federico Minoli, general manager, and Arrigo Berni, vice president marketing and sales, have resigned from the U.S. operations of Benetton Group S.P.A., an Italian apparel concern.  No successor has been named for either post.  Mr. Minoli, 39 years old, has been general manager since January 1988.  Mr. Minoli said he and Mr. Berni will be joining Cuneo and Associates, a management consulting firm based in Milan.  Mr. Minoli said he will continue as general manager of Benetton until a successor is named.  Martin Krossel's Aug. 4 editorial-page article, "It's Just a Game," questioned the public interest in preserving the integrity of baseball.  His article arose from the Pete Rose gambling allegations and the conflict over who has authority to oversee the proceedings.  Mr. Krossel questions whether the consequences of a game-fixing scandal would "really be that disastrous."  Yes, it would.  Any group whose members serve as role models for youth can have a profound impact on the mores of generations present and future.  Also, to compare the true competitive spirit of baseball to the World Wrestling Federation is ludicrous.  Professional wrestling is not sport.  True sport is important in developing in children a desire to excel in all aspects of life.  To be sure, professional sports are run as businesses and, as in all businesses, employees are paid relative to their value.  While it is difficult to imagine how an athlete can be worth millions of dollars a year, the real issue is the value of baseball itself as a positive influence in our society.  Therefore, baseball is an institution, not merely a business.  Its collapse would have a much stronger negative impact than the bankruptcy of a traditional business.  Gregory W. Horning  Baltimore  ---  Yes, baseball in its truest form is just a game.  But it is played on Little League and high-school fields across the country, where no players are paid, attendance is not a barometer of success, and multimillion-dollar sponsorship and TV contracts do not exist.  Professional baseball, on the other hand, is very much a business and carries with it the social responsibilities of any other business.  Betting by players or managers and fixing of games is not a crime only to baseball.  If bets are being made, where does Mr. Krossel suppose these bets are being placed?  For the most part, with illegal bookmakers.  That's a crime, period, whether it's baseball or not.  Mr. Krossel writes, "But even if . . . the professional leagues were to fold, would the losses to society be any greater than if any other business went bankrupt?"  Has he considered the economic impact of baseball on local businesses, such as restaurants and hotels?  How many dollars flow into a city where playoff or World Series games are being held?  Mr. Krossel also plays down the fact that "people who usher fans to their seats, and sell them peanuts . . . would lose their jobs."  That's being kind of cavalier about other people's jobs.  Has Mr. Krossel been to a baseball stadium recently?  Has he seen just who it is seating people and selling peanuts?  Many of them are teens and collegians with summer jobs, and senior citizens.  But I assume Mr. Krossel sees no real benefit for keeping these people employed, especially since the job market for these two groups is so "expansive."  Steve Forsythe  Las Vegas, Nev.  You take Rep. Beryl Anthony to task for supporting a capital-gains tax cut ("Rep.  Anthony, With Key Vote on Capital Gains, Has Close Ties to Washington Tax Lobbyists," Politics & Policy, July 25).  Basically, the article can be summarized in three sentences: Rich people would benefit from a capital-gains tax cut.  Rep. Anthony knows some rich people.  Rep. Anthony has a conflict of interest.  As a member of the advisory board to Rep. Anthony's Commission on Public Finance, I have seen how seriously he takes his role as a member of Ways and Means.  Commission members have been impressed with the enormous time and energy he has devoted to the complexities of state and local finance, and the tax code in general.  In the same edition, an editorial takes the Democratic leadership to task for not supporting a cut in the tax, pointing out that most beneficiaries of such a cut are not rich.  Is a congressman who supports the cut a bad guy for helping the rich, or a good guy for helping the economy?  Or does it depend on which page of the Journal one is reading?  George D. Friedlander  Managing Director  Municipal Research  Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  New York  Your Aug. 10 page-one article on the Katyn massacre was excellent.  What caught my eye was the mention of the inscription on the black-marble wall near the graves, in Polish and Russian, which claimed that the Polish officers were shot down by "Hitlerites" in 1941.  The use of this uncommon term instead of the more usual "Nazis" is an interesting footnote to history.  When I first visited the Soviet Union and Poland in 1970, I was struck by the ubiquitous presence of this unusual word on monuments and in official publications.  I later learned that "Nazi" is an abbreviation representing the pronunciation of the first two syllables of the German word "Nationalsozialistische (Partei)" or "National Socialist" party.  When Hitler violated the German-Soviet Pact of Aug. 22, 1939, and invaded the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics in 1941, Stalin was so furious he declared Hitler was not a "true" socialist.  Accordingly, he ordered the term "Hitlerite" to be used instead of "Nazi."  Henry V. Janoski  Clarkes Summit, Pa.  ---  Your story brings to mind a less-publicized aspect of the Soviet Union's treatment of Polish prisoners in World War II.  After the German invasion, Russia transferred thousands of captured Poles to the Middle East, where they were equipped by the British and formed into two divisions, the Third Carpathian and the Fifth Kresowa.  As part of the British Eighth Army, they landed in Italy in the fall of 1943 and fought valiantly there until the war's end. (Many American Field Service ambulance drivers served with the Poles.)  Their cemetery atop Montecassino honors their most famous victory.  The sad irony is that few of the surviving Polish soldiers were allowed to return to their homes once the Soviet-backed government took over Poland.  Most settled in British Commonwealth countries.  Walter B. Doyle  Salt Lake City  Your Aug. 7 editorial "The Dove-Pork Complex" really misses the point by ignoring the up-front efforts of Rep. Jack Murtha to bring the Base Closure program in line with the law's original intention: saving the taxpayers' money.  The Murtha Amendment simply provided that no base would be closed if it did not provide savings to the taxpayers within six years.  The Base Closure Commission simply failed to do any homework on the Presidio.  For one thing, the land cannot be sold.  By current law, it must be transferred to the Interior Department if the military leaves.  There were other costs that the commission did not see, but the General Accounting Office did.  It found that the pay-back to the taxpayers by closing the Presidio wouldn't even begin until the year 2011, if the base closed next year.  Also, if the Presidio has "no military mission," as your editorial states, then why is the Army asking for $150 million to move the Sixth Army headquarters to perform the same function in Colorado?  You will find no stronger opponent of wasteful military spending than I, and that is why I oppose closing the Presidio because it will cost the taxpayers millions of dollars.  Keeping the military mission at the Presidio does not "scuttle the base-closing act."  Far from it.  It preserves the integrity of the law by saving money.  That's common sense.  Rep. Barbara Boxer (D., Calif.)  Washington  Falconbridge Ltd. said its board withdrew a recommendation that holders accept a tender offer by Amax Inc. and threw its support to a higher offer from Noranda Inc. and Trelleborg AB.  But the Falconbridge directors said they reserved the right to change their minds again, if Amax or another party makes a higher bid for the producer of nickel, copper and zinc.  Noranda and Trelleborg are bidding 37 Canadian dollars (US$31.49) a share, or C$2.13 billion (US$1.81 billion), for the approximately 73% of Falconbridge that they don't already own, valuing the company at a total of C$2.92 billion.  The offer by Amax, an aluminum, coal and gold mining concern based in Greenwich, Conn., is for C$36.125 a share, or C$2.85 billion.  "If a better offer is made by Amax or another bidder, the directors will reconsider their recommendation with respect to the Noranda-Trelleborg offer and will recommend acceptance of the offer that is most advantageous to shareholders," Falconbridge said in a statement.  An Amax spokeswoman wouldn't comment on the Falconbridge announcement.  Amax's bid is scheduled to expire Friday.  The offer by Noranda and Trelleborg expires Sept. 15.  Noranda is a large resource concern indirectly controlled by the Toronto financiers Edward and Peter Bronfman.  Trelleborg is an industrial concern based in Sweden.  Falconbridge shares continued to trade above the levels of the tender offers, reflecting a widespread belief that Amax will come back with a higher bid.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange Friday, Falconbridge shares closed at C$38, down 62.5 Canadian cents, on volume of 452,031 shares.  "The fact there is so much trading over C$38 suggests there are a lot of people who still expect something to happen," said Bruce Bone, Noranda's vice president and treasurer.  While withdrawing its recommendation for the Amax bid, Falconbridge left open a door for Amax to increase its offer, by leaving in place an acquisition agreement it signed with Amax early this month.  Under the accord, Falconbridge granted Amax an option to acquire debentures convertible into Falconbridge shares, once acceptances of Amax's bid reach 56% of the share capital.  The option would allow Amax to reach the 66.7% acceptance level required for its bid to succeed, even if Noranda and Trelleborg didn't tender their holding.  Noranda and Trelleborg own a combined 27.2% of Falconbridge's shares outstanding on a fully-diluted basis.  "By retaining the agreement, it keeps the playing field level for Amax," Michael Parrett, Falconbridge's treasurer, said.  "The message is: The highest price will win it."  CHASE MANHATTAN Corp. had a pretax gain of $121 million on the sale of a stake in Cain Chemical Co.  An earlier edition incorrectly reported the amount of the gain.  (See: "International: Mexico Hopes Its Airline Deal Will Be Catalyst" -- WSJ Aug. 24, 1989)  Friday, August 25, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 44 days; 8.70% 44 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.29% three months; 8.23% six months; 8.22% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.80% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.70% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.72% 30 days; 8.62 60 days; 8.50% 90 days; 8.43% 120 days; 8.38% 150 days; 8.30% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 21, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.99% 13 weeks; 7.85% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.17%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.09%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.12%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Like "perestroika" and "glasnost" before it, the term "joint venture" has been doing heavy duty here recently.  Like them, too, it is used with special creative license to describe developments in the Soviet entertainment industry.  In the local film and television business perestroika can describe the wider dimensions of today's box office.  Glasnost can mean the redder tint of blood and guts in an action picture.  And joint venture can refer to anything that brings hard currency to the Soviets without also bringing them debt, risk or excessive toil.  By that definition, a recent initiative in Moscow by my company, Screen International, was a joint venture par excellence.  After years of publishing daily editions at film-industry functions such as the Cannes Film Festival, our London-based trade magazine sought a rougher kind of trade than anything available on the French Riviera.  We wished to be the paper of record at one of the largest and least organized events in the business of culture -- the Moscow Film Festival.  So over the course of a year, our company negotiated a deal with Sovexportfilm, the official sales arm of the Soviet film industry.  The plan was to produce three issues of an English-language magazine during the festival, using a Soviet typesetter and printer -- a first for a Western publication.  Sovexportfilm would provide the air and ground transport, accommodations and interpreters: We would supply everything else -- and I mean everthing -- for an equivocal 25%-75% partnership.  Of course, there's nothing new about East-West joint ventures.  Fiat's Togliattigrad car factory has been operating since 1971.  And motion-picture co-productions with the Soviet Union are now common (the Soviets typically contribute facilities and labor).  Some Western TV producers have even "bartered" their programs to Gostelradio in exchange for advertising time on the Soviet network.  But for undertakings like these there are precedents and established protocol.  When you publish your own magazine in Moscow, you're obliged to make up the rules as you go along.  They go something like this: -- If your partner is a state-run agency, engage the services of a private Soviet cooperative.  During the very first exploratory visit to Moscow, it became apparent that Sovexportfilm would be no more efficient at publishing a magazine than it is at exporting Soviet films.  The chauffeured black Volgas it supplied turned out to be elusive.  So were the organization's representatives.  Some of its interpreters barely spoke English.  Others brought new virtuosity to the art of English-language dialectic.  "Where's the phone book," I asked an interpreter.  "I have to look up a number."  "There is no phone book," he replied.  "Besides, if you really needed to call that number, you'd already know it."  By a stroke of luck, one of our representatives was introduced to a Moscow couple -- experienced "fixers" -- who were licensed to accept hard currency for their efforts.  They already had imported laptop computers and organized hunting trips to Siberia through their cooperative company.  Why not orchestrate a publishing venture?  In short order they set us up with the capital's most advanced typesetter (equipped with Hewlett-Packard terminals) and with space in the venerable Moscow Printing House No. 6.  -- Wherever possible, engage Western support services -- especially for shipping.  With much magazine copy written in advance and a week's jump on the festival, things were rolling at the typesetter.  Then chaos set in: The shipment of paper consigned to a Finnish-Soviet hauling company was missing in action somewhere between Helsinki and House No. 6.  After days of frantic searching, the paper was located -- in another printer's warehouse.  Undaunted by the paper chase, one of our advertising executives charged the London representative of Sovexportfilm to bring along a valuable batch of advertisers' artwork with him on his flight to Moscow.  The rep arrived in town with a heavy pack of excuses but no artwork.  "First he told us the courier in London had an accident," recounted the ad salesperson.  "Then he told us the courier's wife was in the hospital.  Then he said the material had already been sent by Aeroflot, then by another airline.  It turned out that the package was still in his home when we arrived back in London."  -- Keep your own books.  Joint-venture legislation in the Soviet Union requires Soviet accounting.  But the abacus is still the instrument of choice in Soviet finance.  It's also likely that the assistance of a private cooperative and Western support services in the Soviet Union do not fall under the provisions supplied by your joint venture -- you have to pay for this yourself.  But without your own accountant, how do you report those lost revenues from advertising that didn't make it into the magazine because your Soviet partner's dog ate it?  Thanks to heavy support from longtime clients and a forceful push in Moscow to attract last-minute advertisers, we did show a modest return on investment at the end of the day.  But we did so only after Sovexportfilm forswore part of its share of profits in return for additional advertising in the magazine.  It's what's known in the publishing business as a "contra deal."  Which leads us to rule four:  -- You're not in it for the money.  The Soviet Union presents the same interest for the film and TV business it does for other industries: an immense potential market for Western products.  Until the Soviets make good on the promise of the convertible ruble, joint ventures represent the only feasible way to get a piece of that market.  But in the meantime the biggest yield for these initiatives continues to be that celebrated intangible "good will."  Our three issues did appear -- on time and in order.  Of course, all of the official information and schedules printed in them meanwhile had been changed by the festival organizers.  And with their slightly irregular typeface and grainy photos, the magazines had that distinctive "Made in the U.S.S.R." look.  But, of course, that was the whole point.  Before our joint venture, no official at Moscow Printing House No. 6 believed that they could set and print a full-color magazine in the space of a few days.  Now they know better.  As for good will, the principals of our company got treated to a long boozy lunch by the "apparatchiki" of Sovexportfilm.  Meanwhile, back in London, Margaret Thatcher expressed her delight at this "marvelous opportunity to encourage greater understanding."  As one festival guest told me, the East-West joint venture is "capitalism with a human face."  By the time it was all over, even our Sovexportfilm interpreters had come to understand that "khorosho," "good" in Russian, was not English for "horror show."  ---  Mr. Fisher is the Paris correspondent for Screen International, a British film and television publication.  Bring On the Benefits]  Considering a change of job,  Folks don't ask what its quirks are.  The upward bound want, I have found,  A list of what the perks are.  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Earache  To quartet or trio  I listen with brio,  But I go into shock  Hearing amplified rock.  -- Robert Gordon.  ---  Calendar Comment  Look on the bright side.  If we get through Monday, we get the other days of the week thrown in free.  -- Gil Stern.  Lorenzo Necci, on the telephone with Italy's minister of the environment, is trying to be convincing about the planned cleanup of a chemical plant.  "Don't worry, don't worry," he says.  "We're going to have our name on the plant, so we're going to do this right."  The minister isn't the only one Mr. Necci has been trying to convince that his company, Enimont S.p.A., will be able to deliver on its promises.  In September, Enimont will offer 850 million shares valued at more than 1.2 trillion lire ($853 million) to Italian and foreign investors.  As Enimont's chairman, Mr. Necci is trying to convince investors that this offspring of an uneasy marriage between state-owned EniChem S.p.A. and part of private-sector Montedison S.p.A. can develop into a formidable -- and homogeneous -- force in international markets.  In size alone, Enimont already is a world player.  Its estimated sales this year of 16 trillion lire and net income of 1.1 trillion lire would place it 52nd in Fortune magazine's list of the 500 biggest non-U.S. industrial concerns -- behind Sweden's Electrolux AB but ahead of Germany's Bayerische Motoren Werke AG.  After next month's offering, it will have the fourth-largest market capitalization of any Italian company.  "It will be one of the few Italian stocks traded internationally," says Paolo-Filippo Lardera, an analyst at UBS-Phillips & Drew.  Mr. Lardera expects Italian mutual funds and institutional investors to buy heavily.  "In the short to medium term, I'm very positive" about the issue, he says.  But Enimont also has some problems: It is overstaffed and has inefficient internal distribution, and the two groups that formed it often duplicate efforts.  It gets the vast majority of its sales in Italy.  Its debt of 6.4 trillion lire is twice shareholders' equity.  Its product line is concentrated in the highly cyclical and mature base-chemicals business.  And, as a result of its government-private sector origins, it is prone to culture clashes.  Mr. Necci, who came from the state side, is optimistic in spite of the challenges.  "The problem in all mature sectors is to rationalize," he says.  "We are doing it in Italy, and we hope to do it across Europe."  He says Enimont should save around 500 billion lire a year just by eliminating overlap between Montedison and Enichem plants and by improving logistics.  "That alone would make forming the company worthwhile," he says.  The next step will be to streamline the company's portfolio through acquisitions, joint ventures and asset sales.  "We want to stay only in the markets where we have cost leadership, technology leadership or market leadership -- preferably all three," Mr. Necci says.  Mr. Necci points to Enimont's agreement last month to buy Orkem S.A.'s low-density polyethylene while selling the French state-owned company its Vedril subsidiary, which produces acrylic glass.  The transaction will boost Enimont's international presence, Mr. Necci says: "After it is completed, we will get 22% of our sales abroad instead of 14%."  He adds that Enimont plans more acquisitions to raise its proportion of foreign sales closer to the industry average of 50%.  But the company might not be in a strong position for acquisitions.  "Enimont's balance sheet is among the weaker in the sector," says Alan Norris, European chemicals analyst at County Natwest Securities in London.  He adds that rivals such as West Germany's BASF AG have spent the past few years rebuilding their balance sheets, and some have cash hoards.  Mr. Necci replies that after a capital increase and the share offering, the company's debt should equal equity.  He adds that ENI and Montedison, which each own 40% of the company, have agreed to plow their Enimont dividends back into the company for three years.  Perhaps most worrying for Enimont is that most of its sales are in base and commodity chemicals; fine and specialty chemicals made up just 6.3% of sales in 1988.  Because of low oil prices and strong economic growth, base chemicals have had strong profits in recent years.  But, says County Natwest's Mr. Norris, "demand for base chemicals is slowing in response to higher interest rates and governments' efforts to try to cool their economies."  He expects slower profit growth in the next few years.  Enimont is trying to counter that by spending 400 billion lire a year on developing new specialty forms of its existing base chemicals -- for instance, a fireproof version of polyvinyl chloride -- where profit margins would be higher.  "Am I worried about a downturn?"  Mr. Necci asks.  "Yes, like all businessmen.  I have to be worried."  He says Enimont's future profits "will depend on many things: the economy, the dollar, demand" for its products.  "But I think that with our lower cost of production and market share, we'll be one of the companies that will have better results" in a downturn.  Mallard Coach Co. said William L. Warrick announced that he will resign as chairman and chief executive officer, effective Oct. 31, the end of the company's current fiscal year.  The company said Mr. Warrick indicated he would continue as a director and emphasized that he was giving the board ample notice of his intentions to allow for an orderly transition.  Mr. Warrick said he would be pursuing other personal interests.  The maker of recreation vehicles described Mr. Warrick as a "substantial shareholder."  Midway Airlines flight attendants reached a tentative agreement with the air carrier, according to the Association of Flight Attendants.  The accord follows 17 months of negotiations between the union and the airline, including 11 months of federally supervised mediation.  The three-year agreement, which must be ratified by a majority of the 600 Midway flight attendants in a confidential ballot next month, calls for wage increases and work rule changes.  Midway said it instituted many of the changes Aug. 1.  Joseph A. Rice, former chief executive officer of Irving Bank Corp., was elected to the board of Thiokol, a maker of rocket-propulsion systems and other defense and space products.  He is Thiokol's sixth board member.  On a hot, humid Saturday not long ago, about 300 well-wishers gathered at the main outlet of my Hobson's ice cream franchise here to celebrate one year of its being alive.  Some people had told me it never would open.  Others said it wouldn't last six months.  I often wondered myself.  When the regional tax office came with 10 men and ripped down my $1,000 banner, claiming it was illegal, and when the Korean bureaucracy turned down the 10th appeal to import Hobson's flavorings needed to manufacture the premium ice cream, I was angry.  Another time, as I wrote in this newspaper nearly six months ago, a second-echelon bureaucrat almost forced me out of business before I even opened.  But when the same government authorities extended my deadline to take on a Korean equity partner, I was relieved.  These mixed feelings of frustration with and gratitude toward the authorities are part of the everyday life of a foreigner doing business in Korea.  In fact, such contradictions are what seem to make the Korean world go round.  A Western businessman needs to be ready for them.  Here are a few hard-learned facts of Korean business life:  Don't expect instant success.  Gear your thinking to the long term.  My first objective was to understand what motivates Koreans to buy Western-style consumer products.  What I discovered was a tradition-bound suspicion of foreigners, especially foreigners who peddle foreign products.  Success, I learned, has to be a grinding-it-out process of years, not weeks, with the hope that the quality of the product will win out.  This disinclination toward foreigners will change as more Koreans travel abroad to see and touch the world, and as more foreigners are seen dwelling easily in their midst.  Koreans interact more easily with Westerners than do other Asians, possibly because Koreans and Westerners tend to share such personality traits as spontaneity and a lively sense of humor and fun.  Tread the political waters carefully.  Influential Koreans and expatriates deny the significance of anti-Americanism because responsible people in Korea feel pro-American.  But anti-Americanism is significant.  I see it daily in the Korean customers who pointedly interrogate our counter help, questioning why and how an American should be allowed to make money off hard-working Koreans.  Another example is when I put my children behind the counter thinking it would add a certain American flair.  But I noticed many Korean customers were unnerved to see them there, as though it were not a foreigner's place.  Members of the younger generation don't remember the anguish of the Korean War, nor do they sympathize with the gratitude their elders bestow on Americans for helping save them from communism.  They want their own identities in a new Korea.  They do not want foreigners setting the pace.  Keep an open door and an open ear to labor.  The visible, often violent labor battles plaguing Korea contradict the tradition of a work force motivated by gratitude to a benevolent, paternalistic employer.  That old Confucian ideal has given way to new democratic ideas of organized labor rights.  That does not mean, however, that labor strife is inevitable.  In my still-growing fast-food operation of 20 employees, labor disputes don't exist.  I am a working and participating boss who personally tends to the employees' private needs and problems.  The atmosphere is kept informal; there are no closed doors, no secrets.  On a much larger scale, such a paternalistic structure still can be followed in Korea.  The clearest example is Samsung Group, the largest company in Korea, where there have been no labor problems, because of the company's sensitivity and attention to maintaining harmony and a high level of motivation among company personnel.  Properly motivated, the Korean labor force is one of the most productive in the world, and the expatriate executive should not lose sight of this despite the current labor problems.  Handcuff your lawyer and follow the spirit, not the letter, of the contract.  Foreign businesses find it most difficult to adjust to the interplay between written contracts and personal relationships.  Because personal relationships, not legal contracts, guide their behavior in society, Koreans prefer to develop closeness with foreigners before dealing with them.  I spent 60 hours over 3 1/2 months negotiating a partnership with a large Korean food-processing company.  The first third of the time was spent getting to know one another, going out to lunch, dinner, etc., to see if we could live together from a "personal" standpoint.  Koreans want to be friends so that if conditions or circumstances should change the original premise of the agreement, they can improvise.  Consumerism in the land of thrift is new and sometimes threatens old ways.  For the first time in Korea's recent history, domestic consumption has exceeded export consumption, 48.7% to 48%.  With export growth slowing and consumption at home exploding, foreign businesses should keep in mind that local demand is increasingly the engine of Korea's continuing rapid development. (Korea is Asia's second-largest domestic market after Japan.) This turnabout has been propelled by an average urban household income of $12,000 a year (compared with only $1,600 in 1975) and a strengthened won, making Korean exports more expensive and imports cheaper.  The inherent contradiction of all this, however, must be considered.  The new consumerism puts pressure on Koreans to behave contrary to all they've been taught and trained to think over centuries: the Confucian values of moderation and thrift.  Suddenly there is a new generation that enjoys shopping and instant gratification.  There even is modest wealth among the working classes because of recent hefty wage settlements.  There is more leisure time: Workweeks have been reduced to 44 hours from 55.  For foreigners, tapping into this expanding market can mean opportunity, but beware of the pendulum swinging back.  If you don't have any teeth, use your gums.  The government's liberalizing policy toward imports beckons foreign merchants of consumer goods.  These new businesses provide jobs for Koreans and provide a certain joy to people's lives while raising their standards of living.  Koreans are beginning to believe that they don't lose by importing.  They gain by learning foreign technology, designs and know-how, which they can absorb into their can-do culture.  It's the same culture that provided the spectacular 1988 Olympics, the same one that proclaims "do it even if it is impossible" and "if you don't have any teeth, use your gums."  One can think of no better formula for success than such an attitude . . . even for a foreigner.  ---  Mr. Tunney has spent most of the past 20 years in Korea, Hong Kong, Burma and Japan.  In midtown Manhattan's densely built real estate market, developers and preservationists often lock horns.  But growing public interest in preservation and shrinking opportunities for real estate development in New York City have inspired building design schemes that address both trends.  A proposal announced last week to build a narrow, 52-story hotel over two Broadway theaters is a case in point.  Silverstein Properties, a New York developer, submitted a plan to New York City's Landmarks Preservation Commission to erect the hotel over the Mark Helinger and Neil Simon theaters, historic landmarks.  The slender building, with a 36-foot front, would rise between the two theaters, which sit back to back on West 51st and 52nd streets.  The structure would cantilever over one of the theaters.  Under the plan, Silverstein would lease the property and development rights -- called air rights -- from the theaters to build.  The lease payments would be used to maintain and operate the theaters.  Even if approved by the commission, the project may meet public opposition.  But the choice of the site and the type of design are a sign of the times.  "There is no question that there is less land available, so that working with sites like this that have structural limitations become a necessity," says Bruce Fowle, partner in Fox & Fowle Architects, which is designing the proposed building.  Prior to submitting their plan, developer and architect worked with the landmarks commission to choose the materials and design styles that would coordinate with the existing buildings.  Drawings and models must be more specific than for most projects.  "Seeking Landmarks approval means you have to design a building in such a way that once it's approved it won't be changed; you're stuck with it," says Richard M. Rosan, senior vice president of Silverstein.  Adds commission chairman David F.M. Todd, "We want a degree of certainty, and that means less flexibility for the developer."  These constrictions affect costs and influence what can be built.  Mr. Rosan says the economics of the $150 million hotel project dictate that it must be a luxury inn.  The proposed project is the second Silverstein hotel designed by Fox & Fowle to be situated above a theater.  The 43-story Embassy Suites hotel, under construction just north of Times Square, is being built above the Palace theater, which has a landmark interior.  Robert Nederlander, president of the Nederlander Organization, which owns the theaters, says the real estate projects will support the theaters, even if they aren't otherwise profitable or even in operation.  But his company is continuing a lawsuit against the city, challenging the theaters' landmark designations in an effort to gain more control over use of the property.  The designations followed public outcry against the demolition of the Helen Hayes and Morosco theaters to make way for a Times Square hotel.  A number of other real estate projects, proposed or under development in Manhattan, suggest a similar symbiosis between old and new.  The blend is not always peaceful, but may be inevitable.  Says Mr. Todd, "We keep adding to the inventory of landmarks, and designate quite a few new ones each year.  The public is definitely more preservation-minded."  Many of these new buildings are particularly tall and narrow, even by New York standards, because the few available sites are so small.  "If the properties are in the right locations," says Mr. Rosan, "developers will continue to try to use these sites."  On one of the last remaining prime Fifth Avenue lots, for instance, Solomon Equities is building a slim 53-story office tower that sits behind the landmark Coty and Rizzoli buildings.  Nearby, Rockrose Development Corp. is building a 60-story skyscraper next to the landmark Carnegie Hall and on a site the width of about two brownstone row houses.  There are thing-oriented people and people-oriented people.  I have always been in the people camp.  Recently my people orientation was piqued when I sat in an audience and watched a man performing a balancing act with teacups and saucers.  The finale was the familiar bit: The man balanced a long pole on his chin while he twirled a cup and saucer at the other end of the pole.  The truth is that it was not very entertaining and I would be just as happy if I never witnessed another exhibition of this sort, but in other ways it was a most provocative experience.  I have spent several days thinking about this man and the motivation that produced his skill.  I am sure that there isn't a lot of monetary gain in it.  Certainly the best of the teacup balancers rank considerably below so-so or even bad singers and comics as audience attractions.  A person with this skill has little chance of winding up with a house in Beverly Hills and a Rolls-Royce in the driveway.  Yet, I imagine that one would have to practice for hundreds of hours to become adept at balancing a cup and saucer on a stick, and most certainly there is considerable dedication involved.  There must be many times in an aspiring cupsman's life when he would rather be somewhere else, but there is some controlling drive that keeps him at it -- and it is this drive that fascinates me.  I have little trouble understanding the effort that goes into finding success as a scholar, a musician or an athlete.  The person who does bad Bogart impressions hasn't put much effort into it, so there isn't much to lose.  But the teacup man, and so many others like him, are another matter entirely.  Why would anyone want to become an accomplished baton twirler? or master the musical saw? or learn to play the piano while wearing boxing gloves? or yodel? or eat light bulbs?  Those who have no interest in people and what makes them go probably aren't even curious.  To them, well, if someone wants to twirl a baton or play the piano while wearing boxing gloves, so what?  But this simple brushoff just isn't enough.  All that the teacup man could tell me was that "it's a living," which is really no answer at all.  He could make a better living delivering the mail or selling shoes, and with far less preparation time.  So why does he do what he does?  American industry spends a fortune every day trying to motivate its employees, and certainly millions of parents have grown prematurely old trying to motivate their offspring.  Yet the same people who do not respond to the best planned motivational programs will go off by themselves and spend months teaching a rabbit to play pingpong.  It is something to ponder.  ---  Mr. Smith marches to the beat of his own drummer in Sunland, Calif.  Federal-Mogul Corp. said the Federal Trade Commission granted antitrust clearance to an application from Nortek Inc. to acquire more than $15 million of Federal-Mogul stock.  Officials of the auto and aerospace parts maker said they haven't held discussions with Nortek, a Providence, R.I., aerospace and building concern, since it submitted the application this year.  Federal-Mogul officials also said they aren't aware of what stake, if any, Nortek currently holds in their company's stock.  Nortek declined to comment.  While Nortek's next move in the wake of the FTC ruling isn't clear, the stock market reacted strongly to the news.  Federal-Mogul was one of the biggest percentage gainers in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange Friday as its common jumped $2.75 a share to $26.  Nortek rose 37.5 cents to $8.50.  From "Taking Sino-Soviet Detente Seriously" in the Summer 1989 issue of The Washington Quarterly:  Sino-Soviet trade remains more or less in balance (denominated in Swiss francs).  Armada Corp. said it has asked the New York Stock Exchange to permit trading in its common stock until Armada can make arrangements to shift its listing to Nasdaq.  The Big Board said Thursday it would seek to delist Armada because the company had fewer than 600,000 shares in public hands following a recent stock buy-back program.  The Big Board has suspended trading in Armada stock pending the delisting.  Armada officials said Friday that the number of its shares in public hands had been below 600,000 for "a number of years and that information regarding its stock holdings had been regularly provided to the exchange."  Oxidyne Group Inc. said Lehndorff U.S.A. Group of Cos. decided it wouldn't purchase the assets of Oxidyne's 80%-owned Oxidyne Corp. for $6 million.  Under the agreement, Lehndorff, a Dallas real estate concern, was to join with City Management Corp. of Detroit to form DWO Associates to acquire Oxidyne Corp., a toxic-waste-disposal concern.  Oxidyne Corp. was to use the proceeds to pay debt to creditors and Oxidyne Group.  Jerry W. Peeples, Oxidyne Group chairman, said he doesn't know why the pact was terminated.  Mr. Peeples said Oxidyne will continue to seek a buyer for the subsidiary.  When elderly Chicagoans recently chased Rep. Dan Rostenkowski down the street to protest the new Medicare tax, one senior threatened that, "We won't forget at election time."  Mr. Rostenkowski ignored the seniors and drove off, perhaps because he knew the threat was empty.  Why should Big Dan worry when he has what amounts to life tenure?  This space has been arguing the point for some time, but a recent, under-publicized study has documented just how untouchable congressional incumbents have become.  Commissioned by the bipartisan Center for Responsive Politics, the study is based on a computer analysis of campaign spending and results in 1988 congressional races.  It found that while challengers for the Senate face an uphill fight, challengers for a House seat are chasing the Holy Grail.  "The 1988 election was the most successful for House incumbents since 1792," author Larry Makinson concludes.  "Of the 408 current Members who ran for re-election in November, 402 won" -- a re-election rate of 98.5%.  The Supreme Soviet can't boast such numbers: Including retirements, only 42 new Members were elected overall in 1988, the lowest turnover in U.S. history.  Seventy-three incumbents either ran unopposed or faced only nuisance candidates.  Twenty-seven of the 50 states re-elected their entire congressional delegations.  The average House race was decided by a margin of nearly three-to-one, or 72.6% of the vote. (George Bush's 53% margin was thought a presidential "landslide.") Only 37 races were won with less than 55% of the vote, while 363 seats won with more than 60%.  Congressional apologists argue that both 1988 and 1986 (when the figures were just as one-sided) are aberrations, merely "incumbent years" typical in U.S. history.  But Mr. Makinson shows that in every election since 1976, the House re-election rate has been 90% or higher.  The last time the rate fell below 80% was in Give 'em Hell Harry Truman's year of 1948, when it was a mere 79%.  By contrast, incumbent victory rates in Senate races have risen or fallen with political trends, sinking to 55% in Ronald Reagan's landslide year of 1980.  One explanation for this House-Senate difference is gerrymandering, since no one's yet figured out how to gerrymander an entire state.  But Mr. Makinson's analysis suggests that another advantage for House incumbents is money.  Incumbents typically amass huge spending "war chests," and they're using them.  House incumbents spent about $380,000 on average in 1988, while challengers spent less than $116,000.  Moreover, that gap has widened -- to $264,000 last year from only $16,500 in 1974.  Political action committees, or PACs, are a big source of this growing inequity: PACs accounted for nearly half of all campaign dollars for winning House candidates, and 74% of PAC contributions went to incumbents.  Only 12% went to challengers, who can't peddle "influence" the way incumbents can.  Mr. Makinson calculates that if a challenger spent up to $250,000, his odds of winning were nil.  If a challenger spent between $250,000 and $500,000, his odds soared to 11-to-one.  The Members, Republican and Democrat, have been howling since President Bush announced his campaign reform package, perhaps because they're afraid they might have to compete.  Take Mr. Rostenkowski.  He won his race in 1988 with a mere 74.6% of the vote, but he's taking no chances in 1990.  His leftover campaign cash at the end of 1988 was $1,034,438.  Without reform, about the only way the ethnic Polish elderly in Mr. Rostenkowski's working-class district will be able to depose an incumbent is if they vote for Solidarity.  Dataram Corp. said the letter of intent entered into July 27 with Grubstein Holdings Ltd., under which Dataram was to have been acquired, has expired.  The letter of intent was subject to contingencies that weren't satisfied within the time provided, Dataram said.  Dataram makes memory products and minicomputers.  Grubstein is a closely held investment firm.  Air Products & Chemicals Inc. said it will raise by 7.5% its prices for such industrial gases as liquid and bulk oxygen, nitrogen, argon and liquid helium.  The industrial gases, chemicals and equipment company said the increases are needed because of higher production and distribution costs and to add capacity as demand grows.  The company's most recent price increase took effect in January.  True compassion doesn't consist of marching around with placards but rather of the sort of private, rigorous good work practiced by Francis Collins of the University of Michigan and Lap-Chee Trui of the Hospital for Sick Children in Toronto.  Leading a team of scientists, they painstakingly identified the gene responsible for cystic fibrosis, the horrible disorder that kills most of its victims before they reach their mid-20s.  Some 30,000 Americans now have the disease, and more than a thousand new cases are diagnosed each year.  Now there is hope for them.  Finding the mutation of the responsible gene is the first step toward finding a cure.  Scientists may be able to splice copies of a normal gene into a virus that could be placed in lung tissue.  The healthy genes could then displace a significant number of cells and reverse the defect.  This breakthrough is yet another product of one of the most underappreciated revolutions of modern times, the development of genetic engineering.  For decades, vaccines have crudely altered the genetic structure of deadly viruses.  But they have been shot-in-the-dark enterprises.  Genetic changes weren't understood, some diseases remained impervious.  Molecular biology has changed all that.  Now, scientists can arrive at a more precise understanding of genetic change.  Bioengineering allows scientists to control some of those changes.  Gene therapy could yield cures to the more than 3,000 identified genetic diseases, including muscular dystrophy, severe combined immune deficiency syndrome (the boy-in-the-bubble disease), PKU, and thalessemia and the anemias, including sickle cell.  Last May, Dr. Steven A. Rosenberg of the National Cancer Institute became the first doctor to successfully insert a foreign gene into a human patient.  The engineered white blood cells were not expected to cure the patient's cancer but merely to help doctors track treatment.  It is an important first step.  But Dr. Rosenberg's efforts raised the ire of that much publicized nonscientist named Jeremy Rifkin.  Mr. Rifkin filed suit against the procedure, but managed only to delay it.  Mr. Rifkin and other like-minded media darlings have been fighting gene therapy since the mid-'70s.  A graduate of the 1960s anti-science school of progressivism, Mr. Rifkin marched around with "Don't Tread on My Genes" placards and spread hysteria with talk of a black plague emerging from scientific labs.  Today, Mr. Rifkin argues that a cure for cystic fibrosis will lead inexorably to a totalitarian Brave New World.  He attacks medical advances, saying, "They believe the way to advance knowledge is to get control over the forces of nature.  Nature wasn't placed here for us."  He wallows in his cruel abstractions while thousands suffer and die of genetic diseases.  Like most radical groups these days, Mr. Rifkin takes to the courts to block what he dislikes.  Fortunately, he has had little impact on medicine but tragically has had some success in stalling agricultural advances by creating periodic scares.  The current one is over a genetically engineered hormone made from naturally occurring substances called bovine somatotropin, which increases a cow's milk production by 10% to 25%.  But the Rifkin outfit, "Foundation for Economic Trends," has just claimed that the hormone causes increased breast cancer and "hormonal and allergenic effects" in infants.  Even the highly risk-averse Food and Drug Administration has declared the hormone safe and thrown cold water on the Rifkin report, but, as usual, science has become irrelevant in the face of frightening claims.  Five big supermarket chains, including Kroger and Safeway, have done what corporations usually do when struck with a Rifkinesque attack.  They have withdrawn milk produced with the aid of somatotropin from their dairy cases.  Retailers no doubt figure it is cheaper to take a short-term loss than to lose customers driven away by a scare.  But they may also be emboldening the scare merchants to expand their efforts now that they have a taste of power.  Indeed, empty milk shelves is itself a repeat of the phony Alar scare, which resulted in the needless destruction of hundreds of tons of apples treated with the preservative.  We like to think that in this democracy real science will ultimately prevail over phony science.  The demanding, painstaking, compassionate work that now offers hope for victims of cystic fibrosis and their families is too valuable to be sacrificed to publicity-seeking boobs.  We read on the AP wire that bankers are annoyed that savings and loans are making much of how they now are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. (FDIC), once exclusively the insurer of banks.  The S&L deposit insurance agency, FSLIC, was scuttled by the thrift bailout bill and its functions turned over to the FDIC.  But banks blocked thrift use of the FDIC logo.  Congress had to require a new logo for thrifts, one that does not bear the initials FDIC.  But that didn't stop the thrifts from saying in ads and commercials that they now are insured by the FDIC, so the banks are upset all over again.  Maybe the whole problem could be solved by requiring both banks and thrifts to simply say that all deposits are guaranteed by American taxpayers.  Clearly, that is the case.  The most bitter dispute during the House-Senate conference that resolved the $166 billion savings and loan bailout earlier this month didn't involve money or points of principle, but the job security of a single federal bureaucrat.  Senate conferees insisted that M. Danny Wall, head of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, be allowed to keep his job as chief S&L regulator without going through reconfirmation hearings now that the board's duties have been shifted to a new Treasury office.  House conferees finally gave in after Senators told them they were concerned confirmation hearings for the controversial Mr. Wall could be as vitriolic and damaging to Congress's reputation as were those of former Sen. John Tower.  A lot of members of Congress still don't want taxpayers ever to learn who bears responsibility for the S&L crisis that will cost each American family at least $4,000.  There is more than enough blame to go around (Reps.  Jim Wright and Tony Coelho, for example, have certainly paid a price for their shameless intervention on behalf of insolvent thrifts), but Mr. Wall, 49, has come through the S&L crisis with his role in it largely unexamined.  In the early 1980s, as a key aide to Senate Banking Committee chairman Jake Garn of Utah (the Senate conferee who most strongly backed him), Mr. Wall followed the wishes of the thrift industry by drafting legislation that allowed a new breed of high-flying S&L owner broad new powers to make risk-fraught loans and investments that were more appropriate in a casino than a financial institution.  Then as head of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board from July 1987, Mr. Wall consistently played down the need to act on the mounting S&L mess until a massive taxpayer-paid bailout was inevitable.  For two years, Mr. Wall dismissed the need for a bailout by invoking elastic numbers.  In July 1987, he said the cost of cleaning up insolvent S&Ls would be only $10.8 billion.  By April 1988 he had raised it to $22.7 billion, to $30.9 billion by June, and then to $42.5 billion by July.  As recently as last November, Mr. Wall publicly maintained the S&L industry could still take care of its own mess at a time when outside analysts estimated losses at $100 billion and when the federal deposit insurance fund was in the red by $56 billion.  He told skeptics, "The next president and the next Congress will decide how much more funding we need, if any.  They will also judge how well we have done."  Most members now share the judgment of GOP Rep. Jim Leach of Iowa: "This Bank Board did the opposite of making timely warnings.  It tried to put people to sleep while a fire was raging."  Bert Ely, a financial consultant, says Mr. Wall's rubber numbers served the interests of many in Congress and the White House by delaying full discussion of the crisis until after the 1988 election.  Many in Congress also fault Mr. Wall's actions to keep open Lincoln Savings of Irvine, Calif., for two years after the San Francisco Bank Board recommended it be closed "as a threat to the taxpayers."  Lincoln piled up $1.3 billion in additional losses before it was closed in April.  In early 1988, Mr. Wall cast the deciding vote to transfer regulatory jurisdiction of Lincoln away from the San Francisco board to Washington, an unprecedented move that "made many regulators want to throw up," former Federal Home Loan Bank Board chairman Ed Gray, Mr. Wall's predecessor as Bank Board chairman, says.  Lincoln's regulatory victory encouraged other highly speculative S&Ls to resist being reined in.  Two of the Senate conferees on the S&L bill -- Alan Cranston (D., Calif.) and Donald Riegle (D., Mich.) -- who fought hard to retain Mr. Wall also pressured federal regulators in 1987 to go easy on Lincoln Savings.  Lincoln happened to be owned by Charles Keating Jr., a major contributor to their campaigns.  The San Francisco Chronicle has reported that Sen. Cranston feared that any new confirmation hearings for Mr. Wall would focus unwanted attention on Lincoln.  How did someone like Mr. Wall, a living embodiment of the Peter Principle, end up supervising the nation's thrifts?  Mr. Wall was an assistant city administrator in Utah when he first went to work for Sen. Garn.  After the 1980 GOP capture of the Senate, Mr. Garn unexpectedly became Banking Committee chairman and named the inexperienced Mr. Wall the committee's staff director.  The U.S. League of Savings Institutions, the lobbying arm for S&L's, saw an opportunity.  In 1980, the League had persuaded Congress to raise federal deposit insurance from $40,000 to $100,000 per account, allowing expansion-minded S&Ls to attract more capital by offering high interest rates sweetened with taxpayer guarantees.  But S&Ls were still limited in the kind of investments they could make.  So Richard Hohlt, a chief lobbyist for the League, went to work cultivating Mr. Wall.  The Washington Post's Kathleen Day reported that his number was the first one listed on Mr. Wall's speed-dial telephone.  Mr. Wall, who is largely self-taught on banking matters and has a reputation for not being skilled with numbers, trusted Mr. Hohlt's judgment and expertise, according to Bank Board sources.  Mr. Wall soon earned a reputation for taking all-expense paid junkets, a practice that would be illegal in the executive branch.  In 1985, Senate records show Mr. Wall took 30 trips sponsored by the League and other financial groups, more than any other Congressional staffer.  Mr. Wall says they were "fact-finding missions" to meet with industry leaders.  Mr. Hohlt's lobbying paid off.  In 1982, Sen. Garn co-authored a banking bill that allowed thrifts to invest in such risky ventures as office buildings and windmills.  With deposit insurance covering the questionable investments, the only one at risk was the taxpayer.  By 1986, it was clear many thrifts were losing money on their high-risk ventures and had little cushion to absorb losses.  Ed Gray was winning the League's enmity by pushing for curbs on risky investments.  The League decided Mr. Gray had to leave at the end of his term.  "When it came to Congress, what the League wanted, it got," says Rep. Leach.  It wanted Danny Wall to replace Ed Gray.  So did his supportive boss, Sen. Garn, whose personal secretary is Mr. Wall's wife.  After much arm-twisting, President Reagan appointed Mr. Wall, who won swift confirmation.  He entered the banking job by announcing that unlike Mr. Gray, who had emphasized the industry's problems, he would also focus on the 75% of the industry that was healthy.  "We have to accentuate the positive and eliminate the negative," Mr. Wall said.  He predicted his relations with Congress would be good: "I'm a child of the Senate."  Mr. Wall's defenders say he had a good reason for playing down the size of the S&L bailout -- the fear of sparking depositor runs on thrifts -- and that given Congress's irresponsibility he cannot be faulted for acting in a politically expedient fashion.  Mr. Wall himself is now somewhat bitter about his old friends in Congress.  "They gave us a Band-Aid, and said take care of it until 1989," he said recently.  But federal regulators are meant to be "public servants," and Mr. Wall consistently preferred the interests of a powerful constituency to those of the taxpayer.  In so doing, he became more of a "political servant" to those in Congress and the White House who controlled his career.  For example, both Congress and the White House clearly want to preserve a separate S&L industry, even though the distinction between thrifts and other financial institutions makes little sense in today's economy.  So rather than push for healthy banks to take over insolvent S&Ls, Mr. Wall has tried to force the ailing S&Ls into dubious mergers.  With the deposit insurance fund grossly underfunded by Congress, Mr. Wall was forced to give acquirers billions in tax breaks -- pledging that the government will make up any losses the S&Ls take on their book value -- to induce them to sit on problem loans.  Ronald Perelman, a New York financier, is getting $5 billion in assistance to take over some failed thrifts in a deal that is virtually risk-free to him.  "They've taken a lot of dead horses and stitched them into one big horse that's just as dead and stinks even more," says House Banking Committee Chairman Henry Gonzalez (D., Texas).  Having avoided reconfirmation, Mr. Wall will serve as the chief S&L regulator until his term expires in 1991, and perhaps beyond.  As is his nature, he now wants to "accentuate the positive" and look to the future.  He dismisses estimates that the new bailout bill doesn't begin to cover the real costs of the S&L mess.  Asked recently who was responsible for the S&L mess, he replied: "The point isn't whose responsibility it is.  That's all history."  ---  Mr. Fund is a Journal editorial writer.  Grossman's Inc. said it completed the sale of 28 stores, which made up its Northwest division, to G.N.W. Partners Limited Partnership, based in San Carlos, Calif., for about $24 million.  Proceeds will be used to reduce debt, as will the proceeds from a previous agreement by the home-improvement retailer to sell 59 stores constituting its Moore's division to a U.S. unit of Harrisons & Crosfield PLC of London.  Proceeds from the two sales will be about $100 million, officials said.  The company added that it is too early to tell how the Northwest division sale will affect earnings.  First Financial Management Corp., an information services company, said it definitively agreed to acquire Richmond, Va.-based Computer Co., a health and pharmaceutical insurance claims processor, from the Consolidated Healthcare Inc. unit of Blue Cross & Blue Shield of Virginia for $35 million.  Terms call for First Financial to pay an additional $5 million, based on certain subsequent events, the companies said.  Computer Co.'s 1989 revenue is expected to exceed $54 million, they said.  Both telephone inquiries and appointments have increased at AIDS antibody test centers around the country, but experts say it's unclear how real or durable the surge will prove to be.  The flurry is primarily attributed to a recent study showing that the antiviral drug AZT, when taken by infected people before symptoms appear, delays the onset of acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or AIDS.  In San Francisco, appointment books at anonymous test sites are 20% to 30% fuller than they were before Aug. 17, when the study was released, according to Peter Campos, acting coordinator of the test sites for the AIDS Health Project.  "Whenever new information is developed, or a public education campaign is launched, we see a surge.  But it remains to be seen whether it will continue," Mr. Campos said.  He also warned there is a difference between making and keeping an appointment.  A previous increase occurred last May, when the San Francisco AIDS Foundation issued a strong plea for people to consider early testing and treatment.  In New York City last week, "Eight to 14 telephone lines were ringing at once, in contrast to the usual four to five," said Susan Rosenthal, director of AIDS counseling and testing for seven city test sites.  "Some callers say, 'It {the AZT study} has finally convinced me to move forward,'" Ms. Rosenthal said.  "I think people are finally getting the message that this is a chronic disease, and that with early intervention you can improve the quality and longevity of life."  She added that several other events were drawing New Yorkers to the test sites, including the recent urging of the Gay Men's Health Crisis, a New York-based advocacy group, to take the test.  More importantly, Ms. Rosenthal said New York is seeing a 25% increase in test appointments made through the hotlines.  "Although we always plan for a certain number of no-shows, this time everyone is keeping the appointments," she said.  This volume has resulted in one- to two-week waiting lists at two of the city's test centers.  Boston hasn't seen a sudden spike in demand for the test, said Peter Page of the Northeast Regional Red Cross.  However, George Grady, Massachusetts state epidemiologist, said there already has been a steady increase in demand for the test over the past year as a result of news articles, efforts by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control, and appeals by gay groups, all emphasizing the benefits of earlier testing and treatment.  Even before this month's announcement by federal officials advocating AZT's use in infected people, Dr. Grady said, "A lot of people had already begun to intuit that, if a drug is good, then {taking it} earlier is better."  Fifth Third Bancorp said it completed the acquisition of C.S. Bancshares Inc. for about $6.6 million.  C.S. Bancshares, Connersville, Ind., has assets of about $68 million and is the parent of Central State Bank.  Fifth Third has assets of $5.5 billion and 12 affiliate banks with 148 offices in Ohio, Kentucky and Indiana.  YESTERDAY. Stung by consistent failure to develop a news magazine show, NBC News executives defy tradition and turn for help to the ultra-successful entertainment division head, Brandon Tartikoff.  He generates a "concept."  TODAY.  The news magazine, titled "Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow," hits the air for three summer tryouts (third show: Sept. 13, 10 p.m. EDT).  The concept -- "an electronic time machine."  We are told that "there are three sides to every story on 'Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow'" -- past, present and future.  There are also three hosts -- Mary Alice Williams, Chuck Scarborough and Maria Shriver -- and they tell three stories each evening.  In its first outings, the show features segments like Woodstock, then and now; the My Lai massacre, 20 years later; America's craze for remodeling yesterday's homes.  A typical piece is on criminology: Starting with the murder trial that first introduced fingerprints as valid legal evidence back at the turn of the century, it jumps to the recent discovery of genetic fingerprinting -- using a DNA sample from any piece of skin or hair as conclusive identification of a criminal.  According to the ratings, viewers really like this program -- it not only wins its time slot, it's reportedly getting the best numbers of any NBC news magazine in over a decade.  So is this a happy ending?  Not exactly.  As it turns out, "Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow" is a time machine to nowhere.  It's a news show that wanders off and gets lost in tabloidland.  Friendly, sloppy and a little bit dumb, "YTT" loves a good atrocity tale.  For instance, there's "Ruth's Story," about a girl with cerebral palsy mistakenly placed in an insane asylum.  For 16 years she was trapped by her paralysis, unable to communicate that she was just handicapped, not mentally retarded.  Sad?  Absolutely.  And like most of "YTT," it's massively overwritten: "A medieval madhouse . . . a chamber of horrors . . . one of the worst nightmares . . .  Ruth's horrifying story . . . overnight her life became a living hell . . ."  Beyond the hyperventilating, basic journalistic questions don't get asked or answered on "YTT."  Where were Ruth's parents, or her sister, during the 16 years she was mistakenly treated as insane?  Didn't they ever visit?  As for the remodeling story, who is this partially employed couple, James and Wenda, and exactly how do they happen to have $300,000 to redo their home?  Finally, how can the producers of the My Lai segment possibly let one ex-soldier say, "I still feel our actions were correct," without even getting an explanation from him?  I believe the problem with "YTT" begins at its roots -- the concept.  Sure, a multiple perspective is cute (and it does occasionally offer interesting "where are they now?" glimpses, like one of the black students who integrated Little Rock High School, today grown into a successful investment broker).  But for all the then-and-now charm, each story has to be shoehorned into little yesterday, today and tomorrow boxes.  The fit is often awkward: In their search for a tomorrow to throw in, the producers give us such half-hearted lines as, "In a future war, My Lai could happen again."  That's it -- one sentence, never explained.  This is not just bad thinking; it's bad writing too, induced by the "YTT" concept: "Today, Ruth lives in this apartment . . . light years away from her yesterday."  Or then there's the opening teaser: ". . . worried about where our kids will live tomorrow -- tonight on 'Yesterday, Today and Tomorrow.'"  As the producers of "YTT" (under executive producer Sid Feders) do the time warp, they mangle more than just the clock.  Often lacking historical footage for "yesterday" sections, they're forced to use dramatic re-creations, staging events with actors.  This leads to bizarre complications: "Tonight, using Ruth's own thoughts and another's voice {and a third person as an actress}, we've re-created her horrifying story."  Now as everyone from ABC News President Roone Arledge to CBS Evening News Executive Producer Tom Bettag will tell you, re-creations, reconstructions and simulations have been around for a long time -- no one beefed back in the days of Edward R. Murrow and then Walter Cronkite when "You Are There" aired, packed with interviews of Joan of Arc and Christopher Columbus.  Nonetheless, re-creations are, as Mr. Arledge says, "very dangerous for a news division."  That's because in a business of truth, they're half-truths -- messy gray areas, part fact and part drama.  But say you're not a purist -- and I'm not.  Then use re-creations.  Use real footage also.  But never, never mix the two in the same segment.  Mingling a fake past and a real present is just too strange.  One NBC source tells a story about attending a "YTT" screening where an executive exclaimed, "What a good simulation] How did you set it up?"  "That's not simulated," he was told.  "That's real."  For the next few weeks, there were inside jokes about captioning certain scenes, "This Is Real."  As it flits from past to present to future, "YTT" has come up with one interesting technological gizmo, the Ultimatte -- a special-effects tool that allows anchors to seamlessly move out of one scene and into another.  Yet this too may be more curse than blessing.  It's hard to tell exactly where anchors Shriver, Scarborough and Williams are.  It's not simply that they look stiff and plastic; they look, as one friend put it, "like anchors from Mars."  Wandering in and out of the frame, strolling from present to past to future, meandering from reality to reconstruction and back again -- it's like they're consigned to some sort of terrible limbo, doomed to wander in the twilight zone.  TOMORROW.  Around the television industry, they refer to "YTT" simply as "Yesterday and Today."  "For this show," one insider told me, "there is no tomorrow."  Cathay Pacific, a Hong Kong-based airline group, said it signed contracts fulfilling an earlier commitment to buy a maximum of 20 airplanes from Airbus Industrie, a consortium of European aerospace companies, for around $2.2 billion.  The contract is for twin-engine wide-body A330s, and the aircraft are due for delivery beginning in January 1995.  Cathay Pacific has placed 10 firm orders for the A330, and has options on another 10.  Cathay Pacific intends to use the aircraft on regional routes from its Hong Kong base, and each aircraft will seat 315 passengers in a three-class layout.  Boeing Co.'s Boeing Canada unit said it received orders from Bahamasair of Nassau, Bahamas, for five Dash 8 Series 300 airliners valued at $56 million.  Boeing said it would begin delivery of the 50-passenger twin-turboprop planes in August 1991.  They will be manufactured by Boeing Canada's de Havilland division.  The Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan Ltd. has issued the results of a survey which shows the nation's overall plant and equipment investments will continue to increase in fiscal 1989.  The LTCB study of 1,420 companies was conducted in mid-July.  Researchers said plant and equipment investment for fiscal 1989 is projected to rise 12.9% over fiscal 1988, representing two-digit growth for the second consecutive year.  They noted similar growth in fiscal 1988 was up 15% from the prior year.  Just on programming alone, the Santa Fe Chamber Music Festival probably is one of the more interesting musical offerings around.  In its 17th season this year, the festival -- which was born because a pianist (Alicia Schachter) and a film producer (Sheldon Rich) decided to summer in the New Mexico high desert -- has turned into a lavish, six-week cornucopia featuring everything from Monteverdi and Bach to contemporary works and Andean folk music.  Mr. Rich, the festival's president (Ms.  Schachter is the artistic director) says that after an early experience with chamber music that almost turned him off it forever -- a program of three Bartok quartets -- he decided that his festival would err on the side of eclecticism, if at all.  With such a wide range of offerings, the festival easily could turn into a grab bag with no point of view, but Mr. Rich and Ms. Schachter tie it together with lectures, program notes and interesting juxtapositions.  One concert on the more or less "standard repertory" series (it's dubbed "Music of the Masters") started out with the Mozart Quintet in C Minor for Oboe and Strings, went on to Schumann's "Six Etudes in the form of a Canon," Op. 56, which was transcribed for two pianos by Debussy, and concluded with Ravel's "Chansons Madecasses" and Schoenberg's "Pierrot Lunaire."  Not very standard at all.  The chronological progression from straightforward to bizarre was compelling, though not all the performances were as good as they could have been.  The Mozart was remarkable chiefly for the lively, singing tones of oboeist Allan Vogel; the string sound from Gregory Fulkerson, violin, Ira Weller and Barbara Westphal, violas, and Steven Isserlis, cello, was vigorous but often muddy.  The Schumann arrangement, performed by Ms. Schachter and James Tocco, was odd and fascinating: Its lushly Debussyan flavor contrasted with strict counterpoint.  Ms. Schachter, alas, is not nearly as good a pianist as she is a programmer.  Matters improved in the vocal section of the program.  Soprano Phyllis Bryn-Julson teamed up with flutist Ransom Wilson, Mr. Isserlis and Mr. Tocco for "Chansons Madecasses," making an effective statement of these voluptuous songs with their spare accompaniments.  Best of all was a sharp, diabolical reading of "Pierrot Lunaire," Schoenberg's revolutionary, proto-12-tone chamber song cycle of 1912. (Schoenberg is one of the festival's spotlighted composers this season.) Ms. Bryn-Julson, Mr. Wilson, James Buswell, violin/viola, Franklin Cohen, clarinet, Robert Wingert, bass clarinet, Gary Hoffman, cello, and Ursula Oppens, piano, were arresting, especially in such moments as the eerie "Der kranke Mond" for flute and voice, and the sinister bass clarinet part in "Nacht."  The festival is for the most part built around soloists who like to perform chamber music.  Many are regulars who are consulted about what they want to play and whom they'd like to play with; indeed, the roster started out, Mr. Rich says, as "a few friends who came out and lived in charming adobe houses and put on a few concerts."  More than 70 artists are participating this season.  They include the composer-in-residence, Bruce Adolphe, from whom the festival commissioned a music-dance piece, "Sharehi," and five Bolivian musicians who make up the group Rumillajta.  Non-European music has become the "in" thing recently, but the Santa Fe festival has been pursuing it for three years now with its "Music of the Americas" program.  Kicked off in 1987 with the Argentinian tangoist Astor Piazzolla, who now has something of a cult following here, "Music of the Americas" is a logical leap for polycultural Santa Fe.  But the festival is not content with exposing its discoveries to New Mexicans: Rumillajta made a 13-concert cross-country tour, including a stop in New York for performances at Lincoln Center Out-of-Doors and Central Park Summerstage.  The poncho-clad, soft-spoken group is quite widely traveled already: One of the players greeted the audience in six different languages, although another introduced numbers in untranslated Spanish.  Their music is a mix of Andean traditional and contemporary tunes, performed on traditional instruments that include bamboo pan pipes of varying lengths, an end-blown flute, the charango (a small, 10-string, guitarlike instrument), a drum, a shaken percussion instrument made of llama and sheep hooves, and guitar.  Sonically, Rumillajta is irresistible.  The pan pipes, which are anything from handsized to nearly as tall as the player, are wonderfully various.  At times, Nestor Tintaya played three sets of them at once.  They may make the wispiest of sounds, like wind in the mountains, play an accented melody, or set up a deep percussive beat, as they did in G. Rivera's "Mallku (The Condor, King of the Birds)."  The flute is the group's most versatile melody instrument, sliding and bending notes at will, and the big skin-covered drum underscores the power of the biggest pan pipes.  Nevertheless, there was a faint whiff of inauthenticity about the performance.  The amplification system, though doubtless necessary in Santa Fe's Museum of Fine Arts auditorium, made selective use of reverberation, and the guitar often took over the melodic function where the subtler instruments might have had less impact but more feeling.  The musicians, too, gave pat, pseudo-metaphysical descriptions of the songs ("The night is cold, but the people's hearts are warm"; "We must listen to the wise words of the leader").  The performance was somewhat low-energy anyway.  The players are clearly trying to communicate their art to people who have not grown up with it, but the overall effect is more canned ethnicity than affecting spontaneity.  ---  Ms. Waleson is a free-lance music writer based in New York.  Federal-Mogul Corp., an auto parts maker, said it completed its joint-venture agreement with G. Bruss G.m.b.H., a West German maker of seals and specialty molded products.  Federal-Mogul, which owns 49% of the venture, didn't disclose the cash it paid as part of the transaction.  The two companies also agreed to form a U.S. joint venture for specialty gasket and sealing device production.  Federal-Mogul said the alliance is to prepare for European Community developments in a barrier-free market by the end of 1992.  Hong Kong's July trade balance swung to a surplus of 3.81 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$488 million) from a deficit of HK$284 million a year earlier, according to provisional figures released Friday by the government.  The July figure also represents a remarkable improvement from the June deficit of HK$1.21 billion.  The data for the year through July showed a deficit of HK$9.66 billion, up from HK$9.04 billion a year earlier.  For 83 years, John Scull's family has grown wheat on the rolling farmlands near here.  Now, his wheat fields have holes.  Well, not exactly holes.  They are large, near-perfect circles of flattened wheat, swirled to the ground in a precise spiral pattern.  They appear overnight in the middle of otherwise ordinary-looking fields.  And nobody knows what's causing them.  "It's the most unusual thing to happen on this patch, that's for sure," says the lanky Mr. Scull, tugging reflectively on his short beard.  What's happening in Mr. Scull's wheat field is happening in farmlands all over southern England this summer, and it's creating an uproar throughout the country.  Investigators and scientists are slogging through fields, lugging video cameras, fancy infrared scopes and other high-tech detection devices.  Curious tourists and reporters from around the globe are descending upon the peaceful villages, sometimes wreaking more havoc than the circles themselves.  They trample the ripening wheat.  They set up ladders in fields to take pictures.  They get into auto accidents.  Pastoral Cheesefoot Head (population: six) now has traffic jams.  "Loads of people are looking for the circles," says a woman selling strawberries at a roadside stand near another circle-prone field.  Is her location a good one?  "It is now," she says.  British agriculture and defense officials want to know more.  So does Queen Elizabeth, who is said to have sharply questioned Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher about the circles recently.  While those talks are kept secret, a Buckingham Palace spokesman says the Queen took a hurriedly published book about the circles to her summer palace in Scotland this month; as Britain's biggest landowner, she has every reason not to be amused.  The largest circles are about 100 feet in diameter.  Sometimes groups of circles seem to resemble giant crucifixes and Celtic crosses stretching across the undulating hills.  Inside the circles, the wheat is leveled completely.  But the crops are undamaged and continue to grow.  Horizontally.  At first, many thought the whole thing a hoax, in the proud tradition of such wellknown British oddities as the Loch Ness monster and the Piltdown man. (Indeed, the bones of the Piltdown man were found in the early 1900s in a field only a few dozen miles east of here.  For decades he was thought to be prehistoric forebear of man, only to be exposed as a complete fake in 1953.)  But the circles' precision and number -- they weren't widespread until recently, with more than 250 recorded this year -- have dispelled most talk of hoaxes.  Whatever makes the circles leaves no tracks.  Many of the circles can't easily be seen unless you are in the middle of a wheat field, which more or less undercuts the point of faking them in the first place.  Nor is it the first time unexplained phenomena have been found around here.  One of the greatest concentrations of circles is near the mysterious standing stone formations at Stonehenge and Avebury.  No one has fully explained them, either.  Still, farmers and scientists are abuzz with theories.  One is that the circles are caused by hedgehogs gone mad, or by buck deer in rut.  Another blames mysterious whirlwinds never before encountered here.  Other theories include bizarre insect infestations or a new strain of virus.  Or over-fertilization.  Or under-fertilization.  Then there are high-tech explanations.  Some people believe the circles are caused by helicopters.  Aviation experts point out, however, that helicopters would have to fly upside down to carve such flawless circles.  Others contend the circles are made by a mysterious magnetic force, or by a Star Wars space-defense beam run amok.  And, of course, there's the inevitable flying-saucer theory: Alien ships flatten the crops when they touch down to visit Earth.  Indeed, a mysterious white substance that laboratories haven't identified has been found near some circles.  "I reckon it's one of them UFOs," says Edley Ware, a weathered farmhand.  "You never know what is going on in this world."  He pauses for a moment, as a new thought strikes him."You know, it could be the bloody Yanks.  They always have something up their sleeves."  One of the biggest circular formations is near a stone-age burial ground in Silbury Hill.  Seven circles stretch across hundreds of feet of prime British farmland, rolling golden fields of wheat gently baking in this summer's unusually warm sun.  Near a distant farmhouse, a wisp of smoke rises from burning stubble.  A harvester drones at the bottom of the field, methodically scooping up the ripe crop.  Wind blows, gently rustling the wheat still standing.  Carved with almost surgical precision, the largest circle in the formation is a 100-foot-wide ring of flattened wheat stalks.  The still-growing grain is darker than surrounding crop because it has gotten less sunlight.  Outside the circle, the stalks of wheat stand straight, about three feet tall.  At the center of the circle, the wheat has been spun together to form a thatched mound a few inches high.  From this point, the stalks are spun out clockwise, as if a giant fist has powerfully, but gently, twisted them into the ground.  Colin Andrews, an electrical engineer who is one of the two authors of "Circular Evidence," the book the Queen is reading, argues that a rotating field of high energy is creating the circles.  "It may well be some form of intelligence," he says.  Pat Delgado, his co-author, thinks there may be a message in the circles.  "It could be a cry for help," he says.  "It could mean, 'If you destroy this food, your planet is finished.'"  "That's bunkum," says Terence Meaden, a local meteorologist.  "The idea that there is some intelligence operating is pure fantasy."  Whirlwinds, he contends, are the only explanation.  Cool sea breezes mixing with hot air above the fields are forming spinning wind vortexes that touch down and twist the wheat.  Many other scientists and government officials also subscribe to this view.  But not the farmers.  "It's a load of rubbish.  I don't believe a whirlwind could do that," says Simon Brown, who has had several circles on his farm.  They are carved too neatly, he says, and the fields bear no traces of moving winds.  One of the formations, a large circle ringed by four smaller ones, could fit the imprint of an alien spaceship with four pods for feet, some say -- though Mr. Brown has no truck with the UFO theory, either.  But Mr. Brown believes the appearance of the circles does prove one thing: "It means we have absolutely no bloody idea of what goes on around us.  It's one of those eternal mysteries.  Long may they continue."  The Hong Kong government Friday downgraded its forecast for economic growth this year to 5.5% from the 7% projected six months ago, citing slowing growth in exports and a slackening of domestic demand.  Despite the cooling, inflationary pressure remain strong and consumer prices are expected to rise 9.5% over the course of the year, up from the 8.5% anticipated six months ago.  Hong Kong's gross domestic product grew 7.4% last year, while prices rose 7.5%.  In 1970 a small country in Latin America suddenly took on immense significance in the international arena.  The country was Chile and its new prominence was due to the election of Salvador Allende, a socialist at the head of a coalition that included the Chilean Communist Party and other far-left groups.  As Mark Falcoff notes in his new study, "Modern Chile 1970-1989: A Critical History" (Transaction Publishers, 327 pages, $32.95), Allende's victory -- the first clear triumph of Marxism in a free election -- profoundly unsettled the postwar notion that democracy provides "its own antibodies to the challenge of communism."  Furthermore, Allende's Popular Unity government represented "a beacon of hope to the left wing of all Western European Socialist parties, as well as to advocates of an emerging 'theology of liberation' within the Roman Catholic Church."  Three years later, the "Chilean road to socialism" was in flames.  Allende was dead, replaced by an obscure general named Augusto Pinochet.  The international left had a new martyr for its pantheon of heroes, with the U.S. widely blamed for installing a military dictatorship.  Particularly in Western Europe, notes Mr. Falcoff, Chile "became a synonym for the resurgence of the fascist threat supposedly extinguished once and for all in the Second World War."  Mr. Falcoff brings Chile's domestic political and economic situation into its proper, dominant role in Allende's downfall and Pinochet's rise, without scanting Washington's role and reactions to the drama.  He reminds us that the Church committee's investigation into the U.S. role in Chile coincided with our withdrawal from Vietnam.  "Both events," he writes, "led to a generalized distrust of government, as well as a distaste for intelligence activities abroad, covert action, even the anti-communism that served as the organizing principle of American foreign policy since World War II.  The stage was set for a 'revisionist' moment in American culture, an exercise in national self-repudiation and self-hatred whose emblematic personalities were Noam Chomsky, Daniel Ellsberg, the brothers Berrigan, Ramsey Clark, Bishop Paul Moore, among thousands of lesser imitators in pulpit and press, classroom and legislative chamber."  Chile "became a treasured exhibit in the chamber of horrors of American foreign policy."  Mr. Falcoff, a senior fellow at the American Enterprise Institute and a frequent contributor to Commentary, debunks the wilder claims from that revisionist moment.  He has carefully probed the role of the Nixon administration (particularly the CIA) and such multinational corporations as ITT in Chile's politics and economy.  All of these groups had reasons for wishing Allende dead.  But in the end, Mr. Falcoff's evidence demonstrates that the U.S. had no direct part in the coup that killed Allende and brought down his Popular Unity government. (To this day, it's unclear whether Allende shot himself or was killed by Pinochet's troops.)  More importantly, Mr. Falcoff shows how Allende's rise and fall was not a freak occurrence but an outgrowth of historic Chilean conditions.  Included in this briskly written, scholarly volume are interesting chapters on the boom-and-bust cycle of 1970 through 1973; the issue of agrarian reform; the matter of state control and expansion of the public sector; and the key role of copper in the development of modern Chile.  These days, Chile continues to hold a special place on the world stage.  Chileans are scheduled to go to the polls in December to elect a new president and return the country to democratic rule.  Pinochet has indicated that he will step aside, but Mr. Falcoff seems to have his doubts about the general's sincerity.  Mr. Falcoff is not a fan of Gen. Pinochet -- he calls him a "quasi-fascist" -- and he is skeptical about the extent of Chilean privatization and diversification, the much ballyhooed "economic miracle" of recent years.  According to Mr. Falcoff the socioeconomic forces that brought Allende and then Pinochet to power have not changed all that much.  "Modern Chile" is a meticulous, fair study in a field that in recent decades has been crowded with mendacity.  Chile most likely will continue to absorb some students of foreign affairs, not now for the drama of the overthrow of a Marxist government but for the apparently more prosaic transition (nudged along by the U.S.) from authoritarian to democratic rule, and for the evolving debate over the Chilean "Chicago School" economic model.  It is worth noting, too, how little one hears from the left in Chile these days.  The armchair revolutionaries and their violent cousins on the front lines seem to have decamped for Nicaragua and El Salvador.  But for those who believe that prudent and sustained pressure for democratic values can gradually bring greater freedom world-wide, Mr. Falcoff's new book will reveal many lessons about just how complicated and dangerous change can be in a far-off land of which we know little.  ---  Mr. Morrison, former deputy director of the Committee for the Free World, writes for the American Spectator.  A group of investors led by Stuart Hersch, a former senior executive with King World Productions Inc., has agreed to buy from Kushner-Locke Co. a minority position in the television production company, with an option to increase ownership at a later date.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Peter Locke, Kushner-Locke's co-chairman, said Mr. Hersch will join the company's board and help its efforts to expand through acquisitions, mergers and other ventures.  Mr. Hersch joined King World, a television syndication company, in 1983 when it was a private concern, and helped guide it through its initial public offering and subsequent offerings through 1987.  Gambro AB, a Swedish medical instruments company, reported a first-half pretax profit rise of 17% to 171.2 million kronor ($25.9 million) from 146.7 million kronor a year earlier, on an 8.4% increase in sales to 1.54 billion kronor from 1.42 billion kronor.  Earnings per share rose 21% to 4.21 kronor from 3.49 kronor.  Operating profit increased 24% to 214 million kronor from 172.1 million kronor.  The company said that operating results in the Japanese market have improved significantly this year, and that Gambro's markets in Western Europe continued to develop favorably during the period.  But it said earnings in the U.S. market are still unsatisfactory.  A prominent consultant and top adviser to the Reagan-Bush campaigns said he was paid $103,000 for work on a North Carolina apartment project that has figured prominently in the unfolding federal housing scandal.  Lou Kitchin, President Reagan's Southern political director in 1984 and an adviser to President Bush's 1988 campaign, previously said he was paid only $25,000 for consultancy work on the Durham, N.C., project, which received abundant federal subsidies despite widespread opposition among federal housing officials.  But in interviews last week, Mr. Kitchin, who denied exerting influence over Housing and Urban Development officials involved in the project, said that a recent review of his records and discussions with his developer client disclosed the much higher fees.  Mr. Kitchin, who runs a small Atlanta consulting firm, said he was setting the record straight because "nobody is trying to cover up anything."  Mr. Kitchin, who has been heavily involved in HUD projects, said Friday that he didn't realize he had been paid so much on the Durham project when he was asked about his fees by a reporter in June.  Mr. Kitchin's role in the North Carolina project will be examined by the House Government Operations subcommittee on employment and housing, which is probing influence-peddling, fraud and mismanagement at HUD during the Reagan administration.  He is scheduled to testify on Oct. 5.  The Durham project was opposed by many HUD officials as far back as 1979 because of economic and site problems.  Nonetheless, in 1985, HUD waived regulations and permitted the project to go forward.  HUD granted a generous funding package, including $11.5 million in rent subsidies over 15 years, a $2.3 million urban development grant, and mortgage insurance.  Besides Mr. Kitchin, the House panel is investigating the role of the Reagan administration's HUD secretary, Samuel Pierce, in the project.  In May, Mr. Pierce testified that he didn't order aides to fund projects, but a former top assistant, Shirley McVacy Wiseman, contradicted him, telling lawmakers that he directed her in 1985 to approve subsidies for the Durham venture.  The funds were used to convert the old Durham Hosiery Mill into 151 apartments for the elderly.  A longtime Pierce friend and then-Durham mayor, Charles Markham, who worked closely with Mr. Pierce at a New York law firm in the 1960s, was a big booster of the project.  Mr. Pierce has chosen to remain silent on why he backed a project so widely opposed within HUD.  But he recently told a close friend that it had strong support not only from Mr. Markham but from North Carolina's congressional delegation and other politicians.  "He said there were all kinds of political pressures from Democrats and Republicans," the friend said.  Mr. Pierce is scheduled to testify about his Durham role on Sept. 15.  The project was developed by a Boston, Mass., concern, Myerson/Allen & Co.  In testimony before the House panel on July 17, the firm's president, John Allen, said he paid a consultant, Mr. Kitchin, for technical expertise and political influence.  He said he paid Mr. Kitchin about $40,000.  But in a letter earlier this month to Rep. Tom Lantos (D., Calif.), the panel's chairman, the company corrected his testimony.  At Mr. Allen's request, the company said it reviewed its records and found Mr. Kitchin was paid $103,000 from December 1982 through June 1988 for his Durham consulting work.  Mr. Kitchin said he didn't know Mr. Pierce and hadn't lobbied him.  He also said that his principal role was to help obtain HUD mortgage insurance, which was crucial to getting the $11 million Durham project off the ground.  He added that he wasn't involved in efforts to get rent subsidies and an urban grant for Mr. Allen.  He said he met with senior HUD officials to work out problems on the project but insisted that he never tried to use his influence as a Reagan-Bush political operative.  "I don't use political influence," Mr. Kitchin said.  He added: "Unless you call political influence getting to somebody to answer a question, but that is stretching it a tad."  Mr. Kitchin said that in preparation for his congressional testimony he was reviewing all of the fees he had received from lending institutions and developers principally for assisting in obtaining HUD mortgage insurance on various developments.  He said that from 1982 to 1988 he grossed more than $700,000.  OHM Corp. said its O.H. Materials Corp. subsidiary signed a five-year federal government contract to clean up hazardous waste sites.  The environmental services company valued the contract at as much as $50 million.  Separately, OHM said another clean-up contract with the Environmental Protection Agency, valued at as much as $45.4 million, has been extended for one year.  Unilever U.S. Inc., New York, said it signed an agreement under which its Quest International unit will buy the Sheffield Products division of Kraft Inc.  Terms of the transaction, believed to be valued at less than $50 million, are subject to regulatory review and approval by the board of Kraft's parent, Philip Morris Cos.  Quest, based in Naarden, Holland, makes flavors, food ingredients and fragrances and is part of the Unilever Specialty Chemicals Group.  Unilever U.S. is the holding company for the Anglo-Dutch Unilever Group's holdings in the U.S.  Sheffield, based in Norwich, N.Y., produces refined specialty proteins and pharmaceutical-grade lactose.  France's unemployment rate rose to 9.6% in July from a revised 9.5% in June, according to seasonally adjusted figures published Friday by the Social Affairs Ministry.  The revised June result represents a sharp downward correction from the previously reported 10% rate.  The ministry said the revision reflected an adjusting of the base for the jobless figures.  With the new base, it said, the July 1988 unemployment rate, initially reported as 10.4%, would have been 10.1%.  July saw a 0.8% rise in the number of jobless to a seasonally adjusted 2,546,900 from 2,526,100 in June.  An economist said this advance was in line with previous market estimates.  The New York Stock Exchange said one stock would move to the exchange this week from the over-the-counter market.  Harken Energy Corp., Bedford, Texas, will trade under the symbol HEC.  The company buys, restructures and manages oil and gas properties.  On the American Stock Exchange, two companies will transfer from the over-the-counter market this week.  Fountain Powerboat Industries Inc., will begin trading with the symbol FPI.  It is a Washington, N.C. maker of power boats.  Imperial Holly Corp., a Sugar Land, Texas refined sugar production company, will start trading with the symbol IHK.  On the National Market System of Nasdaq's over-the-counter market two issues were listed.  New Image Industries Inc., Canoga Park, Calif., started trading with the symbol NIIS.  The company makes computer imaging products.  Southeastern Savings Institutions Fund Inc., a newly organized closed-end management investment company in Charlotte, N.C., started trading with the symbol SSIF. Primarily, it will invest in stocks of savings and loans in the southeastern U.S.  Separately, on the American Stock Exchange, put and call options started trading on the common stock of Washington Mutual Savings Bank, a thrift based in Seattle.  The Chicago Board Options Exchange said it listed options on the common stock of Beckman Instruments Inc., a Fullerton, Calif., maker of laboratory instruments.  T-shirts, long the epitome of American casualness, have grown up and moved upscale.  For one thing, you're not supposed to call them T-shirts anymore.  "We prefer 'imprinted sportswear,'" says Verne Packer, executive director of the Imprinted Sportswear Show, the industry's national trade exhibition, which was held earlier this month in Philadelphia.  In some circles, T-shirts have become high fashion as people wear them to display what Mr. Packer calls "sophisticated graphics."  For example, Stafford Blaine Designs Ltd. of Minneapolis offers $14 white cotton shirts with renderings of Renoir's painting "Two Sisters on a Terrace" or Gaugin's "Tahitian Landscape."  At the Philadelphia convention, hourlong fashion shows ran twice daily to help retailers appreciate the latest lines of imprintable clothing and graphic designs.  Also on display were shirts with extra dimensions: one with the front of a cartoon-like sailor on its front and the sailor's backside on its rear panel; another with part of a puffed-up soccer ball protruding from the shirt's front.  T-shirts are just a part of the $7 billion to $10 billion U.S. imprinted sportswear industry, which includes sweatshirts and pants, hats, ski clothing, work shirts, umbrellas, novelty license plates and even golf balls.  Although T-shirts are still the mainstay, with estimated annual sales of nearly $3.5 billion, they have changed in recent years.  The traditional rubbery hot transfer shirt has almost disappeared, gentrified out of existence by more sophisticated printing techniques and designs.  Indeed, automation has come to what used to be a low-tech industry.  An octopus-like machine produced by Advance Group, Chicago, can automatically screen eight paints onto eight shirts, rotate the shirts, and apply the next color.  A computerized embroidery machine made by Madeira USA, Laconia, N.H., can simultaneously stitch 12 copies of a previously punched-in pattern.  And several companies, including Vital LaserType Inc. of San Diego, offer computerized graphic-design systems that produce print-ready emblems.  The latest technological rage is the "spin art" machine, a high-speed turntable in a plastic bubble that produces an advanced version of tie-dye.  Spin art, a user-interactive process, makes everyone an artist, says Greg Jaffa, owner of the company that first made the machines, Artwave America of Hawthorne, N.J.  In spin art, a customer applies paint to the shirt or other product with brushes or sponges, gives it to the retailer to attach to the $17,000 spinner and watches as centrifugal force pulls the paint into patterns.  The result: "one-of-a-kind wearable art," Mr. Jaffa says.  A primary target market for spin art, as well as most high-fashion imprinted sportswear, is women 21 to 40 years old.  Women want inexpensive fashionable clothing, reasons Mr. Jaffa, and with spin art a woman can create her own unique shirt for about $13.50.  According to recent surveys by Impressions Magazine, a sportswear trade publication, women buy about seven imprinted T-shirts a year, men about six.  The gentrifying of T-shirts has caused a steady rise in prices, according to Carl Piazza, Impressions editor.  Wholesale prices have risen 5% to 8% a year over the past five years, he says.  His research suggests that, in the past 12 months alone, unit sales of T-shirts increased 6% to about 1.7 billion.  Despite the rise in the T-shirt's status, it still doesn't have what it takes to function as standard business attire.  A look at the convention floor showed that even T-shirt vendors don't wear the garb to work; most wear suits instead.  What's missing in a T-shirt?  "Taste," says Jack Hoover, a former T-shirt maker who quit the business to make airbrushed novelty license plates.  But Mr. Hoover adds that he agrees with this assessment from H.L. Mencken: "No one ever went broke underestimating the taste of the American people."  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Anheuser-Busch, proposed offering of $300 million of senior convertible debentures.  Chambers Development, offering of $75 million of convertible debentures.  Central Maine Power Co., offering of 2.3 million common shares, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Kidder, Peabody & Co.  NCNB Corp., shelf offering of up to $600 million of notes on terms to be determined at the time of sale.  And also, an offering of five million common shares to be sold in Japan, via Nomura Securities International Inc.  Old Spaghetti Warehouse, offering of 680,000 shares, of which 560,000 shares will be sold by the company and 120,000 shares will be sold by a holder, via Eppler, Guerin & Turner Inc.  Texas Utilities Co., proposed offering of five million common shares, via: Goldman, Sachs & Co., Merrill Lynch Capital Markets; and Morgan Stanley & Co.  York International Corp., offering of $220 million of senior debentures, via Prudential-Bache Capital Funding.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Stone Container Corp. -- $200 million of 11 1/2% senior subordinated notes due Sept. 1, 1999, priced late Thursday at par.  The issue is noncallable for five years.  Rated Ba-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  @ EUROBONDS  Oki Electric Industry Co. (Japan) -- $300 million of bonds due Sept. 11, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4% coupon at par, via Yamaichi International Europe Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 2, 1989, through Sept. 7, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Sept. 1.  Toho Rayon Co. (Japan) -- $100 million of bonds due Sept. 21, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Daiwa Europe Ltd. Guaranteed by Fuji Bank.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 5, 1989, through Sept. 7, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug 31.  The U.S., sensing the time is right for a reconciliation between Argentina and Britain, is nudging them to try to mend their fences.  Washington helped persuade Argentina and Britain, which fought a 10-week war in 1982 over the Falkland Islands, to discuss their bilateral relations in recent meetings in New York.  The two countries are now set to hold further talks in Madrid in October, which may lead to a restoration of diplomatic relations.  Previous bilateral talks stalled because Britain is unwilling to discuss Argentina's claim to sovereignty over the islands -- which Latin Americans usually call the Malvinas -- and other smaller British island possessions in the South Atlantic.  But the recent negotiations are continuing because both sides agreed to the proposal of Argentina's new foreign minister, Domingo Cavallo, that the issue of sovereignty should "be placed under an umbrella" -- or left to one side -- at least until the two countries have restored relations.  On Friday, in a further conciliatory gesture to Britain, Argentina said it wouldn't this year submit its annual motion to the United Nations calling on Britain to negotiate the future of the islands.  After the war, Argentina won increasing support for this motion from the international community, but in the past two years that backing has dwindled a little, perhaps because it seemed to have little effect on the impasse between the two countries.  The time is ripe for some restoration of Anglo-Argentine relations, as both nations have their own particular reasons for wanting them to improve.  In recent interviews, Mr. Cavallo has said that Argentina's new government is eager for better relations with Europe and the international community, particularly now when his country is wrestling with difficult economic problems.  In the past, Britain has caused problems for Argentina in international organizations such as the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank, according to U.S. and Argentine officials.  The support of these institutions is important to Argentina's attempts to come to grips with its economic problems, and particularly to secure further international loans.  Argentina also would like to gain better access to the rich fishing grounds near the Falkland Islands.  Britain has maintained a 150-mile exclusion zone and fishing limit around the islands since the 1982 conflict.  Britain, for its part, has long wanted Argentina to declare an end to the hostilities, which the Latin American country has never done.  Some analysts expect that such a move would be the quid pro quo for removing the 150-mile exclusion zone.  However, the fishing limit would still pose a thorny problem.  Under current British regulations, even if the exclusion zone were removed, Argentine ships would have to obtain licenses to fish in the area.  But acquiring such a license would require Argentina to recognize -- at least implicitly -- British sovereignty over the islands.  An improvement in Anglo-Argentine relations probably would help Britain's relations with other Latin American countries, and could well reduce the high costs that Britain pays to fortify the islands against possible future conflicts.  Even the Argentine military has reasons for wanting to reach an accommodation with its former enemy.  "They want more access to arms and spare parts," said a senior Latin American official.  The Argentine Navy has been starved of spare parts for its British-built ships, and would like to regain access to suppliers in the U.K.  Meanwhile, the Argentine army believes better relations with Britain could result in its receiving a greater share of Argentina's military budget.  Currently, the budget channels more resources to the Navy, which would be the country's main force in any further potential struggle for the islands.  If relations with Britain improve, more funds might be diverted to the Army, which would be the country's prime force in any potential falling out with Chile, Argentina's other likely foreign adversary.  Argentina and Chile have long disputed their extreme southern border near Tierra del Fuego, the southernmost tip of Latin America.  Washington's interest in all this is that it doesn't like to see conflict between two important allies.  The 1982 war placed the U.S. in a difficult position.  The disclosure that it had provided some satellite intelligence to the British distanced the U.S. from Argentina and other Latin American countries that passively supported the Argentine attempt to seize the islands.  The U.S. also hopes that an improvement in relations with Britain could help Argentina rebuild foreign trade and investment.  Ameritech and the Communications Workers of America reached tentative agreement on contracts to end a two-week strike.  The telephone services concern said agreements were reached over the weekend with Ohio Bell, Wisconsin Bell and Ameritech Services.  Details weren't disclosed.  The CWA, however, has said the union members don't plan to return to work until agreements have been reached with the three other Ameritech telephone companies -- Illinois Bell, Indiana Bell and Michigan Bell.  The CWA represents about 40,000 workers at Ameritech, which is based in Chicago.  Meanwhile, Nynex Corp. and its unions scheduled bargaining sessions for Wednesday morning -- the second scheduled meeting since their strike began three weeks ago.  The CWA, which represents about 40,000 Nynex employees, and the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, which represents about 20,000 separately agreed to resume talks.  At Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic Corp., negotiations on local matters with the CWA in Pennsylvania and Delaware continued.  The company also scheduled a bargaining session with the IBEW in New Jersey, where the union represents about 9,000 New Jersey Bell workers.  The CWA, which represents about 41,000 Bell Atlantic employees, has reached tentative agreements on local issues with Bell Atlantic phone companies in New Jersey, Maryland, Virginia, West Virginia and Washington, D.C.  Photos from the Voyager 2 spacecraft showed evidence that the Neptunian moon of Triton may have bizarre frozen geysers that spew nitrogen crystals and organic compounds 20 miles high.  Laurence Soderblom, a scientist at the U.S. Geological Survey, said Voyager photos of ice fields near the southern pole of Triton show dozens of crevices, which may be "continuous geysers."  He suggested that they resulted from liquid nitrogen forming maybe 100 feet underground and pushing its way upward in spectacular eruptions of ice particles and gas.  The eruptions could push organic material, carbon-based compounds which apparently coat parts of Triton, many miles northward.  Even Mr. Soderblom seemed dazed by the notion.  "It's a crazy idea, it's probably wrong, but it's the best we have at the moment," he said at a press conference at the Jet Propulsion Laboratory, which manages the Voyager project for the National Aeronautics and Space Administration.  Over the next few days, Voyager scientists will comb through other photos showing Triton against the backdrop of space to see if they can detect any volcanic plumes.  If the geyser discovery can be confirmed, Triton would become only the second place besides Earth known to have active volcanic eruptions.  The Jovian moon of Io, photographed by Voyager 2 and its sister ship, Voyager 1, is alive with volcanoes and geysers spewing hot sulfur gases more than 100 miles high.  Triton is turning out to be one of the oddest and most beautiful objects in the solar system.  Just a few days ago, at a distance of two million miles, Voyager photos showed Triton to be an icy snowball with patches of red organic material and unknown bluish stuff.  But as the spacecraft soared closer and closer, eventually brushing past Triton at a height of 23,600 miles Friday morning, the moon turned out to be a place of surprising complexity.  Some parts of Triton resemble frozen lake beds; others deep pools of organic sludge; still others look like enormous snowfields crisscrossed by tracks -- windswept channels perhaps.  Watching the photos, scientists on Voyager's imaging team, responsible for interpreting the thousands of photos taken by the craft, were flabbergasted.  "Triton looks different from anything we've ever seen," said Tobias Owen, a planetary scientist from the State University of New York at Stony Brook and a member of the imaging team.  "It's a good setting for a Lucas movie."  The sharpest photos of Triton came back early Friday morning and early Saturday morning.  Sleepless scientists spent the better part of the evenings munching on take-out pizzas, processing photos for the next morning's news conference and cracking jokes.  One researcher poked his head into a work area holding a potato.  "I found N2," he said, referring to one of the six new Neptunian moons that Voyager discovered.  But wisecrackers turned solemn in the face of Voyager's sharpest photos of Triton.  The photos, which took four hours and six minutes to reach Earth from Voyager, appeared suddenly on a computer screen, showing remarkable detail.  A technician electronically grabbed each photo and put it on a separate terminal, which can magnify and enhance the image, exposing hidden detail.  Imaging-team members call the terminal the "Ooh-ah machine."  At 4 a.m. EDT Friday, shortly after the closest approach to Triton, imaging-team scientists instantly began theorizing about the features appearing on the screens.  One scientist swore he saw "cryovolcanoes" -- bizarre volcanoes that squeeze tons of ammonia-streaked ice onto the surface.  Another was sure he saw erosion caused by wind.  One enlargement showed what looked like clover-shaped pools.  "That's one of the weirdest things I've ever seen," marveled Carl Sagan, the Cornell University astronomer and best-selling author who is a member of the imaging team.  One of Triton's greatest mysteries is what energy could possibly have produced its geologic diversity.  Mr. Soderblom, who presented the ice-geyser theory, said solar energy and radioactive decay of Triton minerals could produce enough heat to drive the eruptions.  For its first billion years or so, Triton literally may have been a ball of fire.  As Edward Stone, Voyager project scientist explained it, Triton may have been an object sailing through the solar system several billion years ago when it strayed too close to Neptune, came under its gravitational influence and started orbiting the planet.  The heat caused by this event may have been enough to keep Triton molten for one billion years and to provide enough power to sculpt many of the diverse features on the planet's surface.  Voyager 2's fly-by of Neptune also has raised continuing questions about Neptune's rings.  Before Voyager came close to the planet, astronomers hypothesized that Neptune might be surrounded by arcs that only partly encircled it.  That's because a few times when Neptune passed in front of a star, astronomers noticed that the starlight dimmed when one side of Neptune passed, but not when the other side did -- leading to suggestions that Neptune's rings didn't reach all the way around.  As Voyager closed in on Neptune, early photographs showed evidence of the partial rings, which would have been the first such sightings in the solar system.  But as Voyager passed behind the planet and took photos into the sun, the additional backlighting showed that the rings fully encircle the planet.  The rings may be oddly shaped, though, with bulky matter in one part, and scant material in another, giving astronomers a new mystery to unravel.  Voyager's encounter with Neptune and Triton is officially scheduled to end tomorrow with a wrap-up news conference.  But the ship, already 2.8 billion miles from Earth, will continue searching for the edge of the solar system, called the heliopause.  That's the point, expected anywhere between 4.5 billion miles and nine billion miles from the sun, at which the so-called interstellar medium -- the gas and dust between stars -- overpowers charged particles from the sun.  Voyager 2 has enough power to run its instruments until about 2020, giving the craft a sporting chance to make one final discovery before its signal goes cold.  When Congress passed the Marriage Fraud Act in 1986, the goal was to protect the country from the growing number of immigrants using marriage as a ploy to obtain their green cards.  But now there are signs that the law may have exceeded its intent by creating a trap for immigrant women.  Many of these women say they must endure abuse by their husbands while waiting the two-year period required for permanent residency.  They fear reprisal if they complain: Without the husbands' support of their residency applications, the wives risk deportation.  Since 1986, immigrants have been marrying American citizens at an annual rate of about 130,000.  During the same period, immigration lawyers, family counselors and shelter operators have noticed a sharp increase in the number of battered and abused immigrants who feel caught in the situation.  A 30-year-old Chinese woman in San Francisco says she finally left her husband after months of abuse.  Repeated beatings and her husband's disregard for their infant son's health finally drove her to leave their home.  "He bring the spray for ants," she says, recalling an incident when she hadn't cleaned the bathroom.  "He spray my face."  To obtain permanent-resident status, the law requires that a marriage last for at least two years.  Ninety days before their second anniversary, the couple must submit a joint petition to change the conditional status to permanent residency.  But if the application isn't filed with the U.S. citizen's signature, the law says the immigrant spouse is subject to deportation.  "They are at the mercy of their spouse for a variety of reasons other than the abuse," says Charles Wheeler, National Center for Immigrants' Rights director.  The husband typically controls the finances, and the wife must defer to him for money.  Besides financial clout, the husband has the ability to deport his wife, "a powerfully coercive threat," says Douglas Schoppert of the Legal Assistance Foundation in Chicago.  But the present law has many defenders.  Congress passed it after hearing testimony from scores of American women who claimed they were jilted by foreign men seeking only a green card.  "The door was so wide open, Congress felt it had to find a way to close it," recalls Verne Jervis, spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service.  Others are skeptical of the marriage-trap thesis, speculating that the situation may not be as serious as the immigrants claim.  Says Sen. Alan K. Simpson (R., Wyo.), former immigration subcommittee chairman: "Battered nag maybe."  "The basis for {the current law} is to assist the American citizen," Sen. Simpson adds.  "The original intent was not to help the alien, but the American citizen."  Even so, such agencies as the Coalition for Immigrant and Refugee Rights and Services in San Francisco have counseled dozens of marriage-trap victims.  In one case, a Chinese woman's husband had abused her for almost two years and repeatedly threatened not to sign the petition.  Pregnant with her second child, she delayed filing for a divorce for fear of losing custody of the children.  Counselors say many women stay in the marriage in hopes that their husbands will sign the petitions.  But many others, unable to endure the abuse, run away to a shelter, and still others already face deportation proceedings.  The law "creates a chilling effect," says Rodel Rodis, a San Francisco immigration attorney.  The problem seems to affect Asian women more than other immigrants.  And the growing number of "mail-order bride" businesses, most of which target Third World countries, aggravates the situation more, says Janet Noodleman, National Coalition for Domestic Violence director.  The law encourages "the whole aspect of wife shopping," she says.  The law provides that if the woman can prove "extreme hardship," or if she files for a divorce before her husband, the INS may grant a waiver to allow her to remain in the country.  The INS says it received more than 3,700 waiver applications from married immigrants in the first half of this year, compared to only 108 for all of last year.  Rumblings about the law have reached Capitol Hill.  Rep. Louise Slaughter (D., N.Y.) introduced legislation in June that would lift the joint-petition requirement -- provided the immigrant can prove mental and physical abuse as well as a bona fide marriage.  But some supporters of the current law say it's too early to tell whether the law has done more harm than good.  For now, Mr. Jervis of the INS contends, U.S. policy addresses "the greater evil."  Michael Milken allegedly arranged for his children to make millions of dollars from warrants that were meant solely for purchasers of Storer Communications Inc. preferred stock, according to individuals familiar with the government's investigation of Mr. Milken.  Mr. Milken, former head of junk bond operations at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., purchased on behalf of his three children, all of whom were minors, about 40% of the warrants intended to be used to induce investors to buy slow-selling securities of Storer, according to the individuals.  The warrants were owned through the Milken children's stake in MacPherson Partners, a limited partnership whose major asset was Storer warrants.  The warrants were issued in late 1985 in connection with Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.'s acquisition of Storer.  Drexel's junk-bond department, then run by Mr. Milken, sold about $1.47 billion in securities to finance KKR's acquisition of Storer.  Individuals familiar with MacPherson said that unlike other partners in MacPherson, Mr. Milken's children didn't have to buy preferred securities to get the Storer warrants.  People familiar with the investigation said that Mr. Milken may have violated his fiduciary duty to KKR by failing to disclose to the leveraged buy-out concern that his children would end up owning and profiting from the Storer warrants.  A spokesman for KKR declined to comment on the matter.  Mr. Milken may also have violated his fiduciary duty to his own employer, Drexel, if he failed to offer the firm the opportunity to profit from the warrant purchases.  KKR is understood to have believed that the warrants were issued primarily to entice investors to buy certain preferred shares of Storer that were considered difficult to market.  The warrants were sold to MacPherson through Drexel for about $5 million.  The aggregate exercise price of the warrants was $139 million.  A spokesman for Mr. Milken said: "The facts will show that Michael Milken has done absolutely nothing wrong.  This story is another false accusation by an unnamed source and is another of the continuing false leaks to The Wall Street Journal.  Both the leaks and the printing of those leaks is unfair and irresponsible."  Government investigators are focusing on an arrangement under which Mr. Milken used MacPherson to, in effect, pay off some customers to induce them to buy hard-to-market Storer securities.  Some of Drexel's largest junk-bond customers are understood to have bought large quantities of the preferred securities.  In exchange, these customers were given the opportunity to participate personally in MacPherson.  Some of these customers were fund managers who may have violated their fiduciary duty by failing to disclose their personal ownership of warrants to investors.  Neither Drexel nor KKR was understood to have known about MacPherson Partners -- nor the Milken family's participation in it -- until recently.  MacPherson is said to have been established by Drexel's high-yield bond department in Beverly Hills, Calif., at Mr. Milken's direction.  The limited partnership was apparently set up without Drexel's knowledge or consent.  "Without addressing this particular situation and the facts related to it, compliance and other controls instituted by Drexel management over the past year ensure that any such events cannot again be repeated," a Drexel spokesman said.  In a 98-count indictment in March, Mr. Milken was charged with racketeering, conspiracy and fraud.  Several of the charges are related to Drexel's role in the Storer buy-out.  Mr. Milken is charged with buying and selling Storer common on the basis of inside information Drexel had because it was acting as KKR's adviser.  New charges cannot be brought against Drexel as a result of the firm's prior agreement to plead guilty to six felony counts.  Charges in relation to the Storer warrants could be brought against Mr. Milken and certain Drexel clients.  The summer doldrums dropped on a machine tool industry already dragged down by an uncertain auto industry, pushing July orders 25% below a year earlier.  Most producers expect at least a seasonal upturn by next month, but few expect a strong fourth quarter.  Many factories close for a week or two during July, and key decision makers frequently take vacations in August, limiting orders during those months.  July orders at U.S. machine tool plants dropped to $190.9 million from $255 million a year earlier and were down 21% from June's $240.7 million, said the Association for Manufacturing Technology, a machinery producer trade group.  And the American Machine Tool Distributors' Association said July orders for its members fell 17% from a year earlier.  The distributors sell imported as well as U.S.-made machines.  The distributor group publishes an order index, but not dollar totals.  Machine tools are complex machines used to shape metal parts, and are an indicator of spending for factory machinery.  Both producers and distributors say the outlook for the remainder of the year is uncertain, with decisions on some auto plant equipment programs likely to be deferred into next year.  "We saw a slowing of orders beginning in April, and May, June and July were slow," said Robert J. Siewert, president, Monarch Machine Tool Co., a Sidney, Ohio, maker of lathes and machining centers.  "But activity picked up this month, and September seems likely to be another fairly good order month.  I hope it isn't just a flash in the pan."  On the other hand, Cincinnati Milacron Inc. had "an excellent order month in July," but orders in August are down significantly, said Daniel J. Meyer, president of the nation's largest machine tool maker.  He doesn't expect the slowing economy to seriously cripple manufacturing investment, but fourth-quarter orders probably will be lower than a year ago, he conceded.  "Business is booming" for Ingersoll Milling Machine Co., Rockford, Ill., "but it is coming in big chunks," said Edson I. Gaylord, chairman and president.  The company may go for weeks without sizable orders, and then get a huge order, he said.  "But the programs we're working on are moving ahead," he added.  Machine tool orders turned up in mid-1987, and during 1988 U.S. machine tool plants booked an average of nearly $300 million a month in new business.  The 1988 total was boosted by auto company orders for equipment to make engines, transmissions and other drive train parts for redesigned 1991 and 1992 model cars.  However, this past spring auto makers began reappraising their plans, and machine tool orders fell to a monthly average of $220 million for the past four months.  Lower auto sales are part of the problem, machine tool officials say, but also U.S. auto makers are taking another look to make sure they will be producing the right cars in the 1990s.  Federal fuel economy regulations will be tighter than the auto companies expected a year ago, and it has become increasingly clear that the influx of Japanese-owned plants will create surplus capacity in the U.S. auto industry.  Meanwhile, Mr. Siewert said producers of construction machinery, oil field equipment concerns, automotive suppliers and the U.S. Navy recently ordered machines from Monarch.  "Ordering is pretty general, which we find encouraging," he said.  Cincinnati Milacron also had "a pretty good mix of customers" in July, including aerospace and general industry companies, and some automotive business, Mr. Meyer said.  July orders for lathes, machining centers, milling machines, grinders, boring mills and other machines to shape metal by cutting were $133.4 million, the Association for Manufacturing Technology said, down 29% from $187 million a year earlier.  Orders last month for metal-forming presses and other machines to shape metal with pressure totaled $57.6 million, down 15% from the year earlier's $68 million.  Because of sizable order backlogs going into the year, shipments continue to be relatively strong.  Last month's shipments totaled $238.3 million, up 27% from $187.7 million a year earlier.  At the end of July, the backlog of unfilled orders totaled $2.13 billion, down 8.3% from a seven-year high of $2.32 billion at the end of February, but still 17% above a year earlier.  ---  @ July 1989 June 1989 July 1988  @ Comparative new orders for metal-cutting machines:  @ Domestic ...... $112,300,000 $123,050,000 $167,550,000  @ Foreign ....... 21,050,000 35,800,000 19,450,000  @ Total ......... 133,350,000 158,850,000 187,000,000  @ Seven month total for 1989: $1,195,450,000; for 1988: $1,529,750,000.  @ Metal-forming machine orders:  @ Domestic ...... $43,350,000 $72,850,000 $53,800,000  @ Foreign ....... 14,200,000 9,000,000 14,150,000  @ Total ......... 57,550,000 81,850,000 67,950,000  @ Seven month total for 1989: $487,250,000; for 1988: $535,700,000.  @ Comparative shipment of metal-cutting machines:  @ Domestic ...... $156,000,000 $199,950,000 $126,150,000  @ Foreign ....... 20,150,000 35,750,000 8,550,000  @ Total ......... 176,150,000 235,700,000 134,700,000  @ Seven month total for 1989: $1,235,850,000; for 1988: $791,900,000.  @ Metal-forming machine shipments:  @ Domestic ...... $50,550,000 $70,100,000 $43,750,000  @ Foreign ....... 11,550,000 21,750,000 9,250,000  @ Total ......... 62,100,000 91,850,000 53,000,000  @ Seven month total for 1989: $507,900,000; for 1988: $463,450,000.  For a city without a major-league baseball team, Memphis can still pride itself on having the next best thing: a piece of somebody else's.  Native son Avron B. Fogelman owns a half-interest in the Kansas City Royals.  For that and other reasons, Mr. Fogelman has become one of Memphis's leading citizens.  He is a patron of poor children, a role model for young business students, a philanthropist who has showered so much of his good fortune onto the city that a strip of local interstate was named after him.  Best of all, to many people here, he is somebody other than Elvis Presley to be proud of.  So the news that began to spread two months ago was more than merely surprising.  It was shocking.  Mr. Fogelman, once worth an estimated $120 million, is having trouble paying the bills run up by his real-estate empire.  The 49-year-old apartment conglomerateur is missing payments on about $60 million in unsecured loans, according to bankers and securities analysts.  Lenders and suppliers are demanding immediate payment on bills and promissory notes ranging from $25,000 to $2 million.  As real estate goes, Mr. Fogelman's is a smallish empire, ranked 11th among the nation's residential builders.  And Mr. Fogelman's net worth hardly puts him in Donald Trump's league.  That doesn't make his trouble a minor-league matter.  Some people here believe he is the reason the president of Tennessee's biggest bank resigned under a cloud several weeks ago, and the state's second biggest bank ended up with an unheard-of loss in the second quarter.  Mr. Fogelman is definitely the reason why some lawyers from New York's Citibank, his largest creditor, plan to descend on Memphis next month.  He is also the reason why there is much talk here of late that the Kansas City Royals could wind up with some pinstriped bankers helping manage the team.  The whole affair "has been a blow to the financial community," says Molitor Ford, chairman of Commercial Bank & Trust Co. in Paris, Tenn.  "Few people in Memphis have the presence, reputation or clout of Avron Fogelman."  A Memphis businessman complains: "The only time you see Memphis in the national news is when something bad happens: race riots or Martin Luther King's assassination.  This is another failure."  The news came to light in July in Securities and Exchange Commission filings by three real-estate limited partnerships of which Mr. Fogelman is a general partner.  The partnerships had raised more than $250 million from investors since 1982.  The filings disclosed a "liquidity problem" in the "Fogelman organization" -- his partnerships and affiliates, including a holding company called Fogelman Properties Inc. of which he is sole owner.  "Adverse developments," the filings said, had "substantially decreased" the organization's net worth, and it was discussing debt restructuring.  Translation: The money wasn't coming in fast enough to pay the debts, and something had to be done about it.  About the same time, three Tennessee banks announced that they had increased their loan-loss reserves in the second quarter, largely vaporizing their earnings for that period.  The president of one of the banks, First American Corp. in Nashville, resigned the day the reserve action was announced.  The bank won't comment.  The former president didn't return repeated phone calls.  Neither First American nor the other banks -- First Tennessee Corp. and Union Planters Corp. in Memphis -- mentioned Mr. Fogelman by name or now acknowledge any lending to him.  They did cite bad loans to a "Memphis developer."  People here have little doubt that the developer is Mr. Fogelman, whose problems have become the talk of the town.  Mr. Fogelman himself will discuss his problems only in a general way with a reporter.  "I have a lot of pride," he says.  "I had to admit to the banks that there was a problem," he adds without identifying the banks.  "It hurt deeply."  Officials at Fogelman Properties decline to discuss the company's relationship with lenders.  The largest of his creditors, Citibank, issued a letter of credit guaranteeing the repayment of $50 million in bond debt for a Memphis apartment project built by Mr. Fogelman in 1985.  At least 20% of the apartments are reserved for low- and moderate-income tenants.  Under the arrangement, Mr. Fogelman is responsible for repaying the debt.  If he cannot meet his payments, Citibank can make them from a reserve fund established for this purpose.  But Mr. Fogelman must replenish the reserve fund within 30 days or the bond issue will default.  Now Citibank's lawyers, as well as lawyers representing Mr. Fogelman, are asking the Memphis Health, Education and Housing Facility Board to waive that requirement.  That would allow Citibank to tap the reserve fund without forcing the bond issue into default if Mr. Fogelman can't immediately replenish it.  The Fogelman and Citibank lawyers will meet with the board's lawyers in Memphis next month to discuss the matter.  To some people here, Mr. Fogelman's troubles simply show what can happen when a developer strays too far from home.  "In this case the grass was greener underneath his feet," says Dick Hackett, mayor of Memphis.  Mr. Fogelman had expanded well beyond Tennessee.  An SEC filing disclosed that two of his newest projects, the Pointe Royal Apartments in Overland Park, Kan., a Kansas City suburb, and the Westmont Apartments in St. Louis, had piled up losses of about $3.1 million by May 31.  The Pointe Royal Apartments are a $22.7 million, 437-unit complex that Mr. Fogelman began about two years ago, at the end of a three-year building boom that had brought 40,000 new apartments to the Kansas City area.  The apartment glut has kept developers from getting their projected rental revenues.  Soft markets in North Carolina, Florida and Texas, where Mr. Fogelman has built other apartments, have shrunk cash flow there, according to an SEC filing.  Nor did the grass stay much greener at home in Memphis, where Mr. Fogelman got his start.  He has more than 3,500 apartments here.  Because of the large supply in Memphis, developers have been able to obtain only meager rent increases for the past two years.  As his business expanded, Mr. Fogelman's attention to detail and penchant for perfection may have slipped a bit.  He was known for working 80-hour weeks and personally inspecting such details as the trimming of hedges outside his Memphis apartment buildings, a former staffer says.  Monday mornings would bring a rash of memos to "associates," as he calls his employees, to correct the deficiencies he found.  But trimmed hedges were the least of his problems at Country Squire, his 972-unit complex on the east side of Memphis.  Renters there have complained of fungus that blanketed the outside walls and leaks that soaked the inside of their apartments.  Mr. Fogelman, contrite, says he is trying to repair things.  "I've worked too hard for too many years for that to happen," he says.  Increases in interest rates in 1987 and 1988, and the Tax Reform Act of 1986, have hurt Mr. Fogelman as well as other real-estate developers.  The law has denied investors much of the tax benefit they previously enjoyed in limited partnerships, making it harder for developers to raise fresh cash.  Last summer, Mr. Fogelman paid $32 million for five golf courses at Hilton Head, S.C. -- where he once docked his 70-foot yacht -- intending to resell the courses to a private investment partnership in a $37 million offering.  Investors weren't interested in buying into the partnership, the offering was dropped, and Mr. Fogelman is still trying to peddle the courses.  The courses, says Mr. Fogelman, "are just too much for us to hold onto right now."  All together, Mr. Fogelman has built or acquired more than 12,000 apartments in Florida, Tennessee, Texas and the Midwest.  He got his start in his family's apartment business, founded by his Polish immigrant father, in 1962.  Occasionally he has strayed from real estate, dallying in Wendy's franchises and local sports teams.  His $2,000 investment in the minor-league Memphis Chicks baseball team yielded $2 million when he sold the club last year.  In 1983, he paid $11 million to buy into the Royals, fulfilling a childhood dream of owning a big-league ball team.  He has always had time and money for Memphis.  He has served as president of the Chamber of Commerce, financed college scholarships for needy children -- "Fogelman Scholars" -- and, with his brother Robert, gave more than $2 million to Memphis State University's business school, which graciously became the Fogelman College of Business and Economics.  Last year, the Tennessee senate named a stretch of interstate in Memphis the "Avron B. Fogelman Expressway." (Mr.  Fogelman's troubles aren't expected to jeopardize the Fogelman Scholars program, whose funds are administered by a private foundation.  A spokesman for the foundation says the funds that Mr. Fogelman has contributed are irreversibly under its control.)  Now, in a squat office building that shares a strip of busy Poplar Avenue with a nearby McDonald's and a Midas Muffler outlet, Mr. Fogelman is trying to shore up his holdings and his reputation.  He concedes that his vision was flawed.  He saw the Fogelman organization as an integrated developer with architectural design, construction, property management, financing, syndication, collection and insurance services under one roof.  "No company in the real-estate industry has been able to provide all those services in one shop," he says.  "I was trying to."  The idea might have worked, but the real-estate market didn't cooperate.  The slowdown has forced Fogelman Properties to lay off 100 employees, fully 25% of its work force in Memphis.  It is exploring the sale of its headquarters building as well as the golf courses.  "We cut back on aspects of the company concerned with growth," says Mr. Fogelman.  "Now, we're more concerned about protecting what we have."  Some people in Memphis question Mr. Fogelman's ability to protect his ownership in the Royals.  They speculate that his troubles might force him to sell his interest -- or his bank creditors to seize it.  The value of his interest is estimated at $40 million to $50 million, a plum in a portfolio crowded with depressed real estate.  Mr. Fogelman "has a cash-flow problem," says Elizabeth Roy, a securities analyst at Morgan Keegan & Co. in Memphis, and "the Royals are a source of cash."  Mr. Fogelman, who has collected more than 80 baseballs signed by Hall of Famers, including Babe Ruth, denies any intention to sell.  As for the possibility that bank creditors might attempt to seize his interest in the team, he says, "I don't see how a bank can be involved in ownership of a baseball team.  It's a pretty close-knit fraternity."  There is precedent, however.  An NCNB Corp. bank in Texas has acquired an interest of about 10% in the Dallas Cowboys as a result of a foreclosure proceeding.  And owners of other teams have sometimes used their interests as loan collateral.  Mr. Fogelman acknowledges that banks have questioned him about all his assets, including his stake in the Royals.  But, he says, "It's never been stated that, 'You've got to sell it,' or 'How do we get hold of it?'" He holds an option, expiring at the end of 1991, to buy the other half-interest from Ewing M. Kauffman, founder of Marion Laboratories.  Mr. Fogelman's troubles helped put him in a hospital recently to be treated for an ulcer.  But he seems confident of surmounting the financial troubles without losing the Royals.  "I think I've gone through the worst of it already," he says.  "As they say, 'This too shall pass.'"  Two months ago, Neco Enterprises Inc. said it would be "in the best interests of the company to diversify."  And diversify it has -- by acquiring much of the personal portfolio of its chief executive officer and majority shareholder, David F. LaRoche.  During the past two weeks, Neco, a Newport, R.I., utility holding company, has purchased from Mr. LaRoche $20.5 million of real estate and some $800,000 of stock in financially troubled Home Owners Savings Bank, Boston.  Such purchases are allowed under federal securities laws if properly disclosed and conducted at "arm's length" from insiders.  Some Neco holders, however, charge that the purchases smack of self-dealing by Mr. LaRoche, who reportedly has been financially overextended by heavy investments in Home Owners that went sour.  Says Peter Homans, a Boston broker who locked horns with Mr. LaRoche over his Home Owners investment: Neco "got him off the financial hook and financial muddle he's in.  I can't imagine it's allowed to happen."  A spokesman for the Securities and Exchange Commission declined to comment on whether the SEC is investigating Neco's purchases of Mr. LaRoche's assets, but did say that "they are the kinds of transactions that bear close scrutiny" by the commission.  Mr. LaRoche is a Providence, R.I., millionaire known before his dealings with Neco for investing in bank takeover situations in New England.  In March, he was named Neco's chairman and chief executive officer after a three-year fight to gain control of the company, the parent of Newport (R.I.) Electric Corp.  John Natalizia, Neco's executive vice president, asserted that Neco's purchases from Mr. LaRoche were bargains for the company.  In particular, he added, Vermont real estate Neco acquired from Mr. LaRoche for about $18 million could "conceivably double or triple in value three, four or five years from now."  Mr. LaRoche, who couldn't be reached for comment, earlier asserted that the course he has charted for Neco benefits its shareholders.  But during and after his takeover fight with the concern, its stock has declined.  Mr. LaRoche acquired much of his 53% Neco stake in a $26-a-share tender offer two years ago.  Last year, he blocked the proposed acquisition of Neco by UtiliCorp United Inc., Kansas City, Mo., at $22 a share.  In March, when Mr. LaRoche was named chief executive, Neco's stock traded as high as $18 a share.  On Friday, it closed at $14.625 a share, down 25 cents, in composite trading on the American Stock Exchange.  Before assuming control of Neco, Mr. LaRoche sought a shareholder resolution prohibiting the company from buying goods and services from any persons with which a Neco director is affiliated.  Soon after he took control, Neco purchased a building in Providence, R.I., from David M. Ryan, a Neco director associated with Mr. LaRoche.  Before the building purchase, Mr. Ryan joined Mr. LaRoche in an investor group that said it was considering taking Home Owners private, according to a 1987 SEC filing by the group.  Mr. Ryan also borrowed $200,000 from Mr. LaRoche's sister, Carolyn McElroy, to make purchases of Home Owners' stock.  Mr. Ryan couldn't be reached for comment.  Several Neco shareholders said they are worried that the assets Mr. LaRoche has sold Neco may not be good investments.  "If he thought they were such good investments, why did he sell them to Neco?" questioned Jerrold Ruvin, a broker with Butcher & Singer Inc., New York, who handles Neco stock for four of its holders.  Neco's real estate purchases from Mr. LaRoche include an $18 million stake in Vermont's Quechee Lakes development, which has been sued by bank creditors for defaulting on loans.  At least one of the suits, by Marble Financial Corp., Rutland, Vt., is still outstanding.  Neco's Mr. Natalizia said the dispute with Marble involves "minor amounts relative to the value" of Neco's Quechee investment and that efforts are under way to resolve the suit.  Moreover, he asserted, Neco purchased the Quechee assets below their market value.  Neco holders also questioned the company's purchase of Home Owners stock, which has performed poorly during the past year.  Home Owners traded between $8 and $10.50 a share in January; Friday it closed in composite trading on New York Stock Exchange at $5.50 a share, up 62.5 cents.  Neco said earlier that it paid $5 to $6 in convertible debentures for the Home Owners stock it bought from Mr. LaRoche.  "We bought the Home Owners stock at rock bottom and think it's a reasonable position to take to make a profit," Mr. Natalizia said.  Mr. LaRoche's Home Owner's stake has been a financial albatross around his neck.  He purchased some of his former 9.9% stake in the Boston savings bank at more than $20 a share.  During the past two years, Home Owners' stock plunged under heavy pressure from short sellers, who asserted the concern inflated its assets with accounting gimmicks.  Meanwhile, Mr. LaRoche, who had bought much of his Home Owners stock with borrowed money, on margin, was forced to sell waterfront property and mortgage his 60-foot yacht to meet margin calls on the stock.  Mr. LaRoche's plans to sell some of his assets to Neco were disclosed in March when the company's former chairman, Richard B. Sheffield, and former president, L. Eugene Rankin Jr., resigned, partly because of their opposition to the plans.  "It's unbelievable to me to see {Mr.  LaRoche} walk away with the assets" of Neco, said Mr. Rankin, who added that he still owns a small stake in the concern.  "It just doesn't make sense at all."  Avis Europe PLC's acceptance of a friendly takeover offer represents a step toward possible reunification with the car-rental company's former U.S. parent.  Avis Europe, spun off from Avis Inc. nearly three years ago, recommended Friday that shareholders accept a takeover offer from Cilva Holdings PLC.  The offer of 600 pence ($9.43) a share values all of Avis Europe at #896.5 million ($1.41 billion).  Cilva would pay #591.7 million for the 66% of Avis Europe it doesn't already control.  Cilva, a holding company set up to make the offer, is 8.8%-owned by Avis, Garden City, N.Y. Lease International S.A., a Luxembourg holding company that owns 24.8% of Avis Europe, holds 64.7% of Cilva.  General Motors Corp., which supplies cars to Avis, owns the remaining 26.5% of Cilva through its General Motors Overseas Corp. subsidiary.  Avis owned Avis Europe until November 1986.  At that time the U.S. company floated 66% of Avis Europe on the London Stock Exchange to help reduce debt arising from a management-led leveraged buy-out of Avis.  The U.S. company later sold much of its remaining stake in Avis Europe to Lease International, which in turn is owned by D'Ieteren S.A., a Belgian car-leasing concern, and General de Banque, a Belgian commercial bank.  Avis now owns just 8.6% of Avis Europe.  But relations between the two Avises have remained friendly since the London flotation, with the companies sharing a world-wide reservation system and some joint marketing activities.  If completed, Cilva's takeover might eventually unscramble the complex sell-off of Avis Europe.  In a joint statement Friday, Avis Europe, Avis and Lease International said they believe there are "strong commercial reasons why Avis Inc. and Avis Europe should be reunited."  In a telephone interview, Ken Hanna, Avis Europe's finance director, said the advantages would include more-effective global marketing strategies and joint development of costly technical systems.  He insisted, however, that it's "absolutely impossible to speculate" on a timetable for a possible reunification.  Avis Europe announced last month that it might receive a takeover offer.  But Cilva's offer price exceeded traders' expectations.  It represents a 34.8% premium over Avis Europe's share price before last month's announcement, and is more than 20 times Avis Europe's per-share earnings for the year ended Feb. 28.  The company's shares soared 25 pence Friday on the London Stock Exchange to 585 pence each.  Despite the steep price, London analysts suggested Avis could benefit handsomely from closer ties to Avis Europe.  Business travel is booming across Europe, as the European Community moves toward a unified internal market in 1992.  Avis Europe, which operates in 14 European countries and claims a leading 15% market share in car rentals, has thrived on that travel boom.  "Avis Europe has been a very good cash generator," said Peter Caldwell, an analyst at London brokers Smith New Court.  A merger would give Avis "access not only to the European market but to good cash flow."  In the two completed financial years since its flotation, Avis Europe has had 27.9% compound growth in per-share earnings.  The company had pretax profit of #72 million on sales of #623.3 million in fiscal 1989.  Per-share earnings were 29.3 pence.  Smith New Court forecasts Avis Europe's pretax profit will rise 18% to #85 million this year.  Although the U.S. rental-car market is divided among a handful of giants, the European industry still includes several medium-sized companies unable to serve international travelers.  Mr. Caldwell expects Avis Europe to bolster its market share at the expense of those smaller competitors.  "As the industry polarizes, business will go to the bigger companies," he said.  "There's an increasing market for pan-European people."  When NBC broadcasts a two-part prime-time special on racial attitudes next week, it will be making two gambles: The network will be asking people to watch a show that will test whether they're racists, and it will use new live polling technology to get the answers.  "The R.A.C.E.," which stands for racial attitudes and consciousness exam, will use an electronic system to conduct a live poll of studio audiences in four cities across the country.  When asked a question, people in the four groups will punch their replies into hand-held devices with microprocessors.  In five seconds, their responses will be gathered and converted into charts and graphs.  Quickly, host Bryant Gumbel will know, say, how many respondents would be bothered by having a black boss.  Not only that, Mr. Gumbel will be able to compare responses in Jackson, Miss., with those in Los Angeles, New York or Milwaukee. (Each audience is selected to be demographically representative of its city.) Or he can break down answers by sex, age group or political affiliation.  If the show takes an unexpected turn, he can interject a new question.  Viewers at home won't vote electronically, but they will be able to see how they compare with the studio audiences.  In the ratings wars, the networks are grabbing for any edge that pulls in viewers, and NBC is trying out an evolving interactive technology whose uses are still being invented.  One of the companies furthest along with the technology is Quick Tally Systems, which is applying it to market research, corporate meetings and other fields.  A Los Angeles television station, KCBS, used the company's hand-held devices last week to measure racial attitudes among a group of Los Angeles high school students of different races.  MTV recently employed Quick Tally in "MTV's Big (Blank) Show," in which a studio audience decided by vote whether certain segments would be a comedian, music video or other selection.  But NBC's show, to appear Sept. 5 and 6, will be the first use of Quick Tally to gather data from more than one location, and the company is still working frantically to get all the technology to mesh.  Satellite technology can already assemble a handful of individuals from around the globe to argue an issue on shows such as ABC's "Nightline."  But Eli Bleich, the former television producer and political media consultant who founded Quick Tally, is trying to allow a much larger group of scattered people to register their opinions collectively and quickly, making for unpredictable, highly topical television.  "You get an instant snapshot of a group's opinions, but it can also turn into a conversation," says Mr. Bleich.  "If the responses are really unexpected, the host can say, 'Are you meaning this the way I take it?  What if you were in this situation, what would you do?'" A person operating a laptop computer during the session can instantly program in a new question and set it up for graphics.  "We've never tried anything quite like this before, and either it'll work or it won't," says Paul Greenberg, the show's co-producer at NBC with Mr. Gumbel.  NBC also took a national poll on racial attitudes to which it can compare the live results, and if the hardware doesn't work NBC can rely on the other poll.  To make the quiz more visual, NBC will show video segments of everyday situations that have racial aspects.  Members of the four studio audiences will slide a knob on the side of their handsets -- up if they like what they see, down if they don't.  As the short video is replayed, viewers at home will see a graph superimposed on the screen showing what images turned people off or on.  "If this is successful, it may produce very useful serious research," Mr. Greenberg says.  "If it works on the level of good television, we'll probably try other things."  ABC, meanwhile, will broadcast its own documentary on race tomorrow night, called "Black in White America."  Ray Nunn, executive producer of the ABC show, says of the Quick Tally technology, "I wouldn't want to dismiss it out of hand" and adds that he is "intrigued by the possibilities."  To complaints that NBC's electronic quiz is a gimmick that turns the program into a game show, Mr. Bleich of Quick Tally responds: "The game-show aspect isn't necessarily bad, if it gets people at home actively involved," he says.  "Public affairs shows just don't attract the audience of 'Miami Vice,' but if there are techniques that work from other genres, why not use them?"  Erik Sorenson, general manager of KCBS, says, "I don't think this technology has unlimited application on television, but with the right format, it's great.  Our show with black, white, Latino and Oriental kids on racism would have been great anyway, but the technology makes it 30% better.  If somebody says, 'There's more racism now than 10 years ago,' you might hear cheering in the studio audience, but how do you know that it isn't a vocal minority?"  Mr. Sorenson says he thinks the technology can help ratings.  For example, 5% of Los Angeles TV households tuned into the KCBS show on racism, a much better rating than most public-affairs shows.  Quick Tally has been developing the technology for more than a decade.  In the late '70s, Mr. Bleich's political consulting firm ran seven televised "town meetings" in Alaska at which hundreds of locals voted on how they wanted the state's oil revenue to be spent.  The company has begun marketing the technology to ad agencies, Hollywood studios and the TV networks to help track audience reactions to new commercials and television series.  The company is still losing money from development costs, and the technology's potential has increased the number of competitors.  In the future, classrooms may use the hand-held devices, says Mr. Bleich: "A teacher can conduct a quick oral quiz, and if the kids do badly, can review the material again."  Assuming that the NBC experiment of multiple sites proceeds smoothly, Quick Tally will apply the technology to corporate teleconferences.  The next breakthrough: devices that will poll home viewers, too.  International efforts to save the African elephant from extinction threaten to put Hong Kong's ivory carvers and traders out of business, industry officials say.  Since June, the U.S., the European Community and Japan have banned ivory imports, stripping the Hong Kong industry of its three major export markets.  The government of this British colony suspended ivory imports in June.  An international conference set for October could lead to a world-wide ban on ivory trade.  Hong Kong is a major center for ivory carving.  About 1,000 craftsmen are employed to whittle the tusks of African elephants into traditional Chinese figures, jewelry and tourist gewgaws.  The colony also is heavily engaged in trading ivory, and conservationists accuse some traders of encouraging poaching of elephants in Africa, which they say is the major reason for the rapid reduction of herds.  According to a recent study by the Ivory Trade Review Group, there are 625,000 elephants left in Africa, half the number of a decade ago.  The group estimates that at the current rate of decline, the elephant will be extinct in 10 to 15 years.  "The prospects are very grim," says David Western, director of Wildlife Conservation International, a division of the New York Zoological Society.  Mr. Western recently visited Hong Kong and Japan, along with other members of the Ivory Trade Review Group, to hold seminars on the status of the elephant and on Asia's prominent role in the ivory trade.  The review group was established by the World Conservation Union, and its study was funded by Wildlife Conservation International, the World Wide Fund for Nature and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.  Critics say the study is biased, but others consider it to be the most complete survey of Africa's elephant population in eight years.  Its bleak findings and outlook helped persuade individual EC countries and the U.S. to impose total bans in June.  The 12-nation EC formally banned ivory imports last week.  Japan, the world's largest consumer of ivory, said in June that it would only import ivory directly from Africa's producing countries.  Conservationists don't expect Japan to impose a complete ban on imports because of its own large community of carvers and strong demand for traditional ivory products such as chops and chopsticks.  The Ivory Trade Review Group calls Hong Kong "the center of the world's ivory trade."  In 1988, according to Hong Kong government figures, the colony imported 264 metric tons of raw ivory, valued at HK$190 million (US$24.4 million).  Singapore, another prominent middleman in the ivory trade, was the main source of the imports, accounting for 112 tons.  Less than half of Hong Kong's ivory imports come directly from Africa.  Belgium and other European countries with former colonial ties to Africa are major suppliers of imported ivory.  Very little of the ivory imported in Hong Kong stays in the colony; domestic retail sales are only a small part of the export-oriented business.  Hong Kong exported HK$248 million in worked ivory in 1988.  The colony also exported 115 tons of raw ivory, valued at HK$157 million, in 1988, with Japan the main importer.  Hong Kong's suspension of imports wouldn't immediately hurt the local industry, providing it can find export markets.  Colony traders, carvers and retailers are sitting on a huge stock of legally imported ivory -- an estimated 500 tons of raw ivory and 170 tons of worked ivory with a total value variously estimated at US$100 million to US$400 million.  A government survey is under way to produce a clearer inventory.  What happens to this stock may depend on the October meeting in Switzerland of the Convention on the International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora, known as Cites.  The 102 member nations in Cites will decide whether to place the African elephant on Appendix I of its protected-species list, beginning in January.  That would prohibit trade among member nations in ivory and other products made from the African elephant, such as elephant-skin shoes.  The Asian elephant is already listed on Appendix I.  While international conservation groups such as the World Wide Fund and Friends of the Earth support a total ban on trade in elephant products, African countries are sharply divided on the question.  At a preliminary conference on the elephant held last month in Botswana, southern African states, which have a better record of managing their elephant herds than central and East African states, argued that a total ban on ivory trade would penalize them.  They want an exemption from any Appendix I listing.  But conservationists and African states supporting a total ban say that southern African states serve as conduits for smuggled ivory and that smuggling would increase if those countries aren't included in the ban.  The southern states, including South Africa and Zimbabwe, and the Hong Kong industry also argue that the Ivory Trade Review Group's study is biased because its researchers focused on blighted East African states, and Kenya in particular.  As a result of the Botswana meeting, another review of the elephant population is now being conducted jointly by Cameroon and Canada.  The two countries will make their report to Cites in October.  Not surprisingly, Hong Kong's ivory industry opposes the Appendix I listing.  Lee Chat, chairman of the Hong Kong and Kowloon Ivory Manufacturers Association, says that "transferring the elephant to Appendix I will only end legal trade in ivory; it won't stop illegal trade."  His view is shared by others, who fear that an outright ban on legal trade will only cause ivory prices to rise and poaching to increase.  Conservationists charge that 80% of all ivory traded began as poached ivory and was made to appear legitimate by being smuggled or bribed through several intermediate destinations.  If Cites should decide to place the elephant on Appendix I, the Hong Kong industry wants some type of dispensation to allow for the trade in existing stock.  "If they will allow us to sell the existing stocks, it will permit a gradual retirement for the workers," says Dominic Ng, manager of Nathan Ivory Factory Ltd.  Most carvers are older men, he says.  The Hong Kong government also will ask Cites for relief for the local industry.  The government's suspension of raw-ivory imports is contingent on the outcome of the October meeting.  "We support in general terms the upgrading of the elephant to Appendix I, providing we can dispose of existing stocks," says Tony Clark, principal assistant secretary for economic services.  David Melville, a conservation officer with the World Wide Fund in Hong Kong, says the organization might go along with a plan to let the colony's ivory companies sell existing stock over a set period of time, provided the government imposes stricter controls on the stock.  What conservationists fear is that unscrupulous local merchants would enlarge their stock through smuggling.  Mr. Melville suggests that the government could monitor supply levels by establishing a bonded warehouse to house all privately held ivory.  Both the government and industry are opposed to the idea and say the government-mandated inventory should be sufficient protection.  Japan stands to gain from Hong Kong's dilemma, Hong Kong traders and conservationists say.  In announcing that it would only import ivory directly from Africa, Japan eliminated its usual Hong Kong middlemen.  Japanese ivory carvers also will benefit from not having to compete with imported products from Hong Kong.  Even if Cites places the elephant on Appendix I, conservationists and Hong Kong traders expect that Japan will take out a "reservation" that allows it to continue to import ivory to supply a traditional craft.  Japan used similar cultural arguments to justify whaling, despite protests from environmentalists.  Southern African states also are expected to take out reservations to continue exporting to Japan.  "Japan is being incredibly clever," says a conservationist.  "They may well end up with a monopoly on the ivory trade."  Indeed, there is already concern in the Hong Kong ivory trade that with the U.S. and European markets already closed, Japan could end up as the only consumer nation willing to buy the bulk of local stock, and would likely get it cheap.  To counter that possibility, Hong Kong plans to lobby European countries to see if they would buy part of the local stock.  Since joining Cites in 1976 and beefing up colony laws, Hong Kong's reputation on the treatment of endangered species has improved greatly.  But there are a few ivory traders who reputedly are major figures in the poaching business.  "There are companies who are involved in illegal trade," concedes Mr. Lee of the ivory manufacturers association, "but they operate outside Hong Kong."  Whatever the outcome of the current controversy, Mr. Ng of Nathan Ivory says Hong Kong ivory carvers are as committed to conserving the elephant as anyone.  "We have only one material to work with, so our concern for the elephant is deep."  A couple of years ago freight service on the Delaware & Hudson Railway was so slow and erratic that shippers nicknamed the railroad the "Delay & Hesitate."  The financially troubled 1,200-mile line in New York and Pennsylvania has operated under the protection of the bankruptcy court since June 1988.  And it still suffers from dilapidated track, costly union contracts and few customers.  But that apparently isn't going to stop at least three different railroads from bidding for the D&H when the bankruptcy trustee puts the rail line on the auction block.  Officials of Delaware Otsego Corp., Guilford Transportation Industries Inc. and the rail unit of Montreal-based CP Ltd. say they may place bids to buy the Delaware & Hudson.  In addition, Francis Dicello, trustee for the bankrupt carrier, said he's received inquiries from several other concerns that might bid for assets of the Delaware & Hudson.  The bidding deadline is Friday, but Mr. Dicello is seeking to extend that deadline until Sept. 25.  Two of the potential bidders are well-versed in the Delaware & Hudson's problems and possibilities.  Delaware Otsego, Cooperstown, N.Y., has been operating the Delaware & Hudson on an interim basis since the bankruptcy filing.  And closely held Guilford, North Billerica, Mass., operated the line prior to its filing under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code and remains one of the line's largest creditors.  Under Chapter 11, a company is protected from creditor lawsuits while it tries to work out a plan to pay its debts.  Potential bidders believe the Delaware & Hudson "could be a profitable addition to their railroads or are afraid its addition to someone else's railroad might hurt them," said Patrick Little, a partner in A&L Associates, a railroad consulting firm in Cambridge, Mass.  By some guesses, cash bids for the Delaware & Hudson are likely to range from $15 million to $45 million.  The outcome is important to shippers who say the Delaware & Hudson provides at least limited rail competition to Philadelphia-based Consolidated Rail Corp. in the Northeast.  "Competition from the Delaware & Hudson tempers Conrail's rates and in some cases, motor-carrier rates," said Richard Aumiller, transportation manager of a unit of Agway Inc., a Syracuse, N.Y., agricultural cooperative.  Mr. Aumiller estimates that absent competition from the Delaware & Hudson, rail rates in the Northeast for many commodities would rise 20% to 25%.  The Delaware & Hudson's tracks extend to Albany and Binghamton, N.Y., and Sunbury, Pa., from Montreal.  The line also has trackage rights on Conrail that allow its trains to reach Buffalo, N.Y., and Washington.  Some potential buyers have dropped out.  Rail industry executives said Conrail feared opposition from shippers, government officials and other railroads worried about a loss of rail competition in the Northeast.  Conrail officials said the railroad decided not to bid but declined to comment further.  Canadian National Railway Co., Montreal, also looked at the Delaware & Hudson before deciding it wouldn't be a bidder.  A spokesman for Grand Trunk Corp., a Canadian National subsidiary, said the Canadian National already owns several rail routes into the U.S. and "didn't need another connection."  But CP Rail, a unit of CP Ltd., said it is considering a bid for the Delaware & Hudson, its main connection to the U.S. market.  "Keeping the Delaware & Hudson alive is an important part of protecting our revenue base in eastern Canada," said Robert Ritchie, an executive vice president of CP Rail, which would seek to expand the Delaware & Hudson's north-south rail traffic.  Potential bidder Delaware Otsego currently operates cross-country container trains to New York connecting with the Delaware & Hudson and other railroads.  Walter Rich, Delaware Otsego's chief executive officer, said he would substantially boost container traffic over the Delaware & Hudson in competition with Conrail and truckers if he becomes the line's buyer.  As interim operator of the Delaware & Hudson, Mr. Rich has received financial and operational support from rail giants Norfolk Southern Corp., Norfolk, Va., and CSX Corp., Richmond, Va.  Neither CSX nor Norfolk Southern, which had owned the Delaware & Hudson before selling the line to Guilford in 1984, plan to place bids for the railroad.  A bid by Guilford is likely to meet resistance.  The Delaware & Hudson was a Guilford unit when it filed for bankruptcy law protection in June 1988.  Prior to that service on the line had deteriorated, reflecting labor-management strife.  Shippers along the line say service has improved under interim operator Delaware Otsego.  "Giving the Delaware & Hudson back to the leadership that gave it the deep six would be a colossal mistake," said William Withuhn, transportation curator of the Smithsonian Institution in Washington.  Guilford officials say the only reason they put the Delaware & Hudson into bankruptcy-law proceedings was that an arbitrator's decision prevented Guilford from transferring the railroad to a unit with lower labor costs and fewer union restrictions.  Guilford previously slashed labor costs at the Maine Central and Boston & Maine, its other rail units, by leasing them to its low-cost subsidiary.  Guilford said the arbitrator's decision preventing it from doing the same with the Delaware & Hudson has since been reversed.  Kevin Sharer's new office at MCI Communications Corp. doesn't have a desk.  It does have a long, narrow shelf that holds his computer and a telephone, but not much else.  "I don't believe in desks," says Mr. Sharer, who is MCI's new senior vice president for sales and marketing.  Instead, he says, he does his best thinking at his circular table -- or on the road.  Since Mr. Sharer became MCI's chief marketer four months ago, he has applied his unorthodox approach to revamping more than the office formerly used by Vice Chairman Orville Wright.  Indeed, Mr. Sharer says he has "tried to make marketing a more line-focused function."  To that end, the 41-year-old alumnus of General Electric Co., McKinsey & Co. and American Telephone & Telegraph Co. has reorganized the marketing sector's management and put special emphasis on what he calls "alternate-channel marketing."  The concept involves forging alliances with American Airlines, American Express, Amway, Sears, Visa and others who sell or offer tie-ins with MCI long-distance services to their own customers.  "I think we should grow our alternate-channel business more rapidly than it has grown in the past," says Mr. Sharer.  He speaks of channels -- telemarketing, for example, is a channel to the consumer market -- with all the enthusiasm of a corporate Shirley Maclaine.  Since Mr. Sharer arrived, the company also had started to target the data-transmission market as an important growth area.  He picked an outsider, Don Heath from Xtra Soft Inc., a California software company, to head MCI's data-marketing push.  A graduate of the U.S. Naval Academy in Annapolis, Md., with a background in aeronautical engineering, Mr. Sharer peppers his conversation with military allusions.  "It's not always the guys with the most men on the battlefield who take the day," he says, referring to MCI's competition with giant AT&T.  Later he explains: "If you study business and warfare, the principles that are important are absolute."  "He's very aggressive," says Ronald Spears, president of MCI's Midwest division, who worked with Mr. Sharer at AT&T.  "Kevin will fit in fine in our culture."  Another close friend, MCI's chief financial officer, Daniel Akerson, was at the Naval Academy and at AT&T with Mr. Sharer.  MCI caught Mr. Sharer between moves with GE.  He had been president of GE American Communications, a satellite subsidiary, and was set to move to GE's jet-engine business in Cincinnati.  He was getting ready to begin that assignment when MCI made him an offer he didn't refuse.  Bert Roberts, MCI's president, says he had been looking for an executive to run the strategic side of the marketing operations, but hadn't launched a formal search.  When Messrs.  Akerson and Spears recommended Mr. Sharer, Mr. Roberts eagerly called him.  "Ron Spears is West Point, and West Pointers don't necessarily volunteer that Annapolis guys are great," Mr. Roberts explains.  One of Mr. Sharer's biggest challenges will be maintaining MCI's rapid growth.  Revenue jumped 30% last year to $5.14 billion and is continuing its double-digit climb this year.  He credits MCI senior vice president Stu Mencher, who is now on special assignment, with "putting a lot of the building blocks in place."  Mr. Sharer also took over much of the marketing responsibilities of executive vice president Brian Thompson, who now concentrates on MCI's future development.  "The strategy MCI adopted two years ago is fundamentally the right strategy," Mr. Sharer says, referring to MCI's plan to compete against AT&T in all market segments.  Nevertheless, he says, the right strategy "doesn't mean we don't have tactical opportunities or emphasis opportunities to do better."  By rearranging management, he has set up two avenues for corporate marketing to attack problems: products and market segments.  Three top managers concentrate on products, with one responsible for long-range strategy and technology.  Another three head up each of MCI's main market segments: consumer, general business and large business and government accounts.  MCI's autonomous regional divisions provide an additional approach.  On the product side, Mr. Sharer says, the long-distance business isn't one in which competitors "will be able to create a sustainable advantage based on products alone" because new services can be duplicated quickly.  "But if you can figure out a way to continually have six-month leads, then the product-development effort becomes a sustainable advantage."  Mr. Sharer says an important goal is to forge stronger links between field offices and headquarters.  Even when his "new guy routine" is old hat, he says he plans to spend two or three days a month meeting with MCI salesmen to gather suggestions on what customers want and what MCI could do better.  Mr. Sharer doesn't believe in a desk-bound staff, either.  He recalls with amusement the time he literally locked the office doors and dispatched all his marketing people to the field for three days.  Mr. Sharer says he even plans to print up signs for himself and his subordinates with novelist John le Carre's line: "A desk is a dangerous place from which to watch the world."  Turner Broadcasting System Inc., as expected, said it is restructuring about $1.4 billion of debt.  The cable programmer, which borrowed $1.3 billion of high-interest notes to buy MGM/UA Entertainment Co. from Kirk Kerkorian three years ago, said it registered $900 million of various types of debt securities with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the restructuring.  It said it will swap those securities, along with about $500 million from a credit facility being negotiated with a group of banks, for $1.3 billion of its long-term debt.  It said it will also redeem its special issue of Cable News Network preferred shares, which have an annual interest rate of 11.5% due to rise to 21.5% in 1991.  The exact interest rates of the newly registered notes haven't been determined, the company said.  But analysts said the new rates should be lower than Turner's current borrowing costs.  "They have been planning for some time to refinance," said Mary L. Kukowski, an analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co.  "This particular package is quite likely to shave a couple of percentage points off of their current interest costs."  Turner Broadasting is moving while the company is hot.  Its Class A stock has skyrocketed in the past year, from a 1988 low of $7.50 a share to a close of $53.875 a share in American Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, up 25 cents.  And although its shares have fallen about 15% in value in the past two weeks due to profit-taking, analysts said, its outlook is strong.  It recently reported its first quarterly profit in more than three years, thanks to strong results at its three main cable channels: CNN, WTBS Superstation and Turner Network Television.  "At this point, the interest-rate environment is pretty positive, and people are positive about Turner's prospects," said Ms. Kukowski.  A giant offshore natural gas field discovered by the Soviet Union in the Arctic last year is probably the richest ever found, a Norwegian newspaper reported.  A new well drilled to assess the Barents Sea find showed it could be several times larger than Norway's Troll Field, previously the biggest-known offshore deposit, reported the newspaper, Stavanger Aftenbladet.  Researchers from Norway's private Fridtjof Nansen Institute told the newspaper that they learned details of the find during a visit to Moscow's Academy of Science.  The newspaper said the information was confirmed by other Norwegian sources.  The field holds an estimated three trillion to four trillion cubic meters of natural gas, compared with the 1.3 trillion cubic meters at Troll, Aftenbladet reported.  The field is in the Soviet-controlled eastern Barents Sea, at about 74 degrees north latitude, said the report.  Rep. Barney Frank (D., Mass.) could face a House ethics inquiry after admitting that he paid for sex with a prostitute and then hired the man as a personal aide.  Some of Mr. Frank's House Democratic colleagues could ask the House Ethics Committee to begin the investigation to prevent Republicans from taking the initiative, according to House Democratic aides.  House rules call on members to "act at all times in a manner which shall reflect creditably on the House."  Mr. Frank, who is homosexual, said he had hoped to lead Steve Gobie, 32 years old, away from prostitution to a better life.  Mr. Frank, 49, said he fired the man 18 months later when he suspected that Mr. Gobie was using Mr. Frank's Capitol Hill apartment for prostitution.  In a news conference in Boston, Mr. Frank acknowledged that he wrote letters to Mr. Gobie's probation board on his behalf, hired a lawyer for him and paid for court-ordered psychological counseling.  Mr. Gobie has been convicted of a variety of drug and sex-related charges.  Taiwan agreed to let the U.S. monitor its use of driftnets to fish in the North Pacific, but an equivalent accord between the U.S. and South Korea remains elusive.  The accord will enhance the ability of U.S. authorities to prevent illegal catches and to enforce certain guidelines for the use of driftnet equipment.  Driftnets used by Asian fleets are intended to catch squid, but they are also known to entrap seals, dolphins and seabirds, as well as valuable salmon stocks.  Under the accord with Taiwan, the U.S. Coast Guard will be authorized to make unannounced boardings of Taiwanese driftnet vessels to monitor their driftnet fishing activities.  In addition, Taiwan agreed to install location-fixing devices on all its driftnet vessels by 1990 and to bar its fleets from entering certain fishing areas at certain times to avoid unauthorized salmon catches.  Taiwan also vowed to undertake a "credible" effort to enforce its own marine conservation rules, according to a statement issued by the American Institute in Taiwan, the unofficial body that conducted the talks with Taiwan on behalf of the U.S. government.  The agreement averts potentially ruinous U.S. sanctions against Taiwan's fisheries exports.  President Bush would have been authorized to bar all or part of these shipments if Taiwan missed today's statutory deadline for reaching such an accord.  South Korea still faces the threat of similar sanctions.  Korean fisheries negotiators broke off talks with the State Department last Friday and weren't scheduled to resume these discussions earlier than tomorrow.  The State Department won't say what's holding up an accord with South Korea.  However, a U.S. negotiator said Taiwan's example, combined with a possible White House statement warning of the consequences of noncompliance, could prod Seoul into concluding an agreement.  South Korea stands to lose all or part of its $250 million in annual fisheries exports to the U.S. if an agreement isn't reached.  Taiwan's equivalent trade amounts to $370 million a year.  Japan, the Pacific's other driftnet-fishing nation, agreed on June 23 to allow U.S. observers aboard its driftnet vessels and to test the use of transmitters on these boats so that their location can be more easily determined throughout the fishing season.  Austin O. Furst Jr. has trimmed 50 pounds from his hulking 6-foot-5 frame in recent months.  But it isn't the walking and jogging that got his weight down to a svelte 215.  "I'm on a high-stress diet," he says.  Mr. Furst is founder and chairman of Vestron Inc., the once-booming videocassette company that is locked in a struggle to survive.  He has personally guaranteed a $25 million loan that must be repaid from his bank account if Vestron bellyflops.  His 85% ownership of the company has plunged in value by over $300 million to $85 million since he took Vestron public in 1985.  Now, one year after Vestron hit it big with the hip-grinding romancer, "Dirty Dancing," Mr. Furst has dismantled his dream of becoming a major force in movie-making.  Investment bankers are searching for a fire-sale buyer or a partner for his company.  Vestron's money-losing, 81-store video chain is on the block.  And the company is tangled in a nasty lawsuit with Security Pacific Bank Corp. over the bank's backing out of a $100 million credit agreement.  Vestron blames that setback for all of its troubles.  How this once hot company got into such a mess -- and the unlikely prospects for coming out of it intact -- is a story of hard times in the video business, even as consumer demand soars.  Booming demand has been Vestron's blessing, and its curse.  It prompted the big movie studios to start their own video-distribution businesses instead of using middlemen like Vestron.  The top seven firms, all owned by major studios, control over 60% of video sales.  Rights fees have soared for the few good films that are up for grabs.  Video stores have swelled to 30,000 -- too many for mom-and-pop stores to easily survive -- yet they all seek the same two dozen top titles, not a broad selection.  Wholesalers that resell tapes to the stores are in a shakeout, too, and several have sued Vestron for cutting off their supply.  But Vestron's decline also is a tale of its own bad luck and poor timing, its own miscues and a seemingly smart strategy that went awry.  Even the 45-year-old Austin Furst, known in the video biz as two-fisted, intense and at times confrontational, concedes the company he created may well be taken from him.  "I'd rather see the company triumph in somebody else's hands than see it fail," he says.  "But I'd rather see it triumph in my own hands, of course, if I had the choice."  He probably doesn't.  The video market barely existed in 1981, when Mr. Furst left his job running Time Inc.'s film-making unit.  He took a second mortgage on his home and arranged $2 million in other financing to buy the Time-Life library of 200 videotapes.  Only a few million homes had videocassette recorders, compared with about 60 million now.  Movie studios were happy to let the upstart handle what seemed like a sideline business.  "He left Time-Life when nobody even knew this was going to be a business," says William G. Barker, chief financial officer of CBS/Fox Video Inc., a Vestron rival and a joint venture of CBS Inc. and Fox Inc.'s film studio.  Today, "virtually everybody of any stature in the movie business has their own video distribution."  Vestron, based in Stamford, Conn., grew to more than $100 million in sales within three years.  It doubled in size in the three years after that.  But Mr. Furst fretted over the rising video competition from movie makers such as Twentieth Century Fox Film, Paramount Pictures Corp. and even Orion Pictures Corp., one of his first suppliers.  He decided Vestron had to get into the movie business to ensure its own stream of titles.  Vestron set an audacious development budget of more than $100 million.  Mr. Furst proudly hailed his plans to acquire 40 or 50 new films and distribute them to theaters across the U.S.  This would be a cheaper way of landing video rights, which often produce as much revenue as a movie's theater run.  Rights fees have soared to $10 million for a top film from $1 million or so in 1982.  The company also made a few movies of its own.  "Dirty Dancing" boogied into theaters in 1987 and grossed $160 million plus another $160 million in videocassette sales.  That helped Vestron peak at almost $335 million in revenue and more than $20 million in net income for 1988.  But it masked weaknesses in strategy and finance that would prove damaging.  One problem was the niche Vestron chose.  The video market has polarized into blockbuster hits that cost $20 million and more to make and cheapie, B-grade movies like "Hollywood Chainsaw Hookers" that cost peanuts but earn a profit; they're so bad they're good.  VCR viewers, and hence stores, want huge hits most; a store gets 60% of its revenue from just two dozen or so of the best-known releases.  But Vestron shunned big-budget "pix" and eschewed schlocky-but-profitable turkeys.  It aimed to make or distribute small $5 million movies, hoping to reap video sales thereafter.  "The problem is they made movies in a price category that got hurt badly as far as 'B' movies go," says Glenn A. Greene, president of Media Entertainment Inc., one of Vestron's few independent rivals.  While Vestron a year ago ranked No. 4 in the market with 7.8% of all sales and Media was No. 11 with only a 3.7% share, this year they flip-flopped.  Vestron fell to No. 11 and its share was sharply lower at 4.3%, and Media ranked No. 8 with 5.8% of the $1.4 billion in video sales through the first half, according to the trade publication Video Week.  The decline was accelerated by Vestron's own cockiness in the wake of "Dirty Dancing."  It stopped competing for video rights to independent films, confident its own supply of movies would work.  Most of them didn't: John Huston's "The Dead" was moribund, "Earth Girls Are Easy" flopped.  "So now they're kind of stuck," says Lisa Lilienthal, Video Week's managing editor.  Disappointment turned to dire straits when Vestron's teetering cash position collapsed.  Last year, sure that Security Pacific's $100 million in financing was on the way, Vestron freely and unwisely ran through its cash reserves.  It spent $20 million alone expanding its loss-laden stores at a time when the country was cluttered with outlets.  But last October the bank balked, alarmed that a $24 million cash cushion Vestron had projected for year end had turned into a $20 million deficit.  That derailed plans for as much as $100 million in other financing.  Other banks wouldn't step in.  For this, Vestron has sued in federal court in California, alleging breach of contract, fraud and defamation.  Security Pacific declines to comment.  Now Mr. Furst has few options left.  He folded the film operation that was his strategic centerpiece, firing its 140 employees and swallowing a $65 million loss in the second quarter.  Some 15 unfinished films now may never get seen.  Even if Vestron can survive as merely a video distributor, it would have to trim even more fat, firing many of the 400 employees it has left.  To scrape for cash, Vestron has sold off the new film "Little Monsters," and video rights to "Weekend at Bernie's" and other new titles.  And Mr. Furst is losing sleep over his $25 million guarantee on a short-term loan that keeps Vestron afloat.  He made $42 million for the company's first four years, paid to him as a special dividend when Vestron went public in 1985.  If he has to cover the loan, "we get chewed up pretty badly," he says.  But he accepts no blame for Vestron's ills and says that, given the chance, he'd make the same risky moves again: trying to beat the big studios at their own game, expanding video stores in a glutted market, and running through all his cash before new loans were in the bank.  This stubbornness may be why he won't get that chance.  "Our one big mistake," he says, unrepentant, "was picking a bank that let us down."  Foreign investors are showing more interest in U.S. over-the-counter stocks, thanks to relaxed trading rules and easier access to information about the issues.  The market value of OTC stocks held by foreign investors rose 64% from the end of 1985 through the first quarter of this year, according to the National Association of Securities Dealers, which oversees the Nasdaq system for trading OTC issues.  In the same period, the number of positions, or stakes in individual OTC stocks, rose 9.6%.  "Foreign institutions are now learning that to have a totally representative portfolio in U.S. stocks, they really should be participating in the small and medium-capitalized stocks," says Joseph R. Hardiman, president of NASD.  But the Nasdaq market hasn't completely conquered its foreign-relations challenge.  Some investors still consider OTC stocks too obscure, and many turn their noses up at small-company issues.  Alain Adam, a managing director of Furman Selz Mayer Dietz & Birney in London, says New York and American stock exchange issues remain the first choice of foreign investors.  "The broader averages {of large stocks} have performed so well there hasn't been a need to go into a smaller sphere" of small-capitalization issues, Mr. Adam says.  Still, says Jack Conlon, executive vice president in charge of the equity division for Nikko Securities Co. in New York, even a small increase in overseas investment in OTC stocks is significant.  "The fact that it's occurring at all is telling, because historically the interest wasn't in OTC stocks," he says.  A reduction of international barriers to investment in the U.S.'s OTC stocks has helped boost such activity.  Canada recently dropped restrictions on how much its pension funds could invest in stocks not traded on a formal exchange.  West Germany is expected to take similar steps in October, Mr. Hardiman says.  The Tokyo Stock Exchange, the world's largest exchange, recently announced it would list qualifying U.S. OTC stocks.  Previously, OTC stocks were barred because they weren't listed on a formal exchange in the U.S.  Even though the majority of Japanese trading in OTC stocks occurs in the U.S., the Tokyo listing is important, Mr. Hardiman says.  "It is a recognition of the quality of the NASD market," he says.  "They are saying NASD will be treated on a parity basis with the New York Stock Exchange."  But it wasn't so much demand from foreign investors as requests from U.S. companies that caused the Tokyo exchange's action.  U.S. companies can't raise capital in Japan unless they are listed on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  The inability to gain that listing was one of the reasons cited by two banking corporations, First Union and National City, for leaving Nasdaq within the past two years and moving to the New York Stock Exchange, an NASD official says.  While trade restrictions are decreasing, the flow of information about OTC stocks is increasing, making it easier to track the stocks.  The NASD holds seminars in Europe and Asia for investors who might be interested in the stocks.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. recently sent a team on a tour of European capitals to promote OTC issues.  Peter DaPuzzo, Shearson's head of retail equity trading, says investors were very receptive.  Foreign investors remain most interested in Nasdaq's biggest and most popular stocks, such as MCI Communications, Apple Computer and Intel.  That's because it's easier to find news and investment analysis on them, says Tom Callahan, executive vice president of U.S. equities for Yamaichi Securities Co.  "If they get into second or third-tier stocks," there may be few if any securities analysts following the issues, Mr. Callahan says, and this "makes {the stocks} difficult to follow from a long way off."  Foreign investors also may shy away from OTC stocks, especially smaller ones, because of concern that the issues might not be as liquid -- or easy to buy and sell readily -- as the bigger stocks.  "If they stay liquid, they can quickly buy and sell 100,000 shares, which isn't the case with some of the OTC stocks," Mr. Callahan says.  Recognizing that foreign investors might like professionals in the U.S. to do their stock-picking for them, T. Rowe Price Associates started its New Frontier Fund in 1985.  The fund is 85%-invested in OTC issues, specializes in small companies with strong growth potential and is owned primarily by foreign investors.  "These people just can't be in the flow of information that we can over here," says fund manager Debra J. Diamond, "which is why they are interested in this fund."  Other money managers say foreign investors will embrace smaller OTC stocks with more fervor than they do now when the smaller issues start to outperform the larger ones.  "I don't think they are any different than anyone who invests money," says Richard A. Bruno, managing director of over-the-counter trading at PaineWebber.  "They are looking for a business they can understand, where there is growth opportunity and the stock is well priced."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index rose 0.87 to 466.75 on skimpy volume of 126.7 million shares.  For the week, the composite rose 1%.  The Nasdaq Financial Index rose 1.45 to 463.13, while the Nasdaq 100 Index of the largest non-financial issues improved 0.85 to 441.64.  Two takeover stocks had big jumps.  Syracuse Supply surged 2 1/8 to 15 1/2 after a management group offered $16.25 a share for the company.  Bel Fuse was the biggest percentage gainer, rising 1 1/2 to 6 1/4.  Santa Monica Partners and Initio have proposed a joint purchase of the maker of electronic parts for $7.50 a share.  Several bank stocks were higher.  Merchants Bank of New York got a boost when it raised its quarterly dividend to 40 cents a share from 25 cents.  The issue was the second biggest point gainer in OTC trading, jumping 5 to 136.  Hibernia gained 1 to 23 1/4 after the banking company said it acquired all the deposits and certain assets of First State Bank.  Terms weren't disclosed.  One Valley Bancorp of West Virginia slipped 1/2 to 22 after it signed a letter of intent to acquire Farmers & Citizens State Bank, Clendenin, W.Va., for $160 a share, or an indicated $2.4 million.  Meanwhile, Colorocs improved 1/2 to 10 after it said it expects to break even on an operating basis in the third quarter because of heavy demand for its new color copier.  Net income for the quarter is expected to be 55 cents a share after a special gain.  The developer and distributor of color copiers and printers also said that in the fourth quarter, it expects to report its first after-tax operating profit ever.  The company forecasts operating earnings for the quarter of $800,000 to $1.1 million, or six cents to eight cents a share.  Ford Motor Co. said it's idling this week the assembly plant that builds the Mercury Cougar and Ford Thunderbird coupes.  The company cited the need to reduce inventories.  Ford said the week-long shutdown will idle about 2,700 hourly workers and will eliminate production of about 5,600 cars.  While temporary plant closings have become common during this year of sluggish car sales, this shutdown is the first for the Lorain, Ohio, plant in several years.  It's also the latest setback for the car line that started off 1989 winning Motor Trend magazine's "Car of the Year" award.  So far this year, sales of the two cars are running 10.5% below sales of the models they replaced last year.  Ford is saddled with bloated unsold inventories of the cars in its system.  Through July, Ford had enough Thunderbirds to handle demand for 100 days and enough Cougars to cover demand for 89 days.  Auto makers generally prefer to keep their inventories at 60- to 65-days' supply.  Having high stocks this late in the model year is especially troublesome because older models are more difficult to sell once the new model year begins in October.  The Lorain shutdown follows Ford's decision to idle its Chicago assembly plant for five workdays beginning Friday because of weak sales of the Ford Taurus and Mercury Sable sedans built there.  Until this May when it temporarily closed its Edison, N.J., plant that produces the Ford Escort, Ford hadn't idled a U.S. assembly plant in six years.  The Thunderbird and Cougar have encountered difficulties for some time.  Although the supercharged Thunderbird SC was named car of the year, Ford executives were displeased with the two redesigned models because the cars wound up hundreds of pounds overweight and $800 a car over Ford's production-cost target.  Early shipments of the Thunderbird SC and the supercharged Cougar XR7 were delayed because of problems in making a cast-iron crankshaft needed in engines with the supercharger.  Then in February, Ford resorted to diverting more than 10,000 of the cars to an amusement park lot near the Lorain factory until engineers could find the cause of and eliminate a mysterious rattle in some of the cars.  To boost sales of the two models, Ford was forced on Aug. 1 to offer heavy $1,500 rebates on all but the supercharged versions of the Thunderbird and Cougar lines.  Transamerica Corp. hopes its move into the film and television insurance business will help establish it as a "significant" player in the specialized world of sport, leisure and entertainment insurance, Gerry Isom, president and chief executive of the company's insurance group, said.  Two weeks ago, Transamerica set up an exclusive arrangement with the Albert G. Rubin Agency, a Hollywood brokerage firm that specializes in arranging insurance for the big and small screens.  All the entertainment insurance that Transamerica writes will be funneled through the Rubin agency.  Until now, there have been essentially just two companies providing insurance for Hollywood.  Fireman's Fund Corp., based in Novato, Calif., controls about 60% to 70% of the market, while Chubb Corp., Warren, N.J., claims nearly all of the remaining share.  New York-based American International Group often provides coverage for concerts, live theater, and special events.  When Mr. Isom took over Transamerica's insurance unit five years ago, one of his main goals was to move the firm away from traditional personal and commercial insurance, which are among the most cyclical areas of the insurance industry.  He wanted to provide some stable sources of earnings and improve the company's return on equity.  In 1988, 45% of Transamerica's gross premium income came from its specialty insurance lines, with 20% from personal and 35% from commercial insurance business.  Mr. Isom expects that specialty lines will provide as much as 55% of premium income in future years, with smaller shares from the other two areas.  In 1983, none of the company's premium income came from specialty lines.  "Five years ago, we were just a midsized generalist.  You can't say that today," Mr. Isom noted.  "We're specialized in just about everything that we do."  Transamerica's specialty lines include insurance protection for sports teams, auto racing, horse tracks, and state and county fairs, as well as collateral insurance for banks, assurety bonds for construction and capital projects, reinsurance and excess property and casualty insurance.  It also provides completion bonds, which guarantee that a film will be finished on time and within its budget.  Worker compensation makes up about half of Transamerica's commercial business.  The company has also trimmed back its personal insurance to 14 states from 31 five years ago.  Transamerica, which has built its sports and leisure insurance business to $100 million in revenue in about two years, is committed to accomplishing the same kind of growth for its entertainment segment, Mr. Isom said.  Although Mr. Isom didn't specify how much of an investment the company is willing to make in the entertainment area, he indicated that ample resources will be devoted to it.  The firm opened an office in Century City to handle its entertainment insurance business.  It has a staff of 10, including underwriters, claims adjusters and support staff.  Already Transamerica has landed two major accounts: it will provide insurance for Universal/MCA Studios and for a newly formed independent production company backed by Japanese investors, Mr. Isom said.  The movie insurance business has been somewhat shielded from the price wars that grip the general property-casualty business every three to five years.  Besides, new competition has stayed away from movie insurance because barriers to entry were high.  Special skills and deep pockets have been required: These days, an insurer could have as much as $75 million at risk when covering a major film.  For his part, Mr. Isom said he hopes Transamerica's move won't lead to a price war.  "We're not intent on being the cheapest" insurer, he said.  LAURENCE TRIBE, legal-authority-for-hire, has dived into another skirmish.  This time, the high-profile Harvard Law professor is working as a consultant to Hoylake Investments Ltd. in its $21.1 billion pursuit of London-based B.A.T Industries PLC. Hoylake is the Bermuda-based investor group led by the financier Sir James Goldsmith.  Since mounting the takeover in early July, Sir James has been mired in U.S. regulatory disputes involving B.A.T's insurance unit, Farmers Group Inc., that could scuttle his effort.  Regulators in nine states say state statutes give insurance commissioners the right to disapprove acquisitions of insurance companies within their jurisdiction.  And they haven't decided whether to approve Sir James's bid.  In suits filed against the commissioners, Hoylake contends that the statutes aren't applicable, for a litany of reasons.  Mr. Tribe will argue Hoylake's case on constitutional grounds.  The whole thing smacks of protectionism, Mr. Tribe said, and it "could trigger a cascade of retaliation against the U.S.  The impact for international trade is astonishing."  Armed with other constitutional arguments, Mr. Tribe recently represented former Drexel Burnham Lambert junk-bond chief Michael Milken in his fight for his 1988 compensation and Pennzoil Co. in its battle with Texaco Inc.  ---  MAY A JUDGE comment publicly on a case over which he is presiding?  That question may be answered in the appeal of a case in which the city of Austin, Texas, sued Houston Lighting & Power Co. for $419 million, alleging deceit and mismanagement in a $5.8 billion nuclear facility in which Austin is a part owner.  Last month, a jury ruled in favor of Houston Lighting, a unit of Houston Industries Inc. Austin filed a motion for a new trial, based largely on remarks attributed in newspaper stories to Clarence Guittard, a retired state appeals court judge who was brought in to hear the long-running case.  According to the published stories, the judge questioned the strength of Austin's case in comments to reporters during a break in the proceedings on March 13.  In its motion, Austin objects to Judge Guittard's quotes in the Austin American-Statesman, in which he said: "I have some serious doubts about some of the City of Austin's evidence in terms of proving damages."  The city argues that the judge's comments showed a "clear predisposition" against its case, and probably caused the jury to render an "unjust verdict."  Austin contends it was denied its constitutional right to a fair trial.  Attorneys for Houston Lighting argue that the jurors never heard the judge's comments and didn't read the newspaper articles.  Moreover, they add, the judge was simply clarifying reservations he had repeatedly expressed to attorneys in open court.  Roy Minton, an Austin-based attorney who helped defend Houston Lighting, suggested the allegations in the motion are aimed more at generating publicity than convincing Judge Guittard to grant a new trial.  "They're not interested in the judge reading it, they're interested in the public reading it," he asserted.  ---  THE MOVIE CREDITS following the feature had an unusual mention.  "Legal Services provided by O'Melveny & Myers," read a prominent credit line at the end of "When Harry Met Sally. . ."  O'Melveny, a Los Angeles firm with 450 lawyers, represents Castle Rock Entertainment, which produced the picture.  Law firms don't often get film credits, but the practice is becoming more common in independently produced films.  For O'Melveny, however, it was a debut.  Christopher Murray, the O'Melveny partner who supervises Castle Rock's work, said that when clients ask him whether he wants a credit, he always declines.  "O'Melveny is sort of too old-line," Mr. Murray explained.  "It always seemed a little ostentatious for our personal style."  Nevertheless, Mr. Murray called the "Harry" credit, which he didn't know about until the film's release, "certainly a nice thing to do."  The person responsible was Gregory M. Paul, Castle Rock's senior vice president and general counsel, and a former O'Melveny partner.  He is one of three O'Melveny alumni working at the two-year-old production company.  "It was just a gesture to the firm for the work they did, in the same way that anyone who supplies anything to a film gets a credit," Mr. Paul said.  ---  TURNED TABLES: A New York criminal defense attorney, Ivan S. Fisher, ran into some legal difficulties of his own last week, when he pleaded guilty to failing to pay federal income taxes from 1982 to 1984.  Mr. Fisher pleaded guilty to a three-count criminal information to avoid being indicted.  According to that document, he didn't pay taxes on more than $484,000 of income.  He failed to file tax returns for 1982 and filed returns but never paid taxes for 1983 and 1984.  Mr. Fisher faces a maximum sentence of three years in jail and fines of as much as $150,000.  He is scheduled to be sentenced Oct. 18.  Neither Mr. Fisher nor his attorney, James Druker, was available to comment.  Mr. Fisher, 43 years old, has been involved in a number of celebrated cases, including the "Pizza Connection" drug-trafficking trial.  ---  FIRM'S NEW TAX CHIEF: Carlos E. Kepke has joined the 51-lawyer Dallas firm of Shank, Irwin, Conant, Lipshy & Casterline as the partner in charge of the tax section.  Mr. Kepke, 50, previously headed the international tax section of the Houston firm of Chamberlain, Hrdlicka, White, Johnson & Williams.  Discovery Toys Inc., a respected distributor of educational toys, has offered a rewarding experience to a lot of kids and parents over the years.  But venture capitalist Philip Greer is disturbed that he hasn't seen the payoff.  In 1980, Mr. Greer's New York investment firm purchased a 20% stake in the closely held Martinez, Calif., company for $100,000, as well as providing some financial and consulting services at "nominal fees."  At the time, Discovery was little more than a fledgling garage start-up, toying with plenty of good ideas but not much capital.  Today, it has matured into a $60 million-a-year business with a national distributor network.  While the company strongly denies it, Mr. Greer alleges in a lawsuit that the company's chief executive and majority shareholder has "run the company as if she were its sole owner," to the financial detriment of other shareholders, including himself.  What's a minority shareholder to do?  These days, many people with modest shareholdings in small, privately held businesses know what Mr. Greer is talking about.  As with bigger companies, managers of small companies have fiduciary obligations to look out for the interests of all shareholders, small and large.  But there are aspects unique to small business that can pose some big risks for small investors.  For one thing, state and federal regulators generally ignore them.  There is also greater potential for conflicts of interest, mainly because the people running such businesses are often major shareholders, too.  "The opportunities for abuse are greater in a small corporation," says Jesse Choper, dean of the University of California at Berkeley law school and a corporate-law expert.  For instance, "the amount of somebody's salary in a giant corporation, what does it mean, a penny?  Here, it can be the whole damn profit]"  While Discovery claims he has another agenda, Mr. Greer's firm, Weiss, Peck & Greer, claims the following predicament:  In a lawsuit filed Friday in Contra Costa County, Calif., Superior Court, Mr. Greer alleges that the company's chief executive, Lane Nemeth, who has been featured in several publications on successful working women, has been using substantial corporate funds for personal uses.  While she receives bonus payments, the suit says, the company has been refusing to pay dividends to the minority holders.  Mrs. Nemeth couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Greer also contends he is having difficulty getting the company to provide him with timely or accurate financial data.  As part of his 1980 investment, he is allowed to select a watchdog to sit on Discovery's board.  But he claims in the suit that Mrs. Nemeth has detoothed the member by skewing committee assignments and taking other action without the director's input.  The company also refused to indemnify the director against lawsuits, while insuring all the other directors, he alleges.  Discovery strongly denies the charges, and alleges that Mr. Greer is trying to bully it into buying his stake at an inordinate premium.  It says it once offered to buy Mr. Greer out at a price that would have netted him roughly 25 times his original $100,000 investment.  Offering more, it believes, would be no more in the company's best interests than the abuses that Mr. Greer alleges.  It says it refused to insure the director because "we were not sure who he was" and thought he had "conflicting fiduciary duties."  "Venture capital firms often have a great deal of leverage over small companies," says Roger Mertz, a partner with the San Francisco law firm of Severson & Werson, who is Discovery's outside legal counsel as well as a director.  "They are used to having their own way."  Mr. Mertz said he hadn't seen the complaint but responded to questions about it.  One problem for small investors is that the law gives small-business owners a lot of room to make decisions -- right or wrong -- in matters of policy or strategy, including the ability to declare dividends.  One exception in the law, according to Mr. Choper, is where a majority holder decides not to pay dividends only because it would worsen his own personal tax situation.  Big stakeholders in little businesses aren't given carte blanche when it comes to salaries.  But such questions usually boil down to a battle of experts in court as to what is appropriate.  Mr. Greer says in the complaint that Peat Marwick, the accounting firm he hired, found that Discovery had booked "very substantial" payments as business-related that in fact "appeared to be personal in nature."  Discovery, meanwhile, says it has a report by another major national accounting firm, now known as Ernst & Young, refuting that corporate funds allegedly were used for personal expenses.  Minority shareholders in private companies in general may also get some help from state laws, although they vary widely depending on where you live.  California, for instance, tends to be more protective of minority rights, says Kenneth Guernsey, a corporate and securities law expert at Cooley Godward Castro Huddleson & Tatum, a San Francisco firm.  California permits small companies to bypass state corporation law and formulate their own ground rules on how minority shareholders should be treated.  The state also has cumulative voting, which may allow small holders to pool their votes and get a nominee elected to the board.  Mr. Mertz says Mr. Greer should have negotiated years ago for some of the protections he now seeks.  Sometimes, minority investors specifically contract for the right to future dividends in the event of certain events -- such as when the company reaches a certain level of profitability -- or obtain some "mechanism to have shares purchased," such as the right of registration, in which the company arranges for the public sale of the stake, according to Mr. Mertz.  But Mr. Greer says Discovery hasn't shown much tendency to live up to its bargains, citing its alleged unwillingness to allow his director to fully participate in company affairs.  His firm has invested in some 135 companies over the years and has often found itself at odds with management views.  But this is its first lawsuit.  "Sometimes you get everything you want, sometimes you don't," he says.  "In this case, life is not going on.  In this case, we feel oppressed."  The Spanish government opened the airwaves to three commercial television stations but unleashed a political storm over alleged favoritism.  The three groups receiving licenses included one backed by Italian TV mogul Silvio Berlusconi but not another linked to media tycoon Rupert Murdoch.  The licenses introduce competition for the two state-run channels that dominate Spanish TV.  But the approvals came amid accusations of government favoritism and are probably too late for the new stations to broadcast in time for the parliamentary elections due in October.  The winners of the concessions were Antena-3 Television, Canal-Plus-Socie-dad de Television and Gestevision-Tele-cinco.  Antena-3 Television has the backing of the publishers of the Barcelona-based newspaper La Vanguardia and radio station Antena-3 de Radio.  Canal Plus-Sociedad de Television is a channel grouping the French TV company Canal Plus with publisher Promo-tora de Informaciones S.A., or Prisa.  Gestevision-Telecinco is supported by the publishing company Anaya S.A. with ONCE, the Spanish organization for the blind, and Mr. Berlusconi's Fininvest.  The two losers were Univision Canal 1 S.A., backed by the Grupo Zeta magazine and newspaper group along with Mr. Murdoch's News International; and Canal C, a group formed by 25 Catalan business executives.  Cineplex Odeon Corp. said it agreed to repurchase 56 theater properties from Carena Developments Ltd. for 55.3 million Canadian dollars (US$47.1 million), removing a possible roadblock to outside bidders for the movie theater chain.  Cineplex sold the properties to Carena affiliates last year for proceeds of approximately C$51.4 million, but continued to operate the theaters.  Earlier this month, Cineplex disclosed that if its chairman, Garth Drabinsky, and vice chairman, Myron Gottlieb, left the company, Carena could have required Cineplex to buy back the properties for the higher of fair market value or Carena's capital cost of C$55.3 million plus interest.  Cineplex said it decided to repurchase the theaters because of their strong performance and renewed box-office strength in Canada, but didn't elaborate.  Analysts said the move strengthens the hand of Cineplex's committee of independent board members, now soliciting bids for the company.  "This brings the process one step closer to a sale," said Helen Murphy, an analyst with Richardson Greenshields Inc.  Ms. Murphy said the repurchase "eliminates the only real disadvantage that an outside bidder would have had in a competition with {Messrs.  Drabinsky and Gottlieb} to acquire the company.  This was a contingency which created some uncertainty, which was favorable to them over the other bidders."  Mr. Drabinsky is expected to submit an offer for the company in the next few weeks, along with other would-be buyers.  The price tag for such a buy-out could be as high as C$780 million.  Spokesmen for the directors' committee and Mr. Drabinsky couldn't be reached for comment.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange Friday, Cineplex closed at $11.50 a share, down 25 cents.  Bernard Shapiro's Aug. 11 letter, "Calculating the Root of Ignorance," was dismaying considering the writer is a mathematics professor in the Massachusetts system.  Instead of attempting to measure the past and present abilities of math students, he relies on several anecdotes or "horror stories" as he calls them.  As a member of the age group that Mr. Shapiro brands as ill-prepared to perform the simplest arithmetic problems, I found his scholarship to be lacking.  His claims that a substantial number of college students did not know that a square is a rectangle and could not multiply 1,000 by 20 without the aid of a calculator are unconvincing.  Mr. Shapiro fails to provide any basis for his claims except his 27 years of experience.  The single statistic that he forwards, that less than 60% of the 1,200 students taking a pre-calculus course passed, is also suspect.  Readers are assured that the "lecturer in the course is excellent," so the students have no excuse.  In my college experience I rarely have found an instructor who didn't know his subject.  Far more frequent is the instructor who cannot relate what he knows to his students.  And I have never known of an instance in which a professor did not find a ready defense among his colleagues when criticized by students.  I applaud Mr. Shapiro's belief that mathematics instruction is extremely important.  However, I think he ought to base his charges on evidence that is more carefully constructed than a catalog of "horror stories" from the faculty lounge.  Jon Walker  Vancouver, Wash.  Martin Marietta Corp. said it received a $1.8 billion contract from the National Aeronautics and Space Administration to produce 60 additional Space Shuttle external tanks.  The award, which provides for delivery of the tanks in the 1990s, is the second part of a procurement program that began with a $500-million award to the aerospace and defense contractor in June 1988.  Under prior awards, 52 external tanks have been manufactured.  The huge tanks, which aren't reusable, carry liquid hydrogen and liquid oxygen oxidizer used to propel the orbiter during liftoff and ascent.  The tanks will be produced by the company's Manned Space Systems unit at NASA's Michoud assembly plant near New Orleans.  When Mandy Walker of Orange County, Calif., went looking in June for basic transportation, plus a few creature comforts, she made a point of test-driving a subcompact Hyundai Excel.  "It was sluggish, kind of slow," she recalls.  Then she tried a Toyota Tercel without quite so many features, but with those most important to her -- air conditioning and an automatic transmission.  The price: $8,695, about the same as the Hyundai.  "The minute I got out on the street, I felt like I was in heaven," says Ms. Walker, who snapped up the Tercel.  Her experience says a lot about why the great Third World car threat of 1986 is turning into the big bust of 1989.  Only three years ago, cars from South Korea, Mexico, Yugoslavia and Brazil were beginning their invasion of the U.S. market, and even Japanese auto makers -- themselves earlier invaders -- were looking worriedly over their shoulders.  Cars from India, Malaysia and Romania were supposed to be next in line.  For Americans craving cheap wheels, it all seemed too good to be true.  And it was.  Third World cars sold quickly at first, but then developed reputations for poor performance, shoddy quality or surprisingly high price tags.  Japanese and U.S. car makers, meanwhile, counterattacked with rebates and other buyer incentives.  And this year, sales of small cars of nearly any sort have plunged because lenders have tightened credit to their most marginal customers.  Third World cars aren't dead, but the companies that make and sell them are trying to regroup by improving the products.  Ford Motor Co., for example, has eked out a small sales increase this year for its Korean-made Festiva subcompact by adding an automatic transmission.  Hyundai Motor Co., whose sales are running 33% behind last year's, is bringing out a roomier Excel with 20% more power than the one Ms. Walker rejected.  Still, after a profitable start, Hyundai Motor America -- the company's U.S. sales arm -- doesn't expect to make money this year and probably not next year, says H.W. Baik, president of Hyundai Motor America.  "Hyundai is not going to get knocked out of the game," says James Womack of the International Motor Vehicle Program at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.  "But the notion that they were the next Toyota was pretty naive."  So were the rosy sales projections for other Third World cars.  Consider:  -- The Yugo, launched in 1985 with much fanfare and a $3,990 base price, is on the brink of extinction in the U.S., a victim of poor quality.  The car's importer entered Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings in January.  Yugo sold only 6,411 cars in the first seven months of this year, one-third the year-earlier amount.  A company spokesman says the current Yugo is far better than the earlier ones.  -- Sales of Volkswagen AG's Brazilian-built Fox dropped 30% through July.  The car gets good marks for quality, but spiraling inflation in Brazil has lifted its base price 27% to $7,225 from the introductory price of $5,690 in January 1987.  -- Sales of the Pontiac LeMans, built for General Motors Corp. by Daewoo Motor Co., a joint venture of GM and Daewoo group, have fallen far short of expectations.  Poor quality has plagued the car.  Last December, all 1988 models were recalled to fix faulty seat-belt buckles that appeared to be latched when they weren't -- an embarrassing and potentially dangerous defect.  Heavily equipped LeManses, with price tags approaching $10,000, are the toughest to move, says Dave Miller, general sales manager of John Hine Pontiac Mazda in San Diego.  "For the same money, you can get a used car that is just a year old and twice the car as the LeMans," he says.  And these cars are the lucky ones.  Several others once promised for the U.S. market have never made it across the ocean, among them the Mahindra, an Indian-built version of the Jeep CJ; the Oltcit, a Romanian-built hatchback similar to the Yugo; and the Proton Saga, a Malaysian-built compact.  The U.S. market seemed particularly ripe in 1986 for imported budget cars.  Trade restrictions limited Japanese imports, and the strong yen was starting to push up their prices.  "When we entered the market, we came at a time of complacency by most competitors to the low end of the market," says Greg Warner, executive vice president of Hyundai Motor America.  Hyundai, the largest and most ambitious of the Third World invaders, hit the American road running.  It sifted through thousands of applications before picking dealers, and then insisted that they build expensive stand-alone showrooms and repair facilities.  The company sold nearly 700,000 cars in less than three years.  Pohanka Hyundai of Marlow Heights, Md., sold 1,379 Excels in 1987, its first year of operation.  "It was just incredible," says owner John Pohanka.  This year, however, Pohanka Hyundai is on track to sell fewer than 800 cars.  Says Mr. Pohanka, "It comes as a shock to go from one extreme to the other."  Hyundai ran into a buzz saw of problems, some of its own making, others not.  As the Korean economy surged, so did the value of the won against the dollar -- some 32% since the company entered the U.S. market in February 1986.  In the same period, wages paid to Korean auto workers, though starting from a very low base, increased more than 50%.  Hyundai compounded these problems by loading up its cars with optional equipment.  The 1989 Excel, for example, has a base price of $5,724, but the average car sells for upward of $8,000. (The company hasn't yet announced a base price for the new 1990 model, but says it will be less than $6,000.)  And this year, consumer credit has tightened, particularly for Hyundai's target group: buyers who have never owned a new car.  "Basically, what was sold was not so much the product as easy credit," says Martin Swig, a San Francisco car dealer who sold his Hyundai franchise in 1987.  Hyundai hopes to solve the problem by forming its own finance company later this year.  What's more, the company hopes to attract better-heeled buyers, though that will take some doing.  Hyundai originally planned to launch its first midsized car, the Sonata, last fall, and bought lots of television advertising time during the Seoul Olympics last September.  But production start-up problems prevented big-volume shipments of the car until early this year.  Now Hyundai is trying to recover by launching a 1990-model Sonata with such options as a more powerful V-6 engine, leather seats and a high-performance sound system.  Early next year, Hyundai plans to introduce a sporty car to compete with the Honda Civic CRX.  That will be followed a year later by a car priced between the Excel and the Sonata.  But the centerpiece of the comeback effort is the new Excel.  Hyundai has replaced the engine's carburetor with a fuel-injection system.  The change boosts horsepower and fuel economy and makes the car easier to start.  And the optional automatic transmission will be a four-speed instead of a three-speed, providing better gas mileage on the highway.  "Our dealers will have a completely different perspective in six months," promises Hyundai's Mr. Warner.  Others, though, aren't so sure that budget cars from the Third World provide a recipe for success in the U.S. -- especially after consumers' disappointments with the first wave of products.  "People's desires are shifting upward," says Yoshinori Taura, president of Mazda Motor of America, the Japanese auto maker's U.S. sales arm.  "Even Hyundai feels the difficulty of staying with the subcompact market with the won stronger and its wages and prices rising.  For anybody, it becomes difficult to keep prices that low."  Infant-Vision Tests  Center on Attention  NEW WAYS TO TEST babies' vision may help detect problems early.  Babies, of course, can't recite letters on a chart.  So while doctors can easily check for gross defects in an infant's eyeball and visual responses, they can't find out whether eye-brain connections are developing properly.  To overcome the problem, scientists at Massachusetts Institute of Technology are capitalizing on the fact that babies find some patterns visually arresting.  In one test, they show infants two circles on a TV-like screen, one with lines that wiggle and the other with stationary lines.  The babies usually watch the wigglers.  In repeated tests of a few seconds each, the researchers alternate the wiggling side and gradually smooth the wiggles so they are less perceptible.  The point at which a baby quits focusing on the wiggling side indicates his or her visual acuity.  The researchers have devised different patterns to test various aspects of infant vision, such as depth perception and the ability to detect slight misalignments of overlapping lines, which is one of the first visual powers to develop.  Among other insights, they have found that girls develop depth perception before boys do, says brain researcher Richard Held, who is leading the research.  The team is developing a computerized system for detecting problems, such as severe astigmatism in one eye, which can cause permanent damage if not corrected early.  "It's a pain in the neck to put glasses on babies, but it can be done," Mr. Held says.  'Bored to Distraction'  May No Longer Be Apt  IF YOU FIND this article boring, don't blame us -- maybe you're just distracted.  At least, that's what one might conclude from a study on boredom by two psychologists at Clark University in Worcester, Mass.  The researchers enlisted 91 volunteers to listen separately to a tape-recorded article from "Psychology Today."  Meanwhile, a TV soap opera blared in the next room to distract the subjects, who weren't told the noise was part of the experiment.  More than half of those who found the background noise moderately distracting said the article was a yawner.  In contrast, most of those who either weren't distracted or were very distracted didn't.  The researchers, James Laird and Robin Damrad-Frye, concluded that the moderately distracted people subliminally noticed their minds were wandering and interpreted that as boredom.  Very distracted subjects didn't feel bored because, although their minds wandered, they recognized that the noise was responsible.  The study supports the idea that feelings spring from unconscious perceptions of one's own behavior or thoughts, says Mr. Laird.  That idea also might explain other studies suggesting that people can induce positive feelings in themselves by smiling.  The boredom study, reported in this month's issue of the Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, may have practical implications, Mr. Laird says.  "Most offices are designed to lower distractions," he explains.  "But the distractions often may be kept just low enough to cause the worst case for boredom."  Still, he concedes, some things are just plain dull, regardless of distractions.  Scientists Latch On  To Leech Technology  JUST WHEN THE LEECH is making a comeback in medicine, biotechnology may come up with products that would send it back to the swamp.  The worms long ago were prescribed for sucking out "bad blood."  Then they were shunned as medieval.  But lately they have regained some lost favor.  In Boston, leeches were applied to a boy's ear that had been reattached after a dog bite.  The leeches drained blood that couldn't pass through the ear's damaged blood vessels, preventing blood clots for a few days while the vessels healed.  When they feed, the creatures stop blood from clotting with an anticoagulant in their saliva called hirudin.  The substance has long tantalized doctors as a potential drug, but only tiny amounts can be gotten from the animals.  Now some 10 companies -- including Biogen Inc. of Cambridge, Mass., and a joint venture between two French concerns, Societe Nationale Elf Aquitaine and Transgene S.A. -- are racing to develop genetically engineered versions of hirudin.  It might be used during dialysis to prevent blood clots in needles and tubes, to preserve donated blood and to help keep blood vessels clear of clots in heart-attack and other patients.  While there are concerns that hirudin could cause strokes or other bleeding problems, Biogen last week reported that in a study with baboons, a drug it derived from hirudin blocked venous blood clots without increased risk of bleeding.  Biogen said the study suggests the drug may be safer than widely used anticoagulants.  Odds and Ends  BIG BIRTHMARKS on children were replaced by Boston researchers, who used small pieces of skin taken from the kids and grown, in the laboratory, into large sheets for grafting.  The technique was originated for burn patients, say the researchers at Massachusetts General Hospital and Shriners Burns Institute. . . .  A small, cheap sensor to detect leaks of petroleum from underground storage tanks has been developed by scientists at Bell Communications Research Inc. in Livingston, N.J.  The sensors could help stem groundwater pollution from some four million fuel storage tanks in the U.S., the company says.  Business leaders from Japan and the Soviet Union agreed at a meeting in Moscow to expand economic ties, but few concrete steps were announced despite Soviet desire for progress.  One of the few advances of the joint committee on economic cooperation was an accord to conduct a feasibility study for a joint venture to produce pulp and paper products on the island of Sakhalin.  Japanese businessmen have been skeptical about significantly expanding ties with the Soviet Union because of doubts about the economic benefits, particularly in the area of joint ventures.  Moreover, Japan is unwilling to take major steps toward cooperation while the Soviet Union continues to occupy four islands north of Japan that were seized at the end of World War II.  The meeting, the committee's 12th since 1966, agreed to continue discussions on several other joint ventures and projects.  No progress appears to have been made on developing oil and gas resources off the coast of Sakhalin.  The group said that a delegation of Soviet officials would visit Japan in the near future.  The Sakhalin project calls for the development of a paper and pulp complex with annual output of 200,000 tons.  If the two sides agree to pursue the project, a 100 billion yen ($694.7 million) factory would be built.  But considerable differences remain between the two sides.  Experiments in Baltimore indicated that a drug long used to treat gout may help cut the costs of drug therapy for people with AIDS.  The gout drug, probenecid, was found to enhance the action of the drug AZT in those with AIDS.  If a combination of probenecid and AZT proves both safe and effective in clinical trials now being planned, it could cut AZT requirements as much as 50%, preliminary tests indicated.  This would reduce the $7,000 to $8,000 annual cost of AZT for an individual with acquired immune deficiency syndrome or threatened by the disease.  AZT, made by the British company, Burroughs Wellcome Co., is the only drug formally approved for the treatment of AIDS.  The drug also has been found effective in warding off the development of AIDS in those people who have been infected with the human immunodeficiency virus-1, the cause of AIDS.  Probenecid, a drug developed in the 1940s, is sold by several companies including Merck & Co., the Lederle division of American Cyanamid Co., Danbury Pharmacal Inc. and Mylan Pharmaceuticals Inc.  "At this time, we're not saying everyone {taking AZT} should go out and use probenecid," cautioned David Kornhauser, assistant professor of medicine at Johns Hopkins Medical Institutions in Baltimore.  "This is an important first step, but we must continue with careful study before this therapy is widely adopted," he said.  Dr. Kornhauser and his colleagues reported they had given eight men with either AIDS or AIDS-related complex, or ARC, a combination of AZT and probenecid and then measured the levels of AZT in the blood for the next several hours and the amount of AZT in the urine.  A half-normal dose of AZT given with probenecid produced, on the average, the same concentrations in the blood as a full dose of AZT alone, the Johns Hopkins researchers reported in the current issue of The Lancet, the London-based medical journal.  Moreover, Dr. Kornhauser said, there were indications that the probenecid slowed the breakdown of AZT in the body and thus could prolong its activity.  Patients might be able to take it only once every eight hours instead of every four hours as at present, he speculated.  Probenecid was orginally developed to slow the kidneys' removal of the then -- new penicillin from the blood and this is apparently what it does with AZT.  Johns Hopkins is now recruiting adults who are already taking AZT for a trial to determine the safety and efficacy of the AZT-probenecid combination.  Interested volunteers who can spend three separate nights in the Hopkins Hospital during the month-long study should call 301-955-7703, the institution said.  Integrated Resources Inc. said it agreed to sell a group of financial services businesses to Whitehall Financial Group for $310 million.  Proceeds from the sale will be used to restructure debt.  Under the agreement, Whitehall, a partnership with holdings in life insurance and property and casualty brokerage, will buy Integrated Resources Life Insurance Co., Integrated Resources Equity Corp., Integrated Resources Asset Management Corp., Resources Trust Co., Financial Clearing and Services Corp.  The purchase price includes $297 million, subject to adjustments, plus a portion of certain tax benefits realized by the core companies after the sale, Integrated said.  Integrated said the total purchase price is slightly below the low end of its valuation of these assets, which was included in the presentation to Integrated's creditors at meetings last week.  Whitehall Financial is a partnership between the de Gunzburg branch of the Bronfman family and Mandy Moros, a London investor.  Integrated said the sale agreement doesn't restrict it from soliciting higher bids for the financial services companies, and that Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., its investment bank, will continue to seek buyers.  Integrated said it agreed to pay a $4 million break-up fee to Whitehall if the proposed transaction is canceled for reasons other than bad faith on the part of Whitehall.  INTERNATIONAL LEASE FINANCE Corp., Beverly Hills, Calif., said its previously announced offering of 500,000 units through Salomon Brothers Inc. will be priced at $64 a unit.  Each unit consists of two shares of the aircraft leasing firm's common stock and one common-stock purchase warrant.  The warrant entitles the holder to buy one common share for $35, subject to adjustment under certain circumstances.  The warrants expire Aug. 31, 1994, unless the expiration is accelerated, as provided for in the warrants.  CHAMBERS DEVELOPMENT Co., Pittsburgh, said it filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the sale of $75 million of convertible subordinated debentures, due 2004.  The environmental services concern said proceeds will be used for working capital, capital expenditures and possible future acquisitions.  The debentures will be convertible into the company's Class A common shares, which each have 1/10th the voting power of Chambers's regular common shares.  Interlake Corp. said W. Robert Reum, formerly executive vice president, handling and packaging systems, was named president and chief operating officer.  The president's post had been vacant for a year.  As operating chief, the 47-year-old Mr. Reum succeeds Frederick C. Langenberg, 62, who remains chairman and chief executive officer.  Interlake, which makes engineered materials and handling and packaging systems, is in the midst of a corporate restructuring it undertook after Mark IV Industries Inc. disclosed in July that it was mulling a takeover effort.  Among other things, the restructuring calls for Interlake to borrow $600 million, and pay holders a special $45-a-share dividend.  The special payout will cost the company about $455 million, with the bulk of the other borrowings going to reduce current debt obligations.  Separately, the company said Friday that Chemical Bank signed a commitment letter, under which it agreed to lead a syndicate that will provide $450 million in funds.  Interlake also said Goldman, Sachs & Co. has advised the company it is "highly confident" it can place $150 million of subordinated debt.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission said it didn't find any conflicts of interest among the Chicago Board of Trade directors who voted to force Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. to sell off its soybean holdings last month.  The CFTC also said its preliminary review of the exchange's July 11 emergency action to avert a soybean squeeze turned up no evidence of insider trading on the part of the directors.  The vote was 16-1, with three directors not voting, to order Ferruzzi, an Italian grain merchant, to liquidate its dominant position in the July soybean futures contract.  None of the directors who voted had a personal stake in July soybeans, according to the agency's report.  Six directors were affiliated with commodity firms that held short positions or had customers holding predominantly short positions in the July contract.  One of the six affiliated directors, however, recused himself from voting because he had a personal position in the contract.  "We don't see any smoking guns, based on what we've looked at," said Andrea Corcoran, the CFTC's director of trading and markets.  The affiliated directors "represented they didn't have any control or influence over the trading activities of their firms.  "It doesn't look like anyone was in a position to profit on advance knowledge of the board's order," she added.  But the CFTC staff plans further interviews with the affiliated directors and with exchange officials.  The report didn't identify the affiliated directors.  Many farm groups pressed for the conflict of interest investigation because soybean futures prices acted suspiciously a few hours before the Board of Trade's directors took action against Ferruzzi.  On July 11, a late selling wave swept the price of the July contract sharply lower.  Only later, after trading had ended for the day, did brokers learn of the CBOT's move.  Many traders have speculated that information about the impending move seeped into the market.  When trading resumed the next morning, prices plunged on news that Ferruzzi would have to sell contracts covering more than 20 million bushels.  That July 12 price plunge benefited traders who had a short position in the July futures contract, which in market parlance describes traders who had earlier sold futures contracts requiring them to deliver soybeans in July at designated grain elevators.  These traders profited because they could buy back contracts for less than they sold them for, thus allowing them to end their delivery obligation and pocket the price difference.  The CFTC said it scrutinized soybean trading from July 3 through July 12 and found that no traders appeared to be taking new short positions in advance of the liquidation order.  "Indeed, most traders maintained practically identical positions during the review period," the report said.  Nonetheless, the agency's disclosure of affiliated directors' votes is likely to fuel the debate over the exchange's ability to regulate itself.  A CBOT spokesman said the exchange will issue a statement on the CFTC report today.  David Swanson, chief executive of Ferruzzi Group's Central Soya Co., said that the Milan-based conglomerate believes the report "indicates a potential conflict of interest among some directors."  He also challenged the report's conclusion that the exchange's emergency action was necessary to avoid disorder in the soybean market as the July contract expired.  Ferruzzi didn't "plan to, and would never, take any action disruptive to the market," he said.  Ferruzzi believed on July 10 that "it had an adequate number of working days before the contract expired in which to crush soybeans, purchase soybeans and continue to export soybeans, all of which would have brought Ferruzzi below the hedging level set for us by the CFTC."  CFTC officials will be grilled Sept. 8 when they present their preliminary findings to the Senate Agriculture Committee.  Sen. Patrick Leahy (D., Vt.), the committee chairman, emphasized the importance of questioning the affiliated directors further.  "The public will not tolerate self-dealing or conflicts of interest by exchange director or insiders," he said Friday in a statement.  The New York State Mortgage Agency will soon offer investors a smorgasbord of bonds that will include the agency's first taxable municipal bond issue.  The mixed-bag bond offering illustrates how creative housing authorities have become in recent years, as they seek to continue providing housing loans to low-income and middle-income residents while sidestepping tightened government policies on the use of tax-exempt bonds.  "This is the most innovative offering we've structured," said John Eforo, the agency's chief financial officer.  "There is something here for everyone."  The $280 million offering will consist of $55 million of traditional tax-exempt munis, $200 million of bonds subject to the so-called alternative minimum tax and $26 million of fully taxable bonds.  The offering is tentatively scheduled for pricing Sept. 12.  Ever since the Tax Reform Act of 1986 limited the use of tax-exempt bonds to "essential" or "public purpose" projects, municipalities have had to scramble to find alternative ways to pay for such projects as airports, convention centers and housing development.  But while the tax-exempt and minimum-tax bonds are expected to go over big with investors, taxable municipals could sit for a while.  "The taxable muni market hasn't really gotten off the ground," said Bernard Beal, president of M.R. Beal & Co., a New York investment banking firm that specializes in municipal bonds.  The taxable municipal market remains small, and the bonds tend to be difficult to trade in the secondary market, he said.  S.E. Canaday Jr., a vice president at John Nuveen & Co., said taxable municipals "are the type of bonds you buy if you expect to hold" until maturity.  Sonyma, as the New York agency is called, uses proceeds from bond sales to provide low-rate mortgages to first-time home buyers.  By combining a small taxable issue with a much larger tax-free and minimum-tax issues, the agency is able to raise additional funds to service a larger number of families without exceeding federal limitations.  Sonyma and other housing agencies can no longer raise new money through tax-exempt bonds, but they can recycle old funds, which is being done with the $55 million portion of the offering.  They also are offering minimum-tax bonds and throwing in some taxables.  By blending the three, the agency can still provide mortgages that have below-market interest rates.  For example, yields are currently about 7.50% on new tax-free housing bonds, 7.75% on housing bonds subject to the minimum tax and more than 9.5% on fully taxable bonds.  "When you blend those rates together, we should be able to provide home owners with mortgage loans of about 8.5%," which is much lower than market rates for conventional fixed-rate mortgages, said Mr. Eforo.  According to HSH Associates in Butler, N.J., the average rate on a 30-year conventional mortgage in New York state was 10.04% in early August, and the average was 9.52% nationwide.  While that may be good news for New York home buyers, money managers offer mixed reviews of such offerings.  One attraction in the alternative minimum tax bonds is that their yields tend to be higher than on other muni bonds; that's to compensate investors for the possible tax liability. (The federal alternative minimum tax is aimed at ensuring that wealthy people and companies pay at least some income tax.)  Mr. Canaday estimates that just 2% of the households in the U.S. would be subject to the alternative minimum tax.  Also, housing bonds pay higher yields that municipals in general because they have a greater chance of being called before maturity, often because home-buyers sell their homes or refinance mortgages.  Minimum-tax municipals "are great investments as long as you are sure you aren't going to have to pay tax," said Mr. Canaday.  "We hold lots of them in the mutual funds.  For traditional municipal bond buyers, it's a great chance to get additional income, and few people have to pay extra tax on them."  But few money managers see much attraction in taxable municipals.  People who regularly buy corporate taxable bonds are unhappy that municipals are called so often, while the typical municipal buyer has a tax-avoidance mentality.  "Taxable municipals have not met with the market very well," said Bruce Whiteford, a municipal bond portfolio manager at Chase Investors Management Corp.  "What I tend to find is that tax exempt people say it's a taxable bond, and taxable people consider it a muni.  So it just falls between the cracks." ---  Friday's Market Activity  U.S. Treasurys ended 1/8 to 3/8 point lower after suddenly switching directions late in the day.  Prices were actually as much as 3/8 higher for most of the day.  But a wave of selling that began in the bond futures pit quickly spread to the cash market.  Bond traders said the downturn was exaggerated by thin trading.  "Day traders needed to even up their positions," said a coupon dealer based in Chicago.  And when these speculators liquidated their long-term bonds, there were no buyers to help offset the selling, the dealer said.  September bond futures fell 1/4 point to settle at 96 16/32, after trading between 96 14/32 and 97 04/32.  Bearish technical factors also contributed to the bond futures selling, dealers said.  Sell-stops were triggered after the September contract slipped below 96 24/32, they said.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 99 5/32 to yield 8.19%, compared with Thursday's price of 99 19/32 to yield 8.15%.  Some bond analysts contend that Friday's drop doesn't bode well for fixed-income markets.  "It has increased the level of caution in the market," said the Chicago trader.  Among other things, investors are concerned that coming economic data will reinforce perceptions that the economy is headed for a "soft landing," with moderating growth and easing inflation, rather than a recession.  The most important releases this week are tomorrow's revision of the second-quarter gross national product and Friday's employment report for August.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, an upward revision in the second-quarter annual growth rate to 2.5% from the initially reported 1.7%.  In other major markets:  -- Corporate bonds ended 1/4 point lower.  Traders said activity centered on recent new issues.  Just over $1.1 billion of bonds were priced last week, roughly a third of the previous week's $2.9 billion.  Traders said the relatively low supply coupled with a light calendar for this week resulted in spreads tightening slightly.  One new issue expected this week is Delta Air Lines, which is expected to offer about $274 million of equipment trust certificates.  -- Mortgage securities ended 1/32 to 2/ 32 lower amid talk of sizable thrift selling.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery finished at 96 25/32, down 1/32, and Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities ended at about 95 27/32, off 1/32.  -- Municipal bonds were 1/8 point firmer, with market participants facing the prospect of an extremely quiet new issue sector this week.  A number of sizable deals that underwriters have been holding in the wings are now tentatively scheduled for pricing after Labor Day, when the bulk of still-vacationing investors are expected back.  FIRST CITY FINANCIAL Corp., Vancouver, British Columbia, said it plans a 3-for-1 split of its common shares.  The holding and investment company, 72%-owned by the Belzberg family, has about 17.6 million common shares outstanding.  The split is subject to shareholders' approval at a meeting scheduled for Oct. 25.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading Friday, First City shares closed at 41.50 Canadian dollars (US$35.32), up C$3.  UNIVAR Corp., announced a 2-for-1 stock split, payable Nov. 4, 1989, to stock of record Oct. 16.  The Seattle-based company said the split wouldn't change the effective dividend paid to stockholders.  Univar distributes chemicals.  Making money in real estate has become harder in recent years because of tax overhaul, low inflation and overbuilding.  Now the risk of recession and fallout from the savings-and-loan crisis threaten to make it an even tougher investment play.  Some experts say the best thing investors can do is to stay away, at least for a while.  "I wouldn't be in a hurry to invest in real estate today," says David Shulman, a real estate analyst at Salomon Brothers Inc. "Long-term investors will probably find things are cheaper a year or 18 months from now."  But some analysts argue that the market's current woes are also creating opportunities for savvy investors.  The trick, they say, is to mind the fundamentals and bank on skillful, hands-on managers.  So-called equity real estate investment trusts, which are publicly traded companies that invest in portfolios of properties, are a particularly attractive vehicle for individuals, these experts say.  "Real estate isn't a get-rich-quick investment anymore, and never will be again," says Allen Parker, portfolio manager of the U.S. Real Estate Fund.  "But you can find quality and make a lot of money, especially if you buy big, publicly traded companies like REITs."  Investing in property through REITs is a favorite strategy these days, in part because REITs are exempt from corporate taxes if they pay out 95% of their taxable income to shareholders.  This "single-tax" status is especially important in the wake of tax overhaul, which made income, not tax write-offs, the main component of return for real estate investments.  Equity REITs also offer other advantages that aren't generally available in direct real estate investing: Because their shares are traded on major stock exchanges, investors can get daily price quotes, liquidity, diversification, low dollar cost and rigorous quarterly financial reporting.  "For individuals, REITs offer push-button real estate investing," says Robert Frank, a real estate securities analyst with Alex.  Brown & Sons.  What's more, the better equity REITs are well-positioned strategically to benefit from soft market conditions, several analysts say.  They give individuals access to experienced managers with established track records -- not only in acquiring good properties, but also in adding value to them through renovation, maintenance and leasing.  That hands-on approach is often lacking in limited partnership investments, where managers typically take a more passive role.  Good location "isn't enough anymore" to guarantee good returns, says Martin Cohen, president of Cohen & Steers Capital Management, which specializes in real estate-related investments.  "Today, it's location and management."  The fact that REIT managers can tap the public markets for relatively low-cost funds also gives them an edge to expand market share as the real estate industry contracts.  For instance, "REITs can pick and choose" among properties sold off by troubled limited partnerships, as well as failed S&Ls, says Mr. Frank.  Meanwhile, he says, revenue generated by leases on the properties in REIT portfolios provides a base of current income for investors that ranges from 5% to 8%, at today's prices.  "The people who are going to make money in real estate in the 1990s are those with the skill to acquire properties at less than replacement cost today and lease them, so that they generate an income stream to support their value," he adds.  Blue-chip equity REITs have already run up sharply in price this year on declining interest rates, and analysts generally warn against bottom-fishing in this sector.  Even so, says Sam Lieber, who tracks real estate stocks for the Evergreen family of mutual funds, many good REITS "are still priced to give total returns of 15% to 17% -- unless there are some real surprises."  Although they're "not screaming bargains," he adds, "the main thing is that you're buying management that can make money in up and down markets."  Of course, REIT investing isn't free of pitfalls.  The pros advise investors to take special care on these points:  Avoid conflicts of interest: Some REIT managers wear more than one hat.  "This can be a real problem," says Mr. Frank.  "Make sure the company is self-administered, which means management has no other job than to run that REIT."  For instance, some REITs are advised by developers who may use them to unload properties at high prices.  Others, especially in the health-care field, are controlled by the same companies that lease from them, which can cause trouble with rents.  Target market exposure: Properties held by many REITs are concentrated in specific regions or property types.  Geographically, analysts like the Northwest, Midwest, mid-Atlantic and California markets best.  They're leery about the Southwest (aside from Houston), the Boston-New York corridor and parts of Florida.  Among market sectors, analysts favor apartments and regional shopping centers, especially those anchored by supermarkets and located in built-up neighborhoods where competition can't easily spring up.  One favorite non-REIT shopping-center play is Rouse Co., which owns 60 to 70 centers nationwide.  Analysts' verdicts are mixed on industrial properties, and thumbs down on hotels, raw land and office buildings.  One exception in the office sector is Washington REIT, in the Washington, D.C., area -- although some analysts feel its good prospects are already reflected in its share price.  Another exception is Burnham Pacific Properties, whose office buildings are in tightly zoned areas of San Diego.  Other popular California real estate plays are Santa Anita Cos., which owns and operates a racetrack and shopping malls, and BRE Properties, which has a very diversified real estate portfolio and is seen as a good value at today's price level.  Look for value added: "The good REITs can increase the value of the properties they hold," says William Morrill, director of portfolio management at Alex.  Brown Realty Advisors Inc.  On this and other counts, analysts particularly like United Dominion Realty, which revamps apartment buildings in the Southeast; Federal Realty, which fixes up run-down shopping centers in the mid-Atlantic; and Weingarten Realty, which does the same in Houston.  New Plan Realty, which revamps shopping centers in New England, is also popular but is considered pricey for its growth prospects by some analysts.  Watch the numbers: REITs should have debt no higher than 50% of equity and should avoid such financing gimmicks as accrual mortgages and zero-coupon bonds, specialists say.  Mr. Frank recommends using market capitalization as the equity measure "because book value is very misleading with REITs."  As for performance, the pros generally look for three to five years of steady cash-flow and dividend growth.  AMERICAN PRESIDENT Cos., said it called for the redemption of its $3.50 Series B Convertible Exchangeable Preferred stock on Sept. 27.  The redemption price was set at $52.45 a share, plus accrued dividends.  American President said about two million shares of the preferred currently are outstanding.  Through Sept. 26, holders of the shares have the option of converting them into American Preferred common at the rate of 1.6807 shares of common for each share of preferred.  American President, an Oakland, Calif., shipping and transportation company, has about 16.6 million outstanding.  A widespread long strike in U.S. coal mines would create an acute international shortage of coking coal, dealers and analysts say.  But steam coal, which is sometimes used as a substitute for coking coal, is in ample supply.  Coal mine labor disputes in the eastern U.S. haven't caused much consternation in Europe and elsewhere so far, but some analysts are worried that the strike will extend around the U.S.  The United Mine Workers union has been on strike against Greenwich, Conn.-based Pittston Co. for about five months as a result of a dispute between the UMW and Pittston that began last year when the company refused to sign the union's industrywide contract.  So far the union hasn't officially sanctioned a wider strike, although some other coal miners have gone on sympathy strikes that lasted a few days or weeks.  In addition, several mines closed for vacations in July.  Although many miners are back at work, dealers say, the mood is volatile and strikes could spread quickly.  "The coking coal market has become very tight, given a surge in demand from the steel industry, the U.S. miners' strike and a disruption of Chinese exports," says Philip Rogers, head of research at the brokerage concern of Simpson, Spence & Young here.  Adding to the difficulties, he says, coking coal supplies at U.S., Canadian and Australian ports are very low.  U.S. coking or metallurgical coal, a raw material for the steel industry, plays a significant part in international coal trade, dealers say.  At 56 million metric tons, U.S. exports account for about 30% of total world sales, second only to Australia's share.  The next biggest exporters are Canada, Poland, the Soviet Union, South Africa and China.  A metric ton is equal to 1.1 short tons, or 2,204.6 pounds.  Exacerbating coal merchants' worries about supplies, recent strikes in the Soviet Union are bound to reduce shipments in the months ahead, Mr. Rogers of Simpson Spence says.  Prices of metallurgical coal were already rising because of the world-wide steel boom, analysts say.  Average contract prices rose $3 or $4 in the past year to between $47 and $52 a ton, says William Fischer, a consultant and compiler of a book on international coal statistics.  Spot prices of coking coal surged to $55 a metric ton, a U.S. trader says, although the quantities shipped at that price were relatively insignificant.  For the time being, however, the market isn't in crisis.  Consumers covered at least some of their prospective needs by increasing their purchases of U.S. coking coal this year, dealers say.  Coking coal exports from the U.S. jumped 24% to 25.7 million metric tons in the first five months of this year compared with a year earlier, according to Mr. Fischer, the coal consultant.  Although the coking coal market is "tight, it isn't desperate," Mr. Fischer says.  The steel industry in Europe and the Far East have adequate stocks, he says.  Moreover, steel factories' output is beginning to slow down, he says, and demand for coking coal will fall if the U.S. and other industrial economies falter next year.  Once the present world-wide construction boom ends, the steel industry could slump, says David Price, a coal analyst at Wharton Econometric Forecasting Associates.  More downward pressure could be put on demand for coking coal as cheaper steam coals are substituted for it in an application known as pulverized coal injection, Mr. Price says.  Still, mines' stocks of coking coal are low, a U.S. coal trader says.  He says only 5% to 10% of U.S. production is being affected by the labor dispute so far, but if the dispute worsens, the international coal market will become increasingly nervous.  "The U.S. is a swing supplier of coking coal, so merchants are scrambling for supplies," a London trader says.  Steam coal, on the other hand, hasn't felt the impact of the strike because there is a surplus, dealers say.  There is likely to be an excess of steam coal supplies overhanging the market for some time, which will work against significant price rises, Mr. Rogers of Simpson Spence says.  Environmental pressures against burning steam coal also will reduce growth in demand in the next few years, said Malcolm Edwards, commercial director of British Coal.  Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:  Energy  Oil trading probably will remain thin this week as traders finish their summer vacations and London takes a holiday today.  But that doesn't necessarily signal a dull market.  Prices could be volatile as petroleum inventories again figure prominently.  Some analysts recently have noticed what they say is a change in pricing psychology among oil-market participants.  Previously, the focus was on how much oil the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries produced.  OPEC's production still is important, and it will be in the spotlight again as the Sept. 23 OPEC meeting in Vienna approaches.  But some of the market's emphasis has shifted from what OPEC can produce to what the market can absorb.  That's why oil inventories are being closely watched now.  It is assumed that if inventories don't build up too quickly in times of high OPEC output, demand is growing at a healthy pace.  But a rapid rise in inventories would suggest supplies aren't being readily absorbed.  U.S. petroleum prices ended last week on a weak note largely because of a buildup of crude oil supplies.  In futures trading, West Texas Intermediate crude for October delivery fell 10 cents Friday to end at $18.51 a barrel.  Meanwhile, leading refiners were reducing their field postings for this benchmark crude by 25 cents to $17.50 a barrel.  Last week's slide in prices was triggered by a Wednesday report from the Department of Energy showing a big increase in U.S. stocks of crude oil.  The report came one day after the American Petroleum Institute's weekly report, which showed a much smaller rise.  Traders will be watching closely this week to see whether the discrepancy between the government and industry figures is resolved.  Grains and Soybeans  Today, traders will study the weekly state crop condition reports for signs that last week's widespread rains slowed the deterioration of corn and soybeans in Iowa and Nebraska.  The reports are released by states after the close of futures contract trading.  Traders expect Illinois and Indiana to report the best corn and soybean crop conditions.  Last week, the market's projection of the soybean harvest shifted daily on weather projections.  Much of the crop was moving through the pod-filling stage, during which time rainfall has its biggest influence on eventual yields.  A spell of dry weather a week ago prompted many private crop analysts to trim their soybean harvest estimates to as low as 1.83 billion bushels.  By Friday, most estimates had edged up to between 1.85 billion and 1.87 billion bushels.  Based on an Aug. 1 survey, the U.S. Agriculture Department recently projected a fall harvest of 1.91 billion bushels, up 24% from the drought-stunted harvest of 1988.  The Agriculture Department is due to revise its monthly forecast in early September.  As the fall harvest approaches, speculation usually builds over the potential for major grain purchases by the Soviet Union.  The Soviets tend to buy U.S. grain in the fall because U.S. prices then are often at their lowest, driven down by farmers selling some of their newly harvested crops.  The Soviets also make many of their purchases in the fall because that is when agricultural officials in Moscow have a reliable estimate of the size of Soviet crop production and thus of Soviet needs.  Cotton Futures prices have been quietly rising to life-of-contract highs in recent sessions, and nothing is in sight to change this trend.  International and U.S. demand is strong, and supplies at the end of the current season are expected to be well below those of last year.  China, the world's major producer, may have a smaller crop than it has indicated, which will increase its needs to import, according to Ernest Simon, cotton specialist for Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., New York.  China estimated that it will produce about 20 million bales of cotton in the 1989-90 season, but Mr. Simon says the total will be closer to 17.5 million or 18 million bales.  "There is a cotton shortage in China; the mills aren't getting enough," Mr. Simon said.  Last week's U.S. export report listed South Korea, Japan and China as major buyers in the week ended Aug. 17, Mr. Simon said.  U.S. cotton-mill use is surging, while production is expected to be down from last year, Mr. Simon said.  As a result, stocks of cotton in the U.S. on July 31, 1990, are expected to drop to 3.9 million bales, according to the August estimate of the U.S. Department of Agriculture, compared with a month-earlier estimate of 4.6 million bales.  The mantra of every chairman of the Federal Reserve Board is that the inflation rate is too high and must be brought down.  Like his predecessors, Alan Greenspan vows to reduce inflation and reach central banker nirvana: price stability.  Financial markets don't believe him.  If they did, long-term interest rates would be half what they are.  Businesses aren't planning on stable prices either.  And economists can't agree on what "price stability" means, let alone how to achieve it.  But Mr. Greenspan keeps chanting.  Is the Fed willing to inflict the pain that may be needed to actually eliminate inflation or cut the rate in half from its current 4.5% to 5% pace?  Beyond the delicate task of the next year or two -- averting a recession while keeping inflation from accelerating -- this is among the most important issues in monetary policy.  Economists who believe that conquering inflation will hurt doubt the Fed's sincerity.  "There's no public support for undergoing a recession to drive inflation from 4% or 5% to zero.  That's what it would take," says Barry Bosworth of the Brookings Institution.  Few Fed policymakers, notably Lee Hoskins of the Cleveland Federal Reserve Bank, talk seriously about zero inflation.  Mr. Greenspan himself defines price stability as inflation low enough so that it isn't a factor in business decisions.  A return to the 1.5% to 2% rates of the late 1950s and early 1960s would suffice, but that's a long way from the current 4.5% to 5% pace.  Princeton University economist Alan Blinder figures that shaving one percentage point off inflation requires an increase of one percentage point in the unemployment rate for two years.  If he's right, cutting the inflation rate to 2% would mean throwing more than 3 million Americans out of work for two years.  Even a less ambitious inflation target could mean several years of sluggish growth and rising unemployment.  A number of Fed officials reject this view.  A deep recession isn't the only way to subdue inflation, they say.  Mr. Greenspan and some allies argue that, given the current state of the economy, keeping the money supply growing about 3% a year would bring down inflation -- without a recession.  Those sympathetic to the supply-side view, Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson, for one, say that low inflation and healthy economic growth aren't incompatible -- as long as the nation keeps investing.  Outside the Fed, some economists argue that the central bank can succeed by preventing the inflation virus from taking hold in Americans' expectations about the future.  By pouncing on hints of faster inflation, as it did last year, the Fed sends potent signals that make the task of reducing the inflation rate easier.  "Inflation can be gradually reduced without a lot of slack in the economy so long as the Fed has a credible policy that they won't let inflation accelerate out of control," says Michael Boskin, President Bush's chief economic adviser.  Unfortunately, those who see a painless cure for inflation haven't much history to back up their theories.  But that doesn't mean they're wrong.  So far, by luck, skill or both, the Greenspan Fed seems to have arrested inflation without crippling the economy.  The economy is doing just what the Fed wanted.  The inflation rate is stable.  Wage increases aren't accelerating much.  But the economy is still growing, albeit slowly.  Auto sales are bounding.  Housing starts are picking up.  Businesses are hiring.  Former Fed governor Lyle Gramley marvels at surveys of corporate purchasing managers.  In July, 16% said they were paying higher prices, down from 25% in April.  Some 23% reported falling prices versus 5% in April.  "Those numbers are moving with the speed they did in past recessions," Mr. Gramley says.  A survey of small businesses shows 29% raised prices in the second quarter compared with 36% in the first.  But Fed officials say they want to do more than stop inflation from worsening; they say they want to eradicate it.  Recent actions offer conflicting evidence about their commitment.  They eased at the same time that their forecasts suggest inflation will inch up from around 5.5% in the fourth quarter of 1989 to between 5.5% and 6% in the fourth quarter of 1990.  On the other hand, even when facing fears of recession, the Fed moved slowly, a sign that fighting inflation remains a preoccupation.  The Greenspan Fed's record is remarkable.  It handled the stock market crash masterfully.  Despite internal divisions, it has helped prolong the current expansion while keeping inflation from taking off.  But bringing down the inflation rate by a couple percentage points may take more skill, luck and nerve than it possesses.  Leeam Lowin, a Greenwich, Conn., investor, said he owns 5.4% of Komag Inc.'s common outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Lowin said he holds 705,800 of the Milpitas, Calif., concern's common shares, including 143,600 shares bought from July 20 through last Tuesday for $8.9375 to $9.75 each.  Mr. Lowin bought the stock in the maker of computer disk drive parts "solely for the purpose of investment," the filing said.  He said he plans to review his investment continuously and may buy or sell shares depending on market conditions and other factors.  Komag officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Toyota Motor Corp., citing new auto models and dealer sales efforts, said its parent-company pretax profit rose 9.2% in the year ended June 30, to 569.86 billion yen ($3.98 billion) from 521.71 billion yen a year earlier.  Sales of all products -- not just motor vehicles -- surged 7.5% to 7.19 trillion yen from 6.69 trillion yen.  Net income increased 29% to 305.86 billion yen from 238.01 billion yen, and per-share net climbed to 107.05 yen (75 cents) from 89.23 yen.  Toyota said total vehicle production for the year was 4,006,796 units, representing a 3.9% increase over the year before.  Full model changes in the Mark II, Chaser, Cresta and Hilux models were cited for the increase in units sold, as were new model additions for Toyota's Supra, Vista, Camry, Corolla, Sprinter, Town Ace and other existing lines.  In the Japanese domestic market, the auto maker said the effects of a nationwide campaign by its dealers helped push sales up 8.9% to 2,215,173 units.  Total vehicle exports, aided by an upsurge in shipments to Southeast Asia as well as Australia, rose 0.6% to 1,807,377 units.  For its current year ending June 1990, Toyota said it expects net sales of all products to remain at about 7.20 trillion yen.  Ideal Basic Industries Inc. said a special committee of its directors endorsed the idea of merging with holdings of the company's majority stockholder, but hasn't been able to agree on a price.  The cement concern said the directors endorsed the proposal from Hofi North America Inc. that Ideal would acquire Hofi's two other stakes in North American companies in a stock transaction that would give Hofi 90% of Ideal, up from 67%.  But Ideal said the directors couldn't agree on a share ratio for the transaction.  The company said the parties are reviewing the situation, but can't assure that a transaction will take place.  Hofi is the North American holding company of Holderbank Finanaciere Glaris Ltd.  It owns 100% of Dundee Cement Co. and about 60% of St. Lawrence Cement Inc.  The European Community Commission dropped anti-dumping proceedings against importers of Japanese hydraulic excavators that weigh less than six metric tons.  The commission said "no material injury had been caused to the community industry during the investigation period," despite the dominant market share held by such Japanese makers of construction and farm machinery as Komatsu Ltd. and Kubota Ltd.  A commission spokesman said that although the volume of imports had increased, the share of the EC market held by Japanese makers had fallen to 78% in 1988 from 92% in 1984, while prices remained "stable."  EC producers' market share, meanwhile, surged to 22% from 8%.  The complaint was filed in April 1988 by Ecomat S.A. of France, J.C. Bamford Excavators of the United Kingdom, Macmoter S.p.A. of Italy and Vermeer Holland B.V. of the Netherlands.  The commission said the EC producers had increased production and market share in a rapidly growing market, thereby achieving "positive financial results."  The commission said this was the third anti-dumping case against Japanese imports it recently dropped.  The other complaints involved cellular mobile telephones and wheeled loaders.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. received a $72 million Navy contract for 24 T-45 jet trainers.  Grumman Corp. was awarded a $42.3 million Navy contract for six E-2C tactical control aircraft.  Sabreliner Corp. got a $15.6 million Air Force contract to extend the life of 644 T37B trainers.  Hercules Inc. received a $14.5 million Air Force contract for Midgetman missile parts.  Figgie International won a $14 million Air Force contract for satellite equipment.  Bozell, Jacobs, Kenyon & Eckhardt Inc. received a $12.6 million Air Force contract for recruitment advertising.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., was awarded a $10.5 million Army contract for anti-tank missile engineering services.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average is headed to 3000 or better within the next year, assert some of Wall Street's optimistic analysts.  And it will get there the old-fashioned way: Investors hunting for values.  The industrial average smashed through its pre-crash high last Thursday to a record 2734.64.  The average eased back a bit in profit-taking Friday, and there's no lack of skeptics who think the market is headed for substantial declines.  Undeterred, the bulls predict further gains in the months ahead as investors sniff out unrealized potential.  One aspect of this strategy is the takeover, and these analysts don't discount the possibility that one or more of the 30 blue chips in the Dow industrials might become a target.  Though the market has been generally recovering since the October 1987 crash, the rally that eventually carried the Dow to unprecedented heights began Nov. 16, 1988.  Since then, stocks considered to be "defensive" issues against a slowing or declining economy have outperformed the market.  Fearing a possible recession, investors have moved into such Dow stocks as Coca-Cola Co., Procter & Gamble, Philip Morris and Merck, all of which in past downturns have managed to maintain earnings momentum.  But the leadership for the Dow's next 300-point climb will most likely be in the cyclical stocks -- those belonging to companies whose profits wax when the economy grows and wane when it shrinks -- says Michael Metz, market strategist for Oppenheimer & Co.  "They are heavily weighted in the Dow Jones Industrial Average, and they are the real bargains," Mr. Metz declares.  Such Dow industrials stocks as Alcoa, Du Pont, International Paper and, to some extent, United Technologies and Allied-Signal are viewed as cyclical stocks.  Investors stampeded out of these and similar stocks earlier this year as the recession alarms rang.  As a result, these stocks trail the market in both price performance alone and in ratio of their prices to annual per-share earnings, a basic standard for many value-oriented money managers.  Mr. Metz also expects many of the Dow's high-profile stocks, such as Coca-Cola, to maintain their current performance.  So, he says, the Dow industrials soon will begin to outperform such broader market barometers as Standard & Poor's 500-stock index.  In the race to climb back to pre-crash highs, by contrast, the S&P 500 and several other broad indexes beat the Dow by several weeks.  Not even the most starry-eyed optimists foresee a straight-up move without corrections.  William Raftery, technical analyst for Smith Barney, says temporary sell-offs are typical when investors switch from one sector of stocks to another.  But he, too, thinks investors must move into cyclical issues if the market is to move significantly higher.  "If we are going to 3000 or even higher it will be with Alcoa, Deere, and Du Pont rather than Kellogg," Mr. Raftery says.  The essence of the bulls' analysis is that over the past several years of restructuring, America's basic industries have added to their production capacity and upgraded their equipment.  Now those moves are beginning to pay off in higher profits, and many of the companies are building up their stores of cash because their big capital purchases are behind them.  All of which is good news for investors.  Higher profits usually result in fatter dividends and climbing stock prices.  And because some of these companies will use cash to buy back their own stock, their share prices will get an extra boost.  Also, strong cash flow and assets that aren't fully valued in share prices are the chief characteristics of takeover candidates.  "With their high cash flows and under-leveraged balance sheets, a buy-out of one of the Dow stocks is quite within reason," says Mr. Metz of Oppenheimer.  Here are how bullish analysts are looking at some of the lagging cyclical stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average:  -- Allied-Signal is selling at a P/E ratio of about 10, compared with 13 for all 500 stocks in the S&P index.  This maker of aerospace and automotive parts and chemicals has about 35% of its capital as debt, which is low when compared with many companies that have restructured.  The company should earn about $3.50 a share this year and about $3.80 in 1990, predicts Eli Lustgarten, first vice president at PaineWebber.  Allied-Signal's stake in Union Texas Petroleum is at about the value the company would like to sell it for -- close to $1.1 billion.  After taxes, that would give the company about $900 million to buy back stock or redeem debt.  Allied-Signal should also start to build a significant amount of cash in 1990 after it completes some special payments for a federally mandated pollution cleanup project, Mr. Lustgarten says.  -- United Technologies is slightly undervalued to the market, says Phillip Brannon, Merrill Lynch first vice president.  United is less cyclical than some of its counterparts in the Dow average.  The company has some interests in the automotive industry, but its main businesses are spare parts for elevators and jet engines.  About 33% of the company's capital is debt.  Mr. Brannon expects the company to at least match last year's per-share earnings of $5.05 this year, and perhaps pull ahead to $5.20.  United's aerospace interests -- Sikorsky helicopters and a subsidiary that produces aircraft parts -- may be attractive spinoff assets if the company is targeted for takeover, or in defense against a buy-out.  But Mr. Brannon says he is "on the fence" about the company's takeover candidacy, because the Pentagon might oppose such an acquisition of a defense contractor.  -- International Paper stock is trading at a P/E ratio of about 8.  Cash is flowing into the company at a strong rate, and it is buying back its shares, says George Adler, managing director at Smith Barney.  Earnings should rise to about $7.45 a share this year from $6.57 last year, Mr. Adler estimates.  Though the company has fallen into favor with many money mangers because of its low P/E ratio, Mr. Adler recommends that investors hold up for the time being in buying the stock.  Current profit margins probably aren't sustainable, Mr. Adler says.  But IP has one feature that is undoubtedly of interest to takeover strategists: acres upon acres of undervalued timber land.  ---  @ Market Sector Performance  @ Percentage change in price for the eight sectors of the Dow Jones Equity Market Index from Nov. 16, 1988 through Aug. 24, and for the stocks of the Dow Jones Industrial Average that are included in each sector.  @ % CHANGE  @ FROM 11/16/88  @ SECTOR/COMPANY TO 8/24/89  @ Consumer, Non-cyclical 44.90%  @ Coca-Cola 64.65  @ Merck 40.09  @ Philip Morris 74.73  @ Procter & Gamble 65.30  @ Consumer, Cyclical 38.04  @ Eastman Kodak 15.71  @ General Motors 17.98  @ Goodyear 8.97  @ McDonald's 31.30  @ Sears Roebuck 13.75  @ Woolworth 33.83  @ Conglomerates 35.73  @ General Electric 36.76  @ Financial 35.38  @ American Express 42.38  @ Primerica 29.17  @ Basic Materials 32.33  @ Alcoa 49.02  @ Bethlehem Steel 4.22  @ Du Pont 50.63  @ International Paper 32.65  @ Union Carbide 14.85  @ Industrial 29.26  @ Allied-Signal 21.24  @ Navistar 2.56  @ Westinghouse 40.05  @ Energy 28.86  @ Chevron 28.24  @ Exxon 7.93  @ Texaco 18.36  @ USX Corp. 32.38  @ Technology 19.74  @ AT&T 45.25  @ Boeing 36.14  @ IBM 0.43  @ Minnesota Mining 34.74  @ United Technologies 45.93  @ Dow Jones Equity Market Index 32.86  @ Dow Jones Industrial Average 34.14  @ Note: Data adjusted for stock splits but not for dividends  @ Source: IDD Information Services/Tradeline  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Thursday's record-breaking close gave way to profit-taking Friday, and stocks finished at a slight loss.  Solid gains among many of the blue chips held the Dow Jones Industrial Average's loss to 2.28 to close at 2732.36.  Some 165,930,000 shares traded on the New York Stock Exchange, down sharply from Thursday's 225,520,000.  The Dow industrials fared much better than broader measures.  Standard & Poor's 500-stock index dropped 1 -- the equivalent of a 7 1/2-point loss in the Dow industrials -- to finish the week at 350.52.  The Dow Jones Equity Market Index went down 0.68 to 329.05 and the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index fell 0.50 to 194.79.  The Dow industrials easily ran its string of consecutive weekly gains to eight by rising 44.39 points, or 1.7%.  The S&P 500 and the Dow equity index both added 1.3% during the week, while the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 1.1%  Actively traded blue-chip issues showing strength included General Motors, which went up 1 1/8 to 47 7/8 on Big Board composite volume of 2.5 million shares; General Electric, up 1/2 to 58 5/8 on 1.5 million shares, and Union Carbide, 3/8 higher to 29 3/8 on 2.2 million shares.  Other standout advancers among blue chips included Philip Morris, which gained 2 1/8 to 161 1/8, and Woolworth, which rose 1 3/8 to 68 5/8.  UAL jumped 10 to 278 as investor Marvin Davis provided details of the financing for his $275-a-share takeover offer.  Mr. Davis has announced a plan to borrow $7 billion in bank financing from two units of Citicorp; in addition, a Davis family partnership will provide $1 billion of equity.  Other airline issues rallied along with UAL, the owner of United Airlines; the gains resulted in another all-time high for the Dow Jones Transportation Average, which rose 19.20 to 1467.99.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, jumped 1 7/8 to 79 1/8; Delta Air Lines added 1 to 77 3/4, and Southwest Airlines gained 5/8 to 26 3/8.  BankAmerica went up 7/8 to 32 1/2 on 2.4 million shares.  Dean Witter Reynolds repeated its buy recommendation on the stock and said it expects the company to increase the dividend by as much as 50% in January.  Phillips Petroleum climbed 1 3/8 to 29 1/2 in the third consecutive day of heavy trading, fueled by ongoing takeover speculation.  The stock was also the New York Stock Exchange's most active, with nearly three million shares changing hands.  Speculative buying spread to other oil issues as well: Unocal rose 1 7/8 to 52 1/2, Kerr-McGee advanced 1 1/8 to 49 1/2, Louisiana Land & Exploration rose 3/4 to 42 and Tosco gained 1 5/8 to 21 3/8.  Several stocks that had rallied earlier last week on takeover-related buying were among the market's losers.  Maytag fell 1 1/4 to 25 1/4 on 2.1 million shares, Holiday retreated 1 1/2 to 81 1/2 and International Minerals & Chemical tumbled 2 3/8 to 52 5/8.  Campbell Soup plunged 3 1/4 to 50 1/4 as its restructuring plans, calling for the closing of four U.S. plants and the elimination of about 2,800 jobs, cooled speculation about a possible offer for the company.  Marion Laboratories fell 1 1/8 to 34 5/8 after Dow Chemical completed its $38-a-share tender offer, the first phase of a two-part transaction in which Marion will merge with Dow's pharmaceutical unit.  Tiffany jumped 5 to 59.  In an appearance on Cable News Network, financial reporter Dan Dorfman said the company's stock may be under accumulation by a potential suitor and mentioned an estimated takeover price of $80 a share, or about $700 million.  Tiffany said it has received no takeover bid.  Motel 6 rose 5/8 to 15 7/8.  Michael G. Mueller, an analyst at Montgomery Securities, told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report the partnership could be sold for as much as $30 a unit, based on the price Holiday obtained for its Holiday Inn chain.  Federal-Mogul jumped 2 3/4 to 26.  Nortek received federal clearance to acquire more than $15 million of its common shares.  Separately, the company completed a joint-venture agreement with G. Bruss G.m.b.H. & Co., a West German firm.  Amax dropped 3/4 to 28 3/4.  Falconbridge withdrew its recommendation of the company's takeover proposal and endorsed a rival offer for Falconbridge, made jointly by Noranda Inc. and Trelleborg AB.  Spain Fund went down 7/8 to 17 3/8.  The Wall Street Journal reported that even bullish analysts and money managers are puzzled that the mutual fund has been trading at a premium of more than 33% to its net asset value.  OHM gained 3/4 to 13 3/4.  The company said its O.H. Materials unit was awarded a five-year federal contract, worth as much as $50 million, to clean up hazardous waste sites.  The American Stock Exchange Index dropped 0.27 to 381.18, reducing its gain for the week to 0.5%.  Texas Air, by far the most active issue on the Amex, advanced 7/8 to 20 3/4 on 2.1 million shares.  Chairman Frank Lorenzo said the company may consider selling a minority or controlling stake in its Continental Airlines unit.  Sooner Federal Savings & Loan Association said it will write off the $34.5 million in good will carried on its books, contributing to a year-end net loss of $90 million to $95 million.  The Tulsa, Okla., thrift said its decision to write off the good will acquired when it bought two insolvent Texas thrifts in 1982 results from a review of the Texas operations and the current business environment.  Further, the company said the move is in the spirit of recently passed thrift legislation.  After the write-off of good will and additions to loan-loss reserves for the year ended June 30, Sooner Federal said it will have negative regulatory capital of $11.9 million and negative stockholder equity of $36.2 million.  The company said a conservator or receiver could be appointed to manage the thrift "some time in the future."  Sooner said the write-off of good will increased its fourth-quarter loss to $66.9 million but said an estimated $5 million to $10 million could be added to reserves before the final audit is completed.  In the fourth quarter last year, Sooner had a net loss of $4.8 million, including a $3.6 million gain from early repayment of borrowings.  For fiscal 1988, Sooner had a net loss of $14.9 million, after a $3.6 million gain from early retirement of borrowings.  K-H Corp., formerly Fruehauf Corp., said it expects Varity Corp. to seek "a very substantial reduction" in the $655 million it originally agreed to pay to acquire K-H.  A spokesman for K-H said no dollar figure was mentioned when Varity executives informed K-H of their intentions.  Varity officials declined to comment.  Varity has said the price K-H received from the sale of Fruehauf's trailer and maritime operations and the Fruehauf name to Terex Corp. appeared to be $25 million to $35 million less than originally expected.  "We're sure this request is connected to that apparent shortfall," the K-H spokesman said.  Wilbur Ross of Rothschild Inc., who represented Freuhauf bondholders in the negotiations with Varity, said preferred shareholders and bondholders aren't likely to offer Varity any further concessions.  Neither group "feels that we should be giving up anything else," Mr. Ross said.  "If it is a problem, it's one for the common shareholders to solve.  If they can't, we're not averse to the idea of restructuring K-H on a stand-alone, independent basis.  We don't need the Varity deal."  Mr. Ross said bondholders would receive less than face value for their holdings under the agreement with Varity, while preferred shareholders agreed to swap their dividend-yielding stock for common of Varity, which doesn't have a dividend.  "This was all very hotly negotiated last time, and there wasn't a lot left on the table," Mr. Ross said, adding that because interest rates have come down since the agreement was reached, his group's bonds are technically worth more now.  But Mr. Ross said neither side has broken the agreement yet and that Varity may decide to go ahead with only minor adjustments.  The K-H spokesman said it is unlikely the transaction will close in late September as originally expected.  In trading on the New York Stock Exchange Friday, Varity, a Toronto-based farm machinery and auto parts maker, closed at $2.75, unchanged, and K-H at $2, unchanged.  Colorocs Corp., Norcross, Ga., said it expects to "break even on an operating basis" for the third quarter, as a result of strong demand for its recently launched color copiers.  The company, whose stock surged 63% last week, said it also expects to report a $7 million gain on the sale of Savin Corp. Series C preferred stock and $500,000 in dividend income, resulting in per-share profit of about 55 cents for the quarter.  It posted a loss a year earlier.  The company also estimated that revenue for the quarter will be about $5 million, and that fourth-quarter revenue will be $10 million to $11 million.  It expects fourth-quarter operating income of $800,000 to $1.1 million, or 6 cents a share to 8 cents a share, its first quarterly profit from operations.  It said full-year net would be about 60 cents a share to 65 cents a share.  Colorocs's shares rose 50 cents to close at $10 in national over-the-counter trading Friday.  Last Monday, the shares had opened at $6.125.  They rose steadily starting Tuesday because of a story in The Wall Street Journal that said the color-copier market may be about to take off.  At dusk every summer evening, as a tornado of bats spirals skyward from the inky maw of Carlsbad Caverns, Milford Fletcher and Ronal Kerbo go to work.  Counting them.  For three years, the two scientists have been working on a government project based on the premise that the size of the bat population is an indicator of the health of the ecosystem.  But using the naked eye to count the devilish-looking flying mammals -- blink and you've missed a thousand -- is no mean feat.  "How . . . do you count a million bats?  People don't know what a million looks like," laments Mr. Fletcher, chief scientist for the Southwest region of the National Park Service.  Scientists have relied on primitive and unpleasant methods of estimating bat populations.  One measures guano deposits.  Another involves counting bats roosting upside down on the ceiling.  That wakes them -- and isn't fun for counters, who must brave dark caves filled with nasty beetles and a constant rain of guano.  So the scientists are developing a "non-intrusive" method of tabulating the Mexican free-tailed bats.  The scientists videotape the bats against the blue sky as the creatures leave the cave at dusk, then use a computer program to count the number in each frame.  Though the exercise may seem as futile as debating how many angels fit on the head of a pin, the scientists say they're learning valuable lessons, such as the effects of pesticides -- which they blame for slashing the caverns' bat population to fewer than 250,000 from an estimated six million in the 1940s.  The primary culprit appears to be DDT, which although outlawed in the early 1970s is still found in the dry New Mexico soil that serves as hatching grounds for insects the Mexican Free-Tails eat.  One type of bat, the Long-tongued, is also threatened by bootleg tequila makers, who harvest young agave cactuses -- a food source for the bat.  The scientists hope one day to use their bat-counting system world-wide to measure other effects of man on bat colonies.  But such applications may be a ways off.  "The system," concedes Mr. Kerbo, the cave-resources specialist, "is still getting the bugs worked out of it -- or, should I say, the bats."  Cambridge BioScience Corp. said it agreed to purchase certain assets of closely held Angenics Inc., a developer of advanced technology for diagnostic tests.  Terms weren't disclosed for the agreement, in which Cambridge, a biotechnology company, will acquire all of Angenics patent rights, technologies, licensing contracts, and products under development.  With the acquisition, Cambridge predicted a short-term drag on earnings because of costs associated with additional development work.  Cambridge said it doesn't expect to see a major revenue contribution from the acquisition until 1990.  For the first half, the company reported revenue of $4.9 million.  The two companies agreed in March to develop jointly tests for use in detecting various infectious diseases.  The transaction includes the transfer of an undisclosed number of Angenics staff to Cambridge.  It is expected to close in September.  A group including New York investor Julian Robertson said it lowered its stake in Tosco Corp. to the equivalent of 3.64% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the group said it made net sales of 78,500 shares of Tosco convertible Series E preferred stock from July 17 to Aug. 17 for $47 to $55.75 each.  It now controls 444,965 Tosco common shares, assuming conversion of preferred.  The group didn't give a reason in the filing for lowering its Tosco stake.  Tosco, an independent refiner based in Santa Monica, Calif., hadn't any comment on the group's action.  Back in his university days, Shuzo Nakashima thought Marxism offered the best hope for Japan.  Nowadays, he'd rather line up behind free-market proponents such as Ronald Reagan and Margaret Thatcher.  "Japan's corporate structure should be more free," says Mr. Nakashima, a 40-year-old attorney in Tokyo's Hijiribashi Law Office who specializes in securities law.  He argues that cross-shareholdings among big corporations may lend stability to corporate Japan but conspire against small investors.  And investors, he says, deserve better.  The theme of shareholder rights is becoming a big deal here, ever since U.S. investor T. Boone Pickens Jr. rocked the Japanese establishment earlier this year with a tussle over control of a Japanese company in which he was the biggest shareholder.  Now, home-grown advocates of individual investors are creeping into the limelight with some long-ignored ideas.  The rising champions are cause-conscious lawyers such as Mr. Nakashima.  "The Ministry of Finance doesn't do anything to help individual investors," declares Seijiro Watanabe, a 48-year-old lawyer who has spent a good portion of his career defending small investors against the abuses of big brokerage firms.  Mr. Watanabe, who runs his own shop in the heart of Tokyo's busy stock market district, argues that market manipulation, churning and insider trading are rampant here but that the courts and Finance Ministry officials turn a blind eye to such practices -- at the expense of small investors.  "They say if an investor loses money it's his fault, not the broker's," he says.  Mr. Watanabe has tried to fight that notion by taking on at various times all of Japan's so-called Big Four securities firms in a series of account-churning cases.  "They all know me," he says.  So far, he hasn't scored any major courtroom victories.  But he's settled some important cases out of court, he says.  In a recent case, a 60-year-old woman lost about 36 million yen ($251,000) as a result of what he said was her broker churning her account.  The woman didn't want to endure a long and expensive trial, however, so Mr. Watanabe helped to negotiate a settlement.  For Mr. Nakashima, on the other hand, the crusade is largely personal; ever since he wrote his thesis on cross-holdings at Tokyo University's prestigious law department, he has been preaching the doctrine of free markets and floating shares to anyone who will listen.  That's a hot topic these days; next month, Washington plans to take up the issue in discussions with Tokyo on structural barriers in the Japanese market.  In the long run, Mr. Nakashima says that cross-shareholdings are harmful because they allow management to remain static and unresponsive.  "Management can't ignore shareholders completely, but there's no real pressure on them to change," he says.  Moreover, he says that the system allows companies to swap shares without any fear of diluting their shareholder structures, since friendly companies usually take up their allotments of new shares in order to maintain close ties.  That perpetuates the stagnation, he says.  But while the cross-shareholding system may hurt small shareholders, Mr. Nakashima doesn't count on it to lead to many landmark lawsuits.  On several occasions, though, he has teamed up with Mr. Watanabe to fight for investor rights in churning cases.  "The rights of shareholders are so low," he says.  The cause of shareholder rights got a big boost earlier this year when Mr. Pickens, the Texas oil man and self-described shareholder rights proponent, raised some sensitive questions about the way Japan treats the investors who put their money into Japanese stock.  In essence, what Mr. Pickens discovered is what many Japanese investors have known and lived with for decades: that being a shareholder in a Japanese company doesn't carry any benefits but skimpy dividends and the chance to reap capital gains.  Not long after Mr. Pickens returned to the U.S., the shareholder rights issue heated up again.  But this time the fight was started not by a foreigner but by one of Japan's own wealthiest investors, Shuwa Corp. Chairman Shigeru Kobayashi, who made a fortune and his name buying up Japanese and U.S. real estate.  Leading Mr. Kobayashi's legal battle is Hiroyuki Kawai.  At first glance, Mr. Kawai's efforts on behalf of a flamboyant businessman might seem a somewhat less-than-ingenuous attempt to help the little guy.  But like Messrs.  Nakashima and Watanabe, Mr. Kawai gets excited at the prospect of assaulting and overthrowing Japan Inc.  "We aren't just fighting for Shuwa's interests," the 45-year-old lawyer says determinedly.  "We are fighting for the whole stock market's interests."  Mr. Kawai's greatest victory came last month, when he persuaded the Tokyo District Court to invalidate a longstanding practice among Japanese companies of issuing heavily discounted shares to dilute the holdings of unwanted investors and thwart their influence.  The ruling came after two medium-size supermarket chains, Chujitsuya Co. and Inageya Co., issued cross-shareholdings to each other at about one-quarter to one-third prevailing market prices.  They said they wanted closer business links.  But the intent was to dilute the holdings of Mr. Kawai's client, Mr. Kobayashi, who had built up significant minority positions in both retailers and wanted to combine them.  In a hectic week of hearings, Mr. Kawai and his firm, Kawai, Takeuchi, Nishimura & Inoue, flooded the court with documents and arguments against the share swap.  "The companies' reasoning for a share swap was perfect, but the price they concluded was ridiculous, crazy," he says.  The court agreed, and blocked it.  It was a landmark decision, and one that delights Mr. Kawai.  With a broad grin and frenetic rustling of papers to explain his arguments, Mr. Kawai says the decision was essential to protect the growth of both shareholder rights and mergers and acquisitions in Japan.  "If we had lost," he says, "many companies would have done new share issues, causing confusion in the market."  Share prices would have sunk -- hurting small and big investors alike -- and the nascent practice of corporate mergers and acquisitions would have dried up.  Instead, he says, thanks to the decision, "The market value is the standard."  Mr. Kawai, a graduate of Tokyo University, admits that the timing of his case may have helped.  "I think there are a lot of environmental changes taking place in Japan, and we took advantage of it 100%."  But, he adds, "These are very important, significant economic issues."  Friday isn't going to be a good day for economists to leave early for a long holiday weekend: four major indicators are due out, including the strategic jobs report.  The August employment data are expected to continue depicting a firm economy -- after some quick arithmetic to account for the impact of the telephone workers' strike.  Before lunchtime Friday, the job statistics will be joined by reports on the index of leading indicators for July, as well as the August purchasing agents' index and construction spending during July.  Between now and then, there will be data on: revised second-quarter real gross national product, July new home sales, personal income and personal consumption, savings rate, manufacturers' orders and August farm prices.  But it is the jobs data that form the cornerstone of everyone's economic forecast at the moment.  The consensus view calls for the strike-adjusted employment payroll to rise a bit, at 180,000 jobs from July's 169,000, according to MMS International, a unit of McGraw-Hill Inc., New York.  The actual number reported by the Labor Department is expected to be about 68,000, reflecting the impact of the strike by about 152,000 workers.  "Everybody will immediately add 100,000 or so" jobs, said Michael Moran, chief economist at Daiwa Securities America Inc., New York.  "It will be a busy morning Friday, that's for sure," he added.  The August unemployment rate is expected to be 5.3%, not much different from July's 5.2%.  The unemployment rate is culled from a household survey that doesn't include people on strike.  The head count on nonfarm payroll growth is gathered from a company survey that does reflect striking workers.  If the (adjusted) numbers come out as expected "it shows that the economy is still advancing at a good pace and a recession is not on the near-term horizon," said Mr. Moran.  After the initial math problem, economists will be curious to see the level of manufacturing employment.  Robert Dederick, chief economist at Northern Trust Co., Chicago, is skeptical of the strength shown by the large manufacturing payrolls, particularly because of other signs that manufacturing has cooled.  "I'm suspicious of the rise.  It may be we pay for it in the August numbers," said Mr. Dederick.  He is particularly alarmed by the number and depth of revisions.  July was the third month in a row the Labor Department substantially revised upward the estimate of business payrolls -- a figure watched nervously by financial markets because it influences Federal Reserve policy.  "We're all shell-shocked by the revisions," added Mr. Dederick.  He noted the revisions "make me gun-shy about predicting anything on the downside.  I guess I'd have to say no recession is imminent."  But he added that the new debate "isn't between slow growth and recession, but between slow growth and solid growth.  The market could be shocked by either one or the other because of the implication for interest rates."  Close on the heels of the jobs data comes the purchasing agents' index.  Last month the two statistics were at odds, since employment figures indicated strength and the index predicted a declining economy.  The index of leading indicators, which has been declining in recent months, is expected to bounce up about 0.3% in the July report, largely because of robust financial markets and money-supply figures.  Further evidence of strength is expected tomorrow when the government releases revised figures on second-quarter GNP.  The MMS survey found that economists expect the revision to show the economy grew 2.4% in the quarter, not the 1.7% earlier estimated.  July personal income and consumption are also thought to have been stronger than the previous month.  Estimates call for both to rise 0.7%.  In June, income rose 0.3% and consumption was flat.  Just about the only indicator that could present some "downside" is the July report on factory orders due out Thursday.  Lawrence A. Kudlow, chief economist at Bear, Stearns & Co., New York, distrusts the "restimulation perception" that the economy is still perking.  "There is belt-tightening all over the place in this economy.  I don't believe the interest-rate decline up to now is nearly sufficient to restimulate economic activity," he said.  The consensus view believes July factory orders dropped 0.7%, although some economists predict an even steeper decline will be reported.  Mr. Kudlow holds that Detroit's effort to woo buyers with discounts has kept car sales high and contributed to the perception of restimulation.  "I believe, regrettably, we're going to flirt with recession," Mr. Kudlow said.  ---  @ Closely Watched Reports  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended August 25  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @ Money Supply  @ M1 -- Week ended  @ Aug. 14 (in billions) $774.6 -$4.2  @ M2 -- Week ended  @ Aug. 14 (in billions) $3,133.4 +$1.1  @ M3 -- Week ended  @ Aug. 14 (in billions) $4,012.0 +$1.5  @ Durable goods orders  @ July (in billions) $122.90 -1.9%  @ New jobless claims  @ Week ended Aug. 12 323,000 +1.9%  @ New car sales  @ Mid-August total  @ vs. year ago 178,414 +5.4%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  @ Real GNP (Tues.)  @ 2nd quarter, revised  @ New home sales (Tues.)  @ July  @ Personal income (Wed.)  @ July  @ Personal consumption (Wed.)  @ July  @ Savings rate (Wed.)  @ July  @ Farm prices (Thurs.)  @ August  @ New jobless claims (Thurs.)  @ Money supply (Thurs.)  @ Manufacturers' orders (Thurs.)  @ July  @ Employment, payroll (Fri.)  @ August  @ Unemployment rate (Fri.)  @ August  @ Leading indicators (Fri.)  @ July  @ Construction spending (Fri.)  @ July  @ Purchasing agents' index (Fri.)  @ August  Steinberg Inc.'s two top executives resigned, as expected, following a successful bid by Socanav Inc. for the Montreal real-estate and food-retailing concern.  Until last week, Socanav was a small Montreal shipping company.  Steinberg said a new senior management team will be announced Wednesday.  Irving Ludmer, 54 years old, was president and chief executive officer.  Arnold Steinberg, 56, was executive vice president, finance and development.  Both also resigned from the board.  A Steinberg spokesman said Mr. Ludmer will remain at the company for 60 days and Mr. Steinberg for an unspecified period as special consultants.  Separately, Socanav said it sold its 60% interest in a gasoline-retailing concern to Sofati Ltd., Socanav's privately held parent.  Heinz C. Prechter, chairman of ASC Inc., Wyondotte, Mich., said he reduced his stake in Security Bancorp Inc. to 4.76% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Prechter said he sold 105,000 shares on Aug. 16 for $21.28 a share, lowering his position to 487,199 shares.  Mr. Prechter didn't give a reason for lowering his stake in Southgate, Mich.-based Security Bancorp.  EyeDentify Inc. said it entered an agreement to sell its Cardkey Systems unit to Wartsila Security for $40 million in cash.  EyeDentify is a unit of Portland, Ore.-based PacifiCorp.  Cardkey makes cards that open hotel room doors and other types of doors.  EyeDentify purchased the concern in 1986.  Wartsila makes locks and locking systems for business uses.  The company is a division of Oy Wartsila AB, Helsinki, Finland.  Workers at Chrysler Corp.'s St. Louis No. 2 assembly plant overwhelmingly voted to consider a new work schedule that would add a third crew of hourly workers, and thus significantly boost production of the company's profitable minivans.  Members of United Auto Workers Local 110 voted 1,113-600 to reopen their contract for talks with Chrysler over the proposal.  If adopted, the work plan would be a first in a U.S. auto assembly plant.  Under the proposal presented by Chrysler and supported by United Auto Workers union officials, the St. Louis plant would employ three crews on two shifts a day.  Each crew would work 10-hour days over a staggered four-day week.  The work schedule would let Chrysler run the plant 20 hours a day for six days a week, which would translate into significantly higher production of the extended-body minivans built there.  U.S. auto plants typically operate with two eight-hour shifts working five-day weeks unless soft sales force layoffs or strong sales require costly overtime production.  The St. Louis No. 2 plant has used overtime extensively in recent years because it is the only plant that builds the popular extended-body minivans for Chrysler.  According to Chrysler officials, hourly employees on the two shifts at the St. Louis plant work a maximum of 54 hours a week a shift.  That means the plant can currently operate only 108 hours a week at most.  But under the so-called "three-crew, two-shift" plan, the plant could operate up to 120 hours a week without paying workers any overtime.  With overtime work, Chrysler planners have estimated the company will get 212,753 extended-body minivans from the St. Louis plant during the 1990 model year that begins Oct. 1.  Chrysler builds regular-sized minivans at a plant in Windsor, Ontario.  Altogether, Chrysler expects to build nearly 480,000 1990-model minivans, which are one of its most profitable models.  Chrysler officials said that under the proposed system the company could get an extra 50,000 to 75,000 minivans a year out of the plant.  They also said changes to the plant required to accommodate the new scheduling would also allow Chrysler to build regular minivans as well as extended-body models.  As a result, Chrysler could get at least an additional $250 million in gross profit from the added production alone.  That is based on analysts' estimates that Chrysler get $5,000 to $6,000 in gross profit on each minivan sold.  The added output also would help Chrysler fend off heightened competition from new minivans by General Motors Corp. and Japanese auto makers.  A three-crew, two-shift system similar to Chrysler's proposal is now used at two of GM's seven European assembly plants.  At Antwerp, Belgium, GM is getting the same output from one plant that it used to get from two.  GM's seven-year-old Zaragoza, Spain, plant has been working five days a week, 24 hours a day for about a year, with the midnight to 8 a.m. shift working about half the rate of the other two shifts to allow for maintenance.  Still the Zaragoza plant produces about 361,000 vehicles a year.  In contrast, GM used two plants on conventional two-shift schedules last year to assemble only 287,000 Pontiac Grand Prix and Oldsmobile Cutlass Supreme coupes.  Slow sales of those cars prompted frequent temporary plant shutdowns.  But the three-crew, two-shift schedules have drawbacks and detractors, even inside Chrysler.  The higher output means additional maintenance is needed on the plant's equipment.  But the scheduling leaves less time for repairs, which worries some Chrysler manufacturing officials.  While UAW members enthusiastically agreed to hear more about the proposal, they may ultimately find it undesirable because it seems to eliminate all overtime, which has substantially supplemented the income of St. Louis No. 2 workers in recent years.  "Everybody in this plant is just beat from all the overtime we've worked," says Charlie Sides, recording secretary for Local 110.  "But a lot of the workers are going to want time-and-a-half pay for the hours over eight they're working each day even if they're only working 40 hours a week."  It's unclear whether Chrysler will agree to such terms.  Still, the UAW is backing talks on the proposal because it could help the union save jobs if layoffs hit nearby Chrysler plants.  One plant likely to close if Chrysler needs to trim its capacity is the St. Louis No. 1 plant that builds LeBaron and Dodge Daytona coupes next door to the minivan plant.  According to Local 110 officials, Stan Marshall, vice president of the UAW's Chrysler department, said the proposed schedule at the minivan plant could give jobs to between 600 and 800 St. Louis No. 1 plant workers if needed.  The proposal would increase employment at the minivan plant by as many as 1,200 jobs to 4,500.  Mr. Marshall couldn't be reached Friday.  One Valley Bancorp. of West Virginia Inc., Charleston, W.Va., said it signed a letter of intent to acquire Farmers & Citizens State Bank of Clendenin, W.Va., for $160 a share, or an indicated $2.4 million.  Farmers & Citizens had assets of about $51 million and deposits of about $47 million as of June 30.  Farmers has 14,720 shares outstanding.  The transaction is subject to a definitive agreement by the boards of both banks and various regulatory authorities.  One Valley said it expects the acquisition to be completed by early next year.  Pension funds are missing a good bet by overlooking high-yield junk bonds, which often outperform stocks and aren't any more prone to sharp price swings than good-quality corporate bonds.  That's the message being preached by Wilshire Associates, a Santa Monica, Calif., consulting firm that advises some of the nation's biggest pension funds where to put their money.  A new report distributed to Wilshire's clients -- which include many giant public-employee funds -- suggests that they allocate as much as 5% of their portfolios to buying junk bonds.  Pension funds currently have about only 1% of their money in junk bonds, and most shun them altogether.  The recommendation is sure to cause a stir among what is one of the nation's most conservative investor groups.  Worries persist about how the companies that issue bonds at high interest rates will weather a recession.  Curbs on junk investments by savings institutions were contained in the thrift industry bailout bill passed by Congress this month.  And similar caution about whether to buy junk bonds should apply to pension funds, some experts believe.  "If you ask yourself would you do it with your own money, I think the answer almost certainly would be no," says Columbia University Professor Louis Lowenstein, a critic of junk financing in leveraged buy-outs.  But Wilshire thinks otherwise.  It says many investments already held by cautious institutions "have a much higher risk level than that of high-yield bonds, including some types of real estate, oil and gas partnerships and venture capital."  Based on their 15-year performance and adjusted for the risk of defaults, junk bonds should earn 2.9 percentage points more than Treasurys with comparable maturities, it says.  The current spread is roughly five points.  For Wilshire, the question of whether to invest in junk bonds is particularly sensitive because many of its clients are public-employee pension funds.  Public funds are more likely than corporate funds to restrict their investments to high-quality securities.  Some states have laws limiting bond investments of their public funds to the top three grades of credit rating services, for example.  "We've got a lot of clients that will never do this," Stephen L. Nesbitt, Wilshire's head of pension consulting, says of junk investing.  "For a lot of foundations and public funds, this crosses the line of political acceptability."  Nevertheless, junk bonds now represent the fastest-growing securities market, and getting too big for many pension funds to ignore, says Wilshire.  Various estimates put the size of the junk market as high as $200 billion, accounting for a third of all corporate bonds outstanding.  Twenty five money managers specializing in junk bond portfolios posted an average return of 14.6% last year, according to Wilshire.  That compares with 7.9% for the Shearson Lehman Hutton Aggregate Bond Index, composed of Treasurys, investment-grade corporate bonds and mortgage-backed securities.  Over the three years ended in 1988, the average return was 11.5% against 8.5% for the index and the five-year average was 13.7% compared with the index's 12.5%.  Along with the growth in the junk market has come a buildup in the size and number of junk-bond money managers offering their services to big investors.  The 25 junk managers followed by Wilshire, which include all the leading managers in the field, is double the number of three years ago, when Wilshire issued a report also endorsing junk bond investments.  Kemper Group, the largest junk bond manager, has nine analysts concentrating on junk issues and is hiring two more.  "As much as we read a lot of negative stories, behind the scenes there is a healthy interest being generated" in junk by retirement, charitable and educational funds, says George Klein, a junk portfolio manager for Kemper's Kemper Asset Management unit.  Still, winning broad acceptance is slow, particularly among public pension funds, which are among the largest potential junk investors.  "Governmental agencies need a lot of convincing," says Mr. Klein.  Pension funds are thought to hold about 15% of the junk bonds outstanding.  By comparison, insurance companies hold about 30% of the junk market, while mutual funds and other money managers account for another 30%.  A General Accounting Office study last year, which put the amount of pension fund investments in junk bonds at about 1% of their total assets, reported that regulators hadn't encountered problems so far with pension fund investments in junk.  But their exposure is still relatively small.  "While there may be areas where institutional investors are heavy hitters, this isn't our ballpark," says Sarah Teslik, executive director of the Washington-based Council of Institutional Investors, made up mostly of public pension funds.  Junk returns over the past 15 years have been four percentage points higher than Treasurys, while default losses averaged 1.1% to produce the 2.9% adjusted spread between junk and Treasurys, according to Wilshire.  Generally, junk managers have had no trouble besting the Shearson aggregrate bond index, although they fell short in 1982 and 1984.  The going rate for services of a junk manager is one half of 1% of the assets in the account, meaning a $25 million portfolio would carry an annual fee of $125,000.  But Wilshire found some big variations in fees: New York-based Magten Asset Management Corp. charges $250,000 a year on a $25 million junk account, while Kansas City, Mo.-based Waddell & Reed Asset Management Co. is at the low end of the scale with a $93,750 fee on such an account.  @ ---  @ The Biggest Money Managers in Junk  @ High-yield assets under management on Dec. 31, 1988, in millions of dollars  @ PENSION FUND TAXABLE  @ & OTHER TAX- INVESTMENT MUTUAL  @ EXEMPT ACCOUNTS ACCOUNTS FUNDS TOTAL  @ Kemper $ 100 $2,800 $1,350 $4,250  @ Fidelity 1,168 32 1,689 2,889  @ Delaware  @ Investment 900 1,000 700 2,600  @ Caywood  @ Christian 450 1,850 - 2,300  @ Waddell & Reed - 345 1,550 1,895  @ Massachusetts  @ Financial 350 - 1,050 1,400  @ Wellington 14 - 1,331 1,345  @ Travelers Keystone 22 255 1,042 1,319  @ Cypress Asset  @ Management* 830 448 - 1,278  @ Lord Abbett 368 102 800** 1,270  @ * Formerly Solomon Asset Management  @ ** Includes some convertible securities  @ Source: Wilshire Associates  In a long-planned transition, Knight-Ridder Inc. said that James K. Batten will succeed Alvah H. Chapman as chairman Sept. 20.  Mr. Batten, 53 years old, will continue as chief executive officer of the giant newspaper, television and electronic-information concern, and will turn over the post of president to P. Anthony Ridder Sept. 20.  Mr. Ridder, 48, will continue as president of Knight-Ridder's Newspaper division, a job he has held since 1986.  Mr. Chapman, 68, had stayed on as chairman almost 18 months beyond the company's normal retirement age of 67 at the board's request last year.  The board had asked him to oversee certain projects, especially the company's protracted battle for a Joint Operating Agreement between Knight-Ridder's Detroit Free Press and Gannett Co.'s Detroit News.  Knight-Ridder, based here, vowed it would close the loss-ridden paper in the absence of such a pact, which would permit the combination of advertising, circulation and production operations.  Former Attorney General Edwin Meese approved the JOA against the recommendations of the Justice Department's Antitrust Division and an administrative law judge.  An ad hoc citizens group challenged that decision, and the U.S. Supreme Court is expected to hear arguments on the case this fall.  Following his retirement, Mr. Chapman will continue as chairman of the executive committee and a member of the board and also will be a consultant to the company.  The changes at the top of Knight-Ridder were expected.  Mr. Batten, who took over as chief executive officer in April 1988, was Mr. Chapman's handpicked successor for the chairman's post, and Mr. Ridder was his choice for president.  Messrs.  Batten and Ridder are longtime Knight-Ridder executives.  Scandinavian Airline Systems and an unidentified partner are the investors interested in buying all or part of Continental Airlines from Texas Air Corp., and talks are at an advanced stage, according to those familiar with the situation.  Texas Air chairman Frank Lorenzo disclosed late last week that he would consider selling a stake in the Continental unit, but didn't give any details.  A spokesman for SAS in Stockholm refused to comment, as did a spokesman for Houston-based Texas Air.  It's still not known who SAS's partner is, how much money may be involved or what percentage of ownership in Continental is being discussed.  But the parties have been discussing the form of a possible sale and terms for some time, and now have reached the point of trying to draft a letter of intent, according to one source.  Currently, SAS holds a 9.9% stake in Texas Air as part of the marketing arrangement with Continental and Texas Air announced last fall.  The talks are an outgrowth of meetings that began between SAS and Continental officials in June 1988, when the two began work on the joint marketing agreement.  Those talks turned to SAS and its partner possibly buying a stake in Continental, and that aspect has been pursued with new seriousness in the past 30 days, the source said.  It is understood that the talks heated up of late because of signs that Continental could remain profitable after massive losses in 1987 and 1988 and the soaring value of airline stocks.  Most airline stocks have taken off this year in the wake of a $3.5 billion buy-out of NWA Inc., Northwest Airlines' parent, and a $6.19 billion offer for UAL Corp, parent of United Airlines.  Texas Air's stock price has doubled since Jan. 1, but Wall Street appeared to react cautiously to the disclosure that Texas Air might sell a piece or all of Continental.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Texas Air rose only 87.5 cents to $20.875, on volume of 2,117,000 shares.  Eastern Airlines, Texas Air's other airline unit, now in bankruptcy proceedings, wouldn't be involved in any Continental transaction.  From time to time there has been speculation that Mr. Lorenzo might eventually try to merge Continental with ailing Eastern, which is trying to revive its flight operations after a bitter strike that led to its bankruptcy filing in March.  SAS itself wouldn't be able to buy Continental outright because of U.S. Transportation Department rules that prevent foreign companies from having more than a 25% stake in a U.S. airline.  So, any transaction that might come of current talks would have to be structured in a way that SAS has a minority holding.  That means if a deal is pursued, its structure might be similar to the sale last month of NWA, according to someone familiar with the SAS-Texas Air talks.  Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi bought NWA with some equity financing from KLM Royal Dutch Airlines and Elders IXL Ltd. of Australia, who contributed $480 million.  The two foreign airlines came out with less than 20% of the voting interest in the new company because most of their stake is held in preferred stock.  SAS's purchase of its 9.9% stake in parent Texas Air last year was a friendly transaction.  SAS paid $56 million for the stock, and agreed to pay Texas Air an additional $50 million over several months as the agreement goes into effect.  SAS chairman Jan Carlzon also sits on Texas Air's board.  Mr. Carlzon apparently believes he made the right decision to link up with Continental, according to one person who discussed the move with him recently.  But, that source said, in the same conversation Mr. Carlzon conceded that he was concerned about the negative view many people have of the tough-minded Mr. Lorenzo, his Texas Air empire, and Eastern.  Separating Continental from Eastern might solve part of that problem for SAS.  SAS is 50%-owned by the governments of Sweden, Denmark and Norway.  In Europe, its hub is Copenhagen.  Since purchasing the Texas Air stake last October, SAS has operated in the U.S. out of Continental's new terminal at Newark international airport in New Jersey.  The two airlines coordinate schedules, frequent-flier programs and sales forces.  SAS also runs a training program for Continental.  SAS is preparing for the competition expected in Europe after market barriers come down there in 1992.  Anticipating a frenzy of activity similar to what occurred in the U.S. after deregulation, SAS is seeking alliances that may bring it passengers.  Since October, SAS has bought 24.9% of Airlines of Britain PLC, owner of four U.K. carriers and 40% of Intercontinental Hotels Corp., from Japan's Seibu/Saison Group.  SAS also is backing an investor group trying to buy 51% of Chilean flag carrier LAN Chile from the Chilean government.  SAS options could give it 35% of that carrier by 1991.  SAS has loose marketing agreements with Thai Airways International and All Nippon Airways and owns 25% of the European Amadeus computer reservations system.  ---  Susan Carey in Brussels contributed to this article.  Franklin Electric Co., Bluffton, Ind., said its shareholders approved a $50 million recapitalization plan designed to convert the shares of the company's founding family into preferred stock.  Under the plan, shareholders will receive a $25 distribution for each common share and will have their common stock converted to recapitalized shares that aren't expected to pay a dividend in the foreseeable future, according to the company.  Holders may elect to receive additional reclassified shares in lieu of cash.  Franklin said the plan would assure "the continuing independence of the company for the foreseeable future."  Continental AG, Frankfurt, West Germany, said pretax profit climbed 11% in the first half, to 165.5 million marks ($84.5 million) from 148.5 million marks a year earlier, on higher earnings from technical products.  The tire maker said full-year profit is likely to exceed last year's 195 million marks.  The company said it will pay an unchanged 1989 dividend of eight marks a share.  First-half sales rose 8.8% to 3.97 billion marks from 3.65 billion marks.  For all of 1989, revenue is expected to rise 7% to 8.5 billion marks from 7.91 billion marks.  The company said the major factor in the rise was the success of Contitech, Continental's technical rubber products division, where six-month sales rose 20% from a year earlier.  The unit, which generates about 20% of the company's revenue, is benefiting from large-scale investments made in recent years to upgrade its machinery and a reorganization at the start of the year, Continental said.  Peter Cundill & Associates Ltd., a Hamilton, Bermuda, investment management firm, said it raised its stake in Oppenheimer Industries Inc. to 8.4% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Peter Cundill said it holds 367,000 Oppenheimer common shares, including 85,000 shares purchased from June 28 to Aug. 1 for $3.965 to $5 a share.  The filing didn't give a reason why Peter Cundill increased its stake in Oppenheimer.  In a previous filing, the firm said it holds its Oppenheimer stock for investment purposes.  Oppenheimer is based in Kansas City, Mo.  Philadelphia Electric Co. received a federal license to operate its Limerick No. 2 nuclear unit at full power.  The Nuclear Regulatory Commission issued the licence.  The decision cleared a significant hurdle for the No. 2 unit, which was completed ahead of schedule and $300 million under budget.  Philadelphia Electric said it expects the unit to be operating at 20% power by mid-September and at 100% by the end of December.  The utility also had another roadblock lifted.  Philadelphia Electric reached a settlement agreement with Limerick Ecology Action, which had opposed the issuance of such a license because of environmental concerns.  Lomas Financial Corp. said it is considering the sale of additional assets to help repay debt over the next two years.  The Dallas real estate and financial services concern said it hopes it will be able to sell some of its real estate and possibly some parts of its short-term lending portfolio.  But Lomas also is considering selling other assets, including its life insurance unit.  It recently sold its credit card unit and is seeking a buyer for its leasing subsidiary, as part of a plan to reduce its debt to about $2 billion from a peak of about $5.6 billion.  Lomas said it is continuing negotiations with its bank lenders on a $1.1 billion secured credit facility that would mature Aug. 31, 1991, and hopes to close the transaction Friday.  It said a draft has been circulated to the bank group, led by Chase Manhattan Bank and Bank of New York.  If Lomas can't complete the facility by then, it said that it will try to arrange a $145 million bridge loan to repay publicly held debt maturing Sept. 1 and that it hopes the financing, if needed, can be arranged.  Lomas said the new credit line should give it enough funds for continuing operations.  Dutch aerospace group Fokker NV said it plans to increase production of its F-100 fanjet airliner to 67 aircraft a year, to take place "in principle" in the Netherlands.  Separately, NV Koninklijke Nederlandse Vliegtuigenfabriek Fokker reported that earnings in the first half of this year more than trebled to 14.1 million guilders ($6.4 million) from 4.3 million guilders in the first half of 1988.  The decision to extend Dutch jet production effectively means a rejection of a Lockheed Corp. proposal to build and carry out final assembly of F-100's at its plant in Marietta, Ga.  Still, talks are continuing with Lockheed and other U.S. aircraft manufacturers on possible future component manufacture and sub-assembly, said a spokesman for the 31.8% Dutch-state-owned carrier.  The Fokker group's plant at Schipol Airport near Amsterdam is capable of producing a maximum 46 F-100's annually.  Fokker's revenue in the first half rose 23.8% to 1.35 billion guilders from 1.09 billion guilders a year earlier.  Pretax operating profit before interest income and charges and the results of participating interest rose 23.2% to 47.67 million guilders from 38.70 million guilders.  On a clear day in a bull market, some investors can see stock prices rising forever.  Maybe that's why most A&W Brands holders aren't cashing out of the root-beer maker's shares after a huge run-up, and why they remain bubbly about prospects for further gains in the stock.  A&W, trading over the counter under the symbol SODA, has soared 55% since year end.  Both the Dow Jones Industrial Average and the Nasdaq Composite Index have risen by less than half that percentage.  Moreover, A&W now sells for a lofty 24 times projected 1989 earnings, while Coca-Cola and PepsiCo, the industry leaders, both trade at sub-20 multiples.  Yet A&W still is a Wall Street darling.  It is one of the stocks most widely recommended by securities analysts for current purchase, according to Zacks Investment Research.  A&W's champions cite its tremendous cash flow, rapidly declining debt, sparkling earnings outlook, and appeal as a possible takeover candidate.  "We like A&W for the long term," Larry Greenberg, beverage analyst at Fidelity Investments, says.  Fidelity's Magellan Fund holds shares in A&W.  "It's uniquely positioned and has excellent management," he says.  "It's a recession-resistant holding with predictable earnings and good cash flow."  But analysts do expect profit growth to slow, after more than quadrupling to 81 cents a share last year.  For 1989, they look for about a 42% gain to roughly $1.15 a share, with a slower gain of about 26% next year to $1.40 or $1.45.  A&W makes concentrate not only for root beer, but for A&W cream soda.  It also makes concentrate for Squirt grapefruit-flavored soda, Country Time lemonade drink in cans and Vernors ginger drink.  Analysts admire the niche the company has carved out for itself in the fiercely competitive soft-drink industry.  A&W's products, as part of the "noncola" segment of the soft-drink market, don't compete directly with Pepsi and Coke, which together have 70% of that market.  M.L. Lowenkron, A&W's president and chief executive officer, says two of A&W root beer's biggest customers are Coca-Cola Enterprises -- the nation's largest Coke bottler -- and the giant network of Pepsi-owned bottlers.  A&W, the market leader among root beers, does have competition.  It goes head to head with brands such as Coke's Ramblin', PepsiCo's Mug, and Procter & Gamble's Hires.  But "the root beer wars aren't as intense as the cola wars," Emanuel Goldman of PaineWebber says.  As for A&W's hefty multiple, bullish analysts say the stock really isn't so rich, if operating cash flow is considered.  They figure that the $1.15-a-share profit forecast for this year translates to $1.60 a share, on a cash-flow basis, shrinking A&W's multiple to 17 from 24.  Investors were unnerved by the Aug. 16 disclosure that United Brands, where Carl Lindner is chairman, might sell off a 7.8% A&W stake.  A&W stock then slid 1 3/4, to 28.  The A&W soft-drink operation was a United Brands subsidiary between 1971 and 1983.  The United Brands news came two months after Hicks & Haas filed to sell 210,200 A&W shares.  The leveraged buy-out concern -- its namesakes are co-chairmen of A&W's board -- thus cut its stake to about 13% of A&W from 16%.  A New York investor who shorted A&W when it was trading around 20 still contends the shares are headed lower, though they closed Friday at 28 3/4.  Stocks that have heavy insider selling "don't make it over the long term," he says.  He and other skeptics say that although consumption of the company's soft drinks continues to grow faster than the industry average, the gains have slowed to about an 8% annual rate from 18% a year ago.  Bears say growth could ease even more, because the national rollout of A&W's root beer and cream soda products is over.  They also warn that A&W remains vulnerable to competition from Coke and Pepsi, if those two masters of marketing ever get serious about root beer.  But Mr. Lowenkron, the A&W chief executive, says his company is up to the challenge.  "We spent $100 million developing and marketing A&W," he says.  "Coke and Pepsi manage big brands very well.  We have the capacity to think small."  And much of Wall Street isn't buying the bearish story.  "We're not buying A&W at these levels, but we're holding the position we have," Ray Hirsch, a portfolio manager at American Express's IDS Financial Services in Minneapolis, says.  "The multiple is a problem, but our feeling is that there's still good earnings momentum."  ---  A&W Brands  (OTC; Symbol: SODA)  Business: Beverage maker Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Sales: $102.4 million  Net income: $7.5 million; or 81 cents a share  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 22 cents vs. 15 cents  Average daily trading volume:  77,191 shares  Common shares outstanding: 9 million  Swire Pacific Ltd. reported that profit before extraordinary items fell 3% to 1.32 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$169 million) in the first six months of the year from HK$1.36 billion a year earlier.  The Hong Kong-listed investment holding, trading and property group, which didn't record any one-time items in the six-month period, said net income fell 25% to HK$1.32 billion from HK$1.75 billion in the year-earlier period, when HK$386 million of extraordinary gains was recorded.  In a statement, Swire Chairman D.A. Gledhill said the group's profit margins have been squeezed by increased operating costs, particularly in the area of personnel.  Lower profits were recorded in all divisions except aviation.  Priam Corp., a struggling maker of hard disk drives that store computer data, said it will cut 25% of its work force, or 230 employees, over the next month.  Sluggish demand for its products prompted the move, the company said.  In mid-August, Priam posted a fiscal fourth-quarter loss of $6 million on a 34% decline in revenue to $25.4 million.  For the year-earlier period, the San Jose, Calif., company earned $1.4 million, or six cents a share, on revenue of $38.7 million.  For the fiscal year ended July 1, the company had a loss of $25.4 million on $122.7 million in revenue.  Priam shares closed Friday at 25 cents, off 12.5 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  Dow Chemical Co., Midland, Mich., said it completed the first step in its complex plan to acquire two-thirds of Marion Laboratories Inc. -- a $38-a-share tender offer for 58.5 million Marion Labs shares.  Since 135,422,977 shares were tendered, Dow estimated it will prorate at 43% the shares it accepts for payment.  It said it will issue final proration results Sept. 8 with payment soon after that date.  Dow now has voting control of Marion.  The tender offer gave Dow 39% of the stock, and Dow now owns or controls by proxy the 23% stake in Marion owned by the family of its founder and chairman Ewing C. Kauffmann.  In the second stage of the transaction, Marion will issue 128 million new shares to Dow.  It will then give Marion all of its Merrell Dow Pharmaceuticals Inc. unit and issue to the remaining Marion holders 92 million units of a new security called contingent value rights.  When that step is completed, Dow will own two-thirds of the new Marion Merrell Dow drug company.  Plessey PLC, battling a #2 billion ($3.14 billion) takeover bid from Britain's General Electric Co. and Siemens of West Germany, said it intends to form an alliance with a Japanese semiconductor maker if it defeats the bid.  The embattled U.K. electronics company outlined a series of steps it intends to take to increase value for shareholders if they reject the bid.  In one of the major steps, Plessey said it will seek a semiconductor alliance with a leading Japanese company to provide an "exchange of complementary technologies and products as well as access to the fast-growing and innovative Far Eastern market."  People familiar with Plessey said the company is speaking with several Japanese makers but declined to comment on London press reports naming the Japanese firms as Sony, Toshiba and Matsushita Electric.  Plessey Chairman Sir John Clark also announced he would relinquish executive responsibility for the group in March if the bid is defeated.  McDonald's Corp., the folks who convinced the world that food could be fast, now faces a marketing dilemma of its own making.  Pizza.  After years of hunting for a way to slice into the pizza market, Big Mac apparently thinks it has cooked up the product to do so.  It is expanding its test of a pizza pie from one to 24 stores in the Evansville, Ind.-Owensboro, Ky., area.  With that expansion comes the first advertising support of McDonald's for its pizza.  The ads confront the problem pizza poses for the world's largest fast-food chain: how to persuade customers, who expect a few seconds' wait for a burger and fries, to cool their heels for perhaps five minutes until their pizza is ready.  With the help of ad agency Leo Burnett Inc., McDonald's thinks it has a recipe for that one as well: Pick on the other guy.  Radio and TV spots -- there won't be any print promotion initially -- focus on how long people typically wait for a pizza, either from the oven at a restaurant or from a delivery service.  In one prototype radio spot, a character called Capt. Pizza swoops down over a group of muttering youths and asks, "What's the mutter?"  The kids reply they've just figured out that by the time they turn 19 they will have spent several months waiting for pizzas.  A disturbing realization indeed.  But Capt. Pizza to the rescue.  McDonald's promises no more than a 5 1/2-minute wait, owing to a super-fast oven developed for the company.  Although McDonald's won't sell pizza by the slice and says the pie is designed for family-out dining, two of the broadcast spots are aimed at teen-agers.  That's not surprising.  A recent Iowa Poll in the Des Moines Register found that 57% of the surveyed young adults said they eat more pizza than hamburgers, reversing traditional preferences.  The newest addition to the McDonald's menu isn't called McPizza.  "It's McDonald's Pizza," a spokesman for the Oak Brook, Ill.-based company insists.  "That's because it's a traditional pizza pie, and not a specialized product like a Big Mac," which he says is so named to differentiate it from other hamburgers.  The product comes in four varieties, ranging from plain cheese to deluxe.  Only whole 14-inch pies will be sold, at prices from about $6 to $10.  The idea is to entice families, or groups of kids, into the restaurants.  But not for lunch.  Pizza will be sold after 4 p.m., to stimulate dinner-hour traffic, typically the slowest time.  As part of the current test, pizza will be sold to drive-thru customers as well, a prospect that could result in clogged parking lots and horn pushers.  But the ad campaign hopes to defuse that problem.  One pilot TV spot, which began running in the Evansville market late last week, features a Roman motif, with a breathless chariot driver rumbling up to the drive-thru window for his dinner on the go.  To emphasize the surprising speed with which the charioteer is about to be served, the ads' signature is, "the Pizza you won't believa."  In some ads the line is sung, opera-style. (Burnett used opera singing to memorable advantage in its current ads for Cheer detergent.)  The McDonald's spokesman, Chuck Ebeling, acknowledges that consumer expectations for fast food are a challenge; for example, he says, drive-thru customers may be asked to pull off to the side to wait a few minutes for their order.  But, he adds, "Our intention is to maintain our reputation for quick service.  The wait for a pizza may be a few minutes longer, but it's still extremely quick service for pizza, and it shouldn't interfere with other customer operations."  McDonald's also is looking at other ways to expand its menu.  Its restaurant in the new Skydome in Toronto is serving up a hot dog, some outlets in the Toledo market are testing a breakfast burrito, and a Southwestern-style omelet is coming soon to other stores.  And while the pizza test points to another success, the company says there are no immediate plans to take the product nationwide.  "It could go away, or go back into our test kitchen," says Mr. Ebeling.  ---  Infiniti Launches TV Ads  Nissan Motor Corp. baffled auto experts this year with print ads featuring rocks and pine trees for its new Infiniti luxury car.  Today, matching TV spots make their debut during the U.S. Open tennis tournament on CBS.  In an advertising category dominated by hard-sell pitches, Nissan has opted for subtlety.  There's no music, no catchy tagline -- there aren't even people.  Like the print ads, the TV spots don't show the car.  Instead, this "pre-launch" campaign portrays tree tops, a beach and lightning across a darkened sky, while an announcer tells of the coming of a "new concept in luxury cars."  "The campaign is based on respect for the consumer," says Peter Bossis, Infiniti's director of marketing.  The ads, created by Hill Holliday Connors Cosmopulos, Los Angeles, will run through October, mostly on news programs like "20/20" and "60 Minutes."  Nissan executives won't discuss the launch campaign, which will break in October, or whether cars will ever be featured in its advertising.  The cars won't be at dealerships until early November.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   RELATIONSHIP TERMINATED: Ricoh Corp., West Caldwell, N.J., and Chiat/Day/Mojo, New York, said they terminated their relationship.  Chiat/Day/Mojo had serviced Ricoh's office-products account since 1986.  Justamere Advertising, Andover, N.J., was named to service the "present needs" of the account.  Capital Cities/ABC Inc., New York, said a technicians union ratified a new four-year contract after six months of wrangling.  The contract, which went into effect Saturday, replaces one that expired March 31.  ABC said the new pact gives it flexibility in work rules comparable to that found at the two other major networks.  ABC said that though 18 of 19 work units had approved the contract, two radio newswriters in Chicago haven't ratified.  Nevertheless, the National Association of Broadcast Employees and Technicians signed the agreement and allowed the network to put it into effect for the remaining 2,500 employees covered by the union.  The union primarily represents engineers, camera operators and tape editors, though it also covers such groups as newswriters, publicists and wardrobe and makeup personnel.  International Minerals & Chemical Corp., Northbrook, Ill., said it definitively agreed to acquire certain operations of the Stavely unit of RTZ Chemicals Ltd.  Terms weren't disclosed.  International Minerals said its Mallinkrodt Specialty Chemicals Co. is making the purchase, which is expected to be completed by Thursday.  The Stavely operation makes a product used in the production of acetaminophen, an analgesic.  Stavely has been manufacturing the chemical under a license from International Mineral's Mallinkrodt unit.  RTZ is a London conglomerate.  Rodime PLC, a Scottish manufacturer of equipment for the computer industry, reported a loss for the fiscal third quarter, primarily because of production delays at all three of its manufacturing locations.  In the quarter, ended June 30, the company had a loss of $9.1 million, compared with a $5.3 million deficit in the year-earlier quarter.  For the nine months, the company posted a loss of $33.2 million, compared with a year-earlier deficit of $8.5 million.  Sales slumped to $16.3 million from $29.8 million for the quarter and slipped to $77.9 million from $78.8 million during the nine-month period.  During the quarter, Rodime ceased disk-drive production at its Florida manufacturing facility, which resulted in production shortages that couldn't be overcome right away by the two other manufacturing plants.  However, Rodime said that it has been "greatly assisted" by its major suppliers during this "difficult period" and that it believes agreements for adequate future supply are now in place.  NCNB Corp., in a move widely interpreted as preparation for further aggressive acquisition by the banking concern, filed registration statements to sell $600 million in subordinated debt and as many as five million new common shares.  Charlotte, N.C.-based NCNB, which is still digesting its large acquisition of NCNB Texas National Bank carved from the remnants of failed First RepublicBank Corp. in Dallas, has said it intends to seek opportunities arising from the federal government's thrift bailout plan, especially in Texas and Florida.  In July, it announced the completion of the NCNB Texas purchase from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  Its hard-charging chairman, Hugh McColl, has said NCNB will be looking carefully for expansion candidates among both banks and thrifts.  In a shelf registration filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, NCNB said it plans to issue for public sale, through underwriters, $600 million in subordinated debt to be sold in multiple issues over 12 months following the effective date.  In a second filing, the banking giant said it intends to issue as many as five million new shares of common stock, which, after the initial sale, will be traded on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  The company now has about 95.6 million shares outstanding.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, NCNB shares closed at $53, up 12.5 cents.  In a statement, NCNB said it would use proceeds from the offerings for general corporate purposes, including working capital, the possible acquisition of other institutions and possible reduction of current debt outstanding.  An NCNB spokesman reiterated that the bank continues to be in an aggressive acquisition mode, but said that "we've got nothing specific on the burner at the moment."  Honda Motor Co., Tokyo, has decided to establish a European headquarters, Honda Motor Europe Ltd., in London this October, the company said Friday.  The subsidiary will be 100% financed by Honda Motor and is consistent with preparations being undertaken by other Japanese companies anticipating the creation of a unified market in Europe in 1992.  The company will be capitalized at #2 million ($3.2 million) and will employ about 100 workers.  Incorporation is slated for October, with actual operational startup in April 1990.  Honda said it hopes the move will specifically facilitate further localization, with the subsidiary serving as a "strategic liaison," cooperating with local companies and helping to further Honda's identity as a European entity.  The Japanese auto manufacturer said all European-oriented functions currently being overseen by its main office in Japan will be shifted to the new office.  Whittle Communications L.P., moving to bolster the image of its controversial proposed TV network for schools, said it formed a board of government, business and educational leaders to oversee the direction of the network, Channel One.  The hand-picked board is the latest move by Whittle's chairman and founder, Christopher Whittle, to counter the negative publicity surrounding Channel One, which aims to deliver a daily news program with two minutes of TV commercials to middle and high schools via satellite.  Whittle, which is 50%-owned by Time-Warner Inc., wants to launch the program nationwide in March 1990.  The 12-person "Council of Advisors" includes T.H. "Ted" Bell, former secretary of the U.S. Department of Education; Alex Haley, author of "Roots"; J. Richard Munro, chairman of Time-Warner; H. Ross Perot, chairman of Perot Group; Frederick Smith, chairman of Federal Express Corp., and Albert Shanker, president of the American Federation of Teachers.  Channel One's plan to sell advertising in the daily program -- which would have a captive audience of students -- has sparked a barrage of criticism and negative publicity.  Two states, New York and California, have taken formal action: The state Board of Regents in New York passed a resolution to ban the program, while California officials said they will cut some financial aid to schools that take Whittle's program.  The schools and other critics oppose Whittle's plan to sell ad time in the program.  Mr. Whittle said the council was "critical" for keeping the TV program in line with the "needs of educators and students."  The group will meet twice a year in person and frequently in "phone consultation," according to Mr. Whittle.  "The group will be a signal to local educators across the country that people with important track records view this project as important," he said.  The board may not be entirely friendly.  At least one member, AFT's Mr. Shanker, whose organization represents more than 700,000 U.S. teachers, said he continues to oppose airing TV commercials in the schools and criticized the quality of Channel One's news programming.  "My being on the board is not an endorsement of the program.  I am not encouraging schools to take the program," said Mr. Shanker.  "I don't think the kids watching Channel One learn much about current events.  It's very good entertainment but not very good education."  Asked whether he thought Mr. Whittle's plan will succeed, Mr. Shanker said, "I don't think it's in great shape."  Some board members are more friendly, however.  Mr. Munro is co-chief executive of Time-Warner, which as Time Inc. last year purchased the 50% stake in Whittle Communications.  Federal Express's Mr. Smith is a customer of Whittle Communications.  This fall, Federal Express will be the sole sponsor and advertiser in a new series of hardcover books from Whittle called the Larger Agenda.  Whittle also faces some competition.  Turner Broadcasting System Inc. has begun offering a 15-minute, commercial-free daily news program for middle and senior high schools, called "CNN Newsroom."  The program is expected to be in about 1,000 schools this fall.  Despite vehement opposition from many educators, Mr. Whittle said the launch of Channel One is "well on schedule."  A 70-person Whittle sales team today begins officially signing up schools for the program.  Mr. Whittle predicts that when Channel One officially airs next March 5, it will be installed in more than 1,000 schools and by December 1990, it will be in 8,000 schools.  Whittle Communications needs to enroll between 7,000 and 8,000 schools, or reach about six million students, to make Channel One profitable.  To soothe educators and sweeten his offer to schools, Mr. Whittle in early June introduced the Educational Network, which added a channel for education programming and one designed for professional educators to the commercial-supported news channel initially planned for schools.  At about the same time, Whittle Communications paid for a massive survey from Gallup Organizations Inc. that showed the program and its use of commercials were largely acceptable to students and parents.  Friday, August 25, 1989  Following is a weekly listing of unaudited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.57 16 1/4 - 16.96  @ Baker Fentress NYSE 28.91 23 7/8 - 17.42  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.49 7 3/8 - 13.13  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b10.62 8 3/8 - 21.14  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 21.01 17 - 19.09  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.73 12 7/8 + 32.32  @ General AmerInvest NYSE 22.39 18 1/4 - 18.49  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.41 9 5/8 - 7.54  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 16.96 14 - 17.45  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 10.00 8 1/4 - 17.50  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.89 14 1/2 - 18.95  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.51 9 5/8 - 16.38  @ Quest for Value Cap NYSE 17.59 12 1/2 - 28.94  @ Quest for Value Inco NYSE 11.70 12 5/8 + 7.91  @ Royal Value Trust NYSE 11.25 9 7/8 - 12.22  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 12.10 10 3/4 - 11.16  @ Source Capital NYSE 43.04 41 3/4 - 3.00  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 30.00 24 1/2 - 18.33  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 21.77 18 - 17.32  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.68 11 3/4 + 0.60  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 8.88 8 3/8 - 5.69  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.16 9 7/8 + 7.81  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.51 9 5/8 + 1.21  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.53 10 + 4.93  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 8.33 9 + 8.04  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Season OTC 5.79 5 1/4 - 9.33  @ America's All S Inco OTC z z z  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.68 9 5/8 - 0.57  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 24.39 21 7/8 - 10.31  @ ASA Ltd. NYSE bc57.93 42 5/8 - 26.42  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 13.45 12 7/8 - 4.28  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.98 19 1/8 - 12.99  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 63.25 59 - 6.72  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.66 9 3/4 - 16.38  @ Brazil NYSE 19.24 11 - 42.83  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.57 5 1/4 - 50.33  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.53 11 3/4 + 23.29  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.52 19 3/8 - 13.97  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b4.99 5 + 0.20  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.90 10 3/8 - 19.57  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.70 10 5/8 - 16.34  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 11.17 10 3/8 - 7.12  @ Duff & Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.48 8 1/4 - 2.71  @ Ellsw Conv Gr & Inc. AMEX 8.98 7 3/4 - 13.70  @ Engex AMEX 14.00 10 - 28.57  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 21.22 20 1/4 - 4.57  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.92 9 3/8 - 14.15  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 11.68 11 - 5.82  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.30 9 5/8 - 6.55  @ France Fund NYSE b12.42 11 7/8 - 4.39  @ Gabelli Equit Trust NYSE 14.56 14 - 3.85  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.67 8 7/8 - 8.22  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE b10.07 8 - 20.56  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.63 9 7/8 - 15.09  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b49.09 48 - 2.22  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.88 11 3/8 - 11.68  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f13.56 14 1/4 + 5.09  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.74 9 7/8 - 15.89  @ Korea Fund NYSE 19.06 39 1/2 +107.24  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.47 11 3/4 + 2.44  @ Meeschaert G&C MWSE 8.10 8 - 1.23  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b12.16 12 - 1.32  @ Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE 10.66 9 1/8 - 14.40  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.85 10 3/8 + 5.33  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE 30.22 25 1/2 - 15.62  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.36 10 1/8 - 10.87  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.72 8 5/8 - 1.09  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.84 9 1/8 - 7.27  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 15.12 16 + 5.82  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE z z z  @ Spain Fund NYSE 13.99 17 3/8 + 24.20  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b40.73 38 1/2 - 5.48  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b9.04 8 1/4 - 8.74  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b12.22 12 - 1.80  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.77 9 5/8 - 10.63  @ Thai Fund NYSE 16.19 19 3/8 + 19.67  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE 12.17 10 1/4 - 15.78  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.45 14 1/2 + 0.35  @ a-Ex-dividend.  B-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. d-NAV reflects $1.54 per share for taxes. f-As of Wednesday's close. z-Not available.  Gatoil S.A.'s President Khalil J. Ghattas, a key suspect in connection with the Kloeckner & Co. oil trading case, can be extradited to West Germany, according to a Swiss Supreme Court decision.  The high court rejected an appeal by the Lebanese oil figure that sought to block a decision by the Swiss Justice Ministry to hand him over to West German authorities.  Mr. Ghattas, 58 years old, was arrested in Geneva in March at the request of authorities in West Germany, and a formal extradition request was submitted May 31.  The Swiss Justice ministry granted the request June 26.  He is accused of leading an illegal oil-trading scheme that cost West Germany's Kloeckner & Co. 600 million marks ($306.8 million).  A spokesman for the Swiss Justice Ministry said Friday that Mr. Ghattas is expected to be extradited to West Germany in "a couple of days."  Meanwhile, he said, Mr. Ghattas remains in jail in Geneva.  A Gatoil spokesman said no immediate reaction to the decision was available.  TEXAS AIR IS in serious talks with SAS and an unidentified partner about the sale of all or part of the U.S. company's Continental Airlines, sources said.  The Scandinavian carrier holds 9.9% of Texas Air as part of a marketing arrangement.  The parties to the talks are said to be trying to draft a letter of intent.  ---  UAL's chairman told employees to prepare for a possible change in ownership of the United Airlines parent.  Its management and pilot union, meanwhile, are apparently near an accord on a plan for a joint buy-out.  ---  Milken arranged for his children to make millions of dollars from warrants meant solely for buyers of Storer preferred stock, according to people familiar with the U.S. probe of the ex-Drexel executive.  A Milken spokesman denied any wrongdoing.  ---  Meridian Bancorp offered to acquire First Pennsylvania for $704 million in stock.  The bid leaves uncertain the status of the Philadelphia bank company's three-year-old merger accord with Marine Midland Banks.  ---  Avis Europe recommended its shareholders accept Cilva's takeover offer that values the car-rental firm at $1.41 billion.  Cilva is owned by Lease International, GM and Avis Europe's former U.S. parent, Avis Inc.  ---  Profit-taking followed Thursday's record close of the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  The 30-stock index dropped 2.28 to 2732.36.  Broader market gauges posted sharper declines.  ---  A proposed accounting change could discourage banks from making big additions to their loan-loss reserves because that would jeopardize their quarterly dividend payments.  ---  Government regulators found no conflict of interest among the Chicago Board of Trade directors who voted last month to force Ferruzzi to liquidate its holdings in soybeans.  ---  Orders for machine tools totaled $190.9 million in July, down 25% from a year earlier and 21% from June.  ---  Fed policy makers meeting in July overwhelmingly agreed to ease interest rates but were split on how fast to proceed, agency minutes show.  ---  The number of indicted traders to cooperate with the U.S. commodities probe appears to be fewer than expected.  Three traders pleaded guilty Friday and 12 pleaded innocent.  ---  Falconbridge's directors announced their support of a $1.81 billion tender offer by Noranda and Trelleborg.  The board withdrew its recommendation of a lower bid by Amax.  ---  Taiwan agreed to let the U.S. monitor its use of driftnets to fish in the North Pacific, but a similar U.S.-Korean accord remains elusive.  ---  Chrysler workers at a St. Louis facility voted to consider the creation of a third work crew, which would be a first for a U.S. auto assembly plant.  Ford Motor is idling for one week the plant that builds its Mercury Cougar and Ford Thunderbird coupes.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 165,930,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2732.36, off 2.28; transportation 1467.99, up 19.20; utilities 218.37, off 0.95.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3286.90, off 8.00.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 131.48, up 0.18; spot index 130.21, up 0.36.  Dollar: 143.95 yen, up 0.65; 1.9625 marks, up 0.0050.  The parent company of the Los Angeles Business Journal and the San Diego Business Journal said it agreed to acquire the Orange County Business Journal from Scott Publications Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.  The company, CBJ Inc., Kansas City, Mo., intends to immediately convert the publication from a biweekly to a weekly, double the size of its editorial staff and convert it to paid subscriptions, according to Donald L. Keough, senior publisher in charge of California operations.  The publication is currently delivered free to 20,000 readers.  Charles Heschmeyer was named publisher.  He was editor and general manager of the Denver Business Journal.  CBJ purchased the Los Angeles and San Diego publications in April 1988 from American City Business Journals.  The offices of the Orange County Business Journal will be relocated from Santa Ana to Irvine or Newport Beach, the company said.  U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills began a process that could lead to trade retaliation against Norway for canceling a U.S. company's contract to provide equipment for a Norwegian toll-road project.  Amtech Corp., Dallas, complained July 11 that the Norwegian government transport ministry was discriminating against it.  Earlier, the city of Oslo had decided to award a contract to Amtech and a Norwegian company to provide about $15 million of equipment to be used on the new ring highway around that city.  But the transport ministry overruled the decision and said the contract should go instead to another group of bidders that included Siemens AG, a West German electronics company.  Ms. Hills said Friday that the Norwegian government is reviewing the cancellation of the Amtech contract.  "We would expect Norway to treat the U.S. firm fairly," she said.  She added that U.S. officials will undertake discussions with Norway about the alleged violations of the procurement code of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, which governs international trade.  Under the provision of U.S. trade law Ms. Hills invoked, Section 301, she has up to one year to try to resolve the dispute.  Section 301 authorizes retaliatory trade actions if such disputes aren't settled.  Burger King Corp., Miami, plans to add a sister company's ice cream bars to its menu on a test basis.  The fast-food chain said it will begin selling Haagen-Dazs bars in 38 company stores starting next month.  Haagen-Dazs and Burger King are owned by Grand Metropolitan PLC, which acquired them as part of its purchase of Pillsbury Co. last year.  Before the acquisition, some Burger King franchisees, as well as Wall Street analysts, had expressed disappointment that there wasn't more cross-merchandising of Pillsbury products among its units.  Haagen-Dazs dessert products in Burger Kings seemed a natural, some franchisees had contended.  The six-month test will be held in the Boston, Dallas and Columbus, Ohio.  Homestead Financial Corp. said it suspended dividends on its common stock to help ensure it can meet the tougher capital requirements laid out in the massive thrift bailout bill passed earlier this month.  Homestead had been paying quarterly dividends of 6.25 cents per Class A common share and 3.75 cents per Class B common.  Homestead said suspending the payouts will save it about $2.5 million a year.  Homestead has been shrinking radically to bolster its capital ratio, which has eroded because of years of poor performance.  Homestead, which had assets of about $5 billion as of June 30, said it intends to reduce assets to about $3.4 billion by Sept. 30 through sales of mortgage-backed securities and other assets.  Homestead had a net loss of $17.7 million for the first six months of 1989.  The bailout law requires thrifts to have a ratio of tangible capital to assets of 1.5% and to boost their tangible capital ratios to 3% by 1994.  A Homestead spokesman said the company expects its level of tangible capital to be between 1.75% and 2% when the asset sales are completed by the end of the quarter.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Homestead Class A stock closed at $4, up 25 cents.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered its rating on about $103 million of this refining concern's subordinated debentures to single-B-3 from single-B-2.  The rating concern said the downgrade recognizes Tesoro's poor earnings and other factors.  Moody's said that while the company maintains a high degree of liquidity, it has omitted payment of preferred stock dividends for two quarters because of operating losses, and that future dividend payments may be limited, in line with the requirements of certain bank facilities.  Moody's said a recapitalization or restructuring of Tesoro, or both, is likely, whether or not Harken Energy Corp. of Dallas is successful in its bid to acquire the company.  ---  ZAPATA Corp. (Houston) -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered to Ca from Caa, the rating on about $42 million of subordinated debt of this energy concern.  The rating concern said the action is in response to the company's suspension of interest payments on the bonds.  Zapata defaulted on the debentures in 1986, but was able to resume interest payments during 1988 in line with an agreement with lenders, Moody's said.  Housing and Urban Development Secretary Jack Kemp said he will propose regulations that could result in the denial or termination of federal rental assistance to people involved in illegal drug traffic or other criminal activity.  A person wouldn't have to be convicted of a crime to be denied participation in federal housing-voucher or certificate programs, a department spokesman explained.  Substantial evidence indicating the use or sale of drugs or participation in violent criminal activity would be enough to allow local public housing officials to deny service under the proposed rules, he said.  Current regulations permit the denial of the rental assistance programs only when the tenant allows the housing unit to be used for drug dealing.  "I am determined that federal taxpayers will not be required to subsidize the rent of drug dealers and users or violent criminals," Mr. Kemp said in a statement.  "The only housing subsidies for felons should be provided by local jails, and state and federal prisons."  The regulations would allow family members of someone involved in felonious conduct to continue receiving assistance if that person didn't reside in the housing unit.  In deciding cases, local public housing authorities could consider how denial or termination of a subsidy would affect family members not involved in the illegal activity, according to a HUD statement.  UAL Corp. Chairman Stephen M. Wolf told United Airlines employees to prepare for a possible ownership change amid indications that management and the pilots' union are nearing an agreement on a plan for a management-employee buy-out.  Details of the possible agreement weren't available.  However, pilots' union leaders have scheduled a series of meetings for tomorrow and Wednesday to discuss recent developments.  Union leaders and management were said to be moving closer to an accord on a plan for employees to acquire an ownership stake in connection with a management-led buy-out effort.  The UAL board is also expected to meet this week to give its latest response to Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, who unveiled a financing plan Friday for his $275-a-share, $6.19 billion offer for UAL and set a deadline of Thursday for the board's response.  The labor-management talks seemed aimed at reaching a preliminary agreement in time for that deadline.  UAL and the pilots' union have been working on a framework in which UAL employees would trade contract concessions for employee ownership under a management-led buy-out or recapitalization.  The talks have left room for a possible equity infusion from a foreign airline such as British Airways PLC, which has expressed interest in a minority stake.  The UAL-pilot talks have also left room for the involvement of other UAL employee groups, which include machinists, flight attendants and other non-contract employees.  One scenario that has been discussed calls for UAL management to attempt to persuade the other groups to join the pilots' effort.  Both UAL and the pilots' union declined to comment.  On Aug. 14, pilots' union leader Frederick C. Dubinsky advised his members in a letter to get ready to make an investment in the airline to avoid a takeover by an outsider.  "Someone is likely to buy this airline," he said.  "The only choice is whether we buy it for ourselves or someone else."  However, the machinists have been lukewarm to the idea from the start, and many people have said a long-running feud between the pilots and machinists could hamper negotiations on a management-employee deal.  As if to underscore its independence from any UAL-pilot agreement, one machinists' union adviser, Brian Freeman, met with Mr. Davis in Los Angeles Friday.  And in a letter sent to UAL's board Friday, union leader Louis R. Schroeder said the International Association of Machinists plans to take "all appropriate action available" to keep UAL in its current form.  People close to the situation say the company and pilots' union were hoping to hammer out an agreement that the other labor groups would find acceptable.  But Mr. Schroeder's letter said the machinists "will neither accept a fait accompli . . . nor be stampeded into unnecessary or imprudent action."  He also said the machinists' union will oppose any transaction that doesn't guarantee job protection for its members.  The pilots have been pursuing an equity stake in United ever since making a takeover bid for the company in 1987, when they committed about $300 million from their retirement fund and said they were prepared to negotiate an equivalent amount in concessions.  One reason the machinists are less interested in an equity investment is that they are generally paid less and therefore tend to have less discretionary income.  The machinists' union also has been more openly hostile to Mr. Wolf than the other labor groups have been lately.  Mr. Schroeder and other machinists' union officials have criticized him for failing to take measures earlier to protect UAL from a takeover.  Mr. Wolf, who wasn't available for comment, has given the impression of being interested in a buy-out.  Machinist leaders say they asked Mr. Wolf to consider giving employees an ownership stake months ago but that he refused.  Mr. Wolf's apparent willingness to consider such a course now in connection with a management-led buy-out "is clearly Machiavellian," one union official said.  The UAL board would have to take any management-pilot agreement into account as it weighs Mr. Davis's bid for the third time since it was disclosed Aug. 7.  It could stall by saying it will continue to explore its options, it could put the company on the block by soliciting bids, or it could state a preference for a labor-management deal.  With the management-pilot talks entering a critical stage over the weekend, Mr. Wolf began readying employees for a possible ownership change in a question-and-answer memorandum distributed Friday.  Asked in the internal memo whether a change in ownership is inevitable, Mr. Wolf said the sharp rise in UAL's stock has created "an expectation" of change among shareholders.  He said the "nature of our investors has changed" to include many professionals seeking immediate returns.  "Many on Wall Street would say these circumstances will force the status quo to change," Mr. Wolf said.  The UAL chairman reminded employees that the board has a legal obligation to "ensure that stockholders' values are maximized."  Usually, that language is understood to mean a sale or other transaction that results in the highest possible stock price, as opposed to a defensive tactic that would cause the stock price to fall.  Mr. Wolf said possible outcomes include a sale to Mr. Davis or to another party, an employee stock ownership plan or "a combination of these."  He added, "Alternatives are still developing."  However, he indicated that he wants to keep the company on its current course.  "I have made it quite clear that I am committed to continuing the course of improved financial strength and growth we have worked so hard at starting to achieve," he said.  Without the type of labor agreements United has been working toward, other potential bidders such as Mr. Davis, Texas investor Robert Bass and the leveraged buy-out firm of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. would be at a distinct disadvantage.  "The UAL thing is going to be decided by Wolf and the board and not by an outside bidder," one investment banker said Friday.  "You can bid till you're blue in the face, but if management doesn't want you, it's not going to do that much good."  Mr. Davis's $8 billion financing package includes $7 billion of bank debt to be arranged by two units of New York-based Citicorp, as well as $1 billion in equity financing from a Davis family partnership.  Mr. Davis said the equity financing is also expected to include "other domestic and foreign participants," which could eventually include a foreign airline.  He also said he plans to offer equity to "key members of UAL's management" and to invite all UAL employees to participate via an employee stock ownership plan.  The financing Mr. Davis unveiled wasn't a firm commitment but merely an outline of what he envisions.  He is understood to have paid Citicorp more than $5 million for the use of the bank's name.  His announcement caused UAL's stock to surge $10 a share to $278 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday after traders concluded that UAL was likely to respond by Mr. Davis's Thursday deadline.  ICN Pharmaceuticals Inc., Costa Mesa, Calif., said it agreed to form a joint venture with China National Medical Corp. and ACB International Inc., Los Angeles, to make the drug Ribavirin in China.  ICN said the venture would first build a manufacturing facility in Shanghai and may eventually invest $30 million.  As part of the agreement, ICN said it would purchase at least 50% of the output of the venture for export outside China.  ICN said the venture initially will produce 10,000 kilograms a year of the drug, with the intention of increasing production to 100,000 kilograms a year.  Ribavirin could be used to combat hepatitis in China, the company said, though the drug is not approved for that purpose in the U.S.  Rosewood Property Co. said it agreed to sell its Hotel Hana-Maui and ranch properties in Hana, Hawaii, to a group including Sekitei kaihatsu Co. of Japan.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Closely held Sekitei acquired the Hotel Bel-Air in Los Angeles from Rosewood this year for an estimated $110 million, or a record $1.2 million a room.  It operates luxury hotels, restaurants and resorts in Japan.  The properties, on Maui, include a 97-room luxury hotel and a surrounding 4,700-acre ranch.  Rosewood, based in Dallas, has owned the property since 1984.  Rosewood, owned by oil heiress Caroline Hunt, also owns the Mansion on Turtle Creek and Hotel Crescent Court in Dallas and manages the Hotel Bel-Air.  Rosewood said it is negotiating to continue managing the Hotel Hana-Maui.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S TREASURY  @ Today  $14.4 billion of 13-week and 26-week bills.  @ CORPORATE  @ One Day This Week  Alco Health Distribution Corp. -- offering of $175 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Brite Voice Systems Inc. -- initial offering of 1.5 million common shares, via Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood Inc.  Chart House Enterprises Inc. -- initial offering of 3.8 million common shares, via First Boston Corp.  Delta Air Lines -- offering of approximately $274 million of eqiupment trust ceritifcates, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Tuesday  Illinois -- $70 million of Build Illinois sales tax revenue bonds, Series J, with serial bonds and serial and/or term bonds, via competitive bid.  @ One Day This Week  Dormitory Authority of the State of New York -- $262.1 million of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center revenue bonds (tax-exempt commercial paper mode), Series A-D, via Goldman, Sachs & Co. Houston -- $112,390,000 of water and sewer system revenue bonds, 1989 Series A&B, via a PaineWebber Inc. group.  State of New York Mortgage Agency -- $90 million of homeowner mortgage revenue bonds, Series EE2 and Series HH2 alternative minimum tax (AMT), via a Goldman Sachs group.  St. Mary's Hospital Authority -- $55 million of hospital revenue refunding bonds, Franciscan Health System Hospitals Issue, via a Merrill Lynch group.  Pending Triborough Bridge & Tunnel Authority, N.Y. -- $150 million to $250 million of general purpose revenue bonds, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Indefinite (Competitive) Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, and $100 million of consolidated bonds, 66th Series, both via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  Meridian Bancorp offered to acquire First Pennsylvania Corp. for about $704 million in stock.  The offer leaves uncertain the status of an earlier merger agreement between First Pennsylvania and Marine Midland Banks Inc.  If consummated, the merger of the two bank holding companies would create the fourth-largest banking operation based in Pennsylvania, with combined assets of about $16.5 billion and more than 265 branches.  Under the Meridian proposal, First Pennsylvania shareholders would receive Meridian stock valued at $18 for each First Pennsylvania share outstanding.  First Pennsylvania has about 39 million shares and share equivalents outstanding.  Meridian officials declined to discuss details of the offer or to explain how the bid would be financed.  The Meridian proposal was announced in mid-afternoon Friday.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, First Pennsylvania's stock closed at $15.75 a share on Friday, up $1.875.  In over-the-counter trading, Meridian's stock closed at $25.25 a share, down 37.5 cents.  Samuel McCullough, chairman and chief executive of Reading, Pa.-based Meridian, said that it was his idea to make the proposal, but he said the transaction is "far from done."  The primary obstacle is an existing agreement between Philadelphia-based First Pennsylvania and Marine Midland, a unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. of Hong Kong.  Under that agreement, signed in 1986, Marine Midland can acquire First Pennsylvania for a minimum of $15 a share in cash anytime after March 4, 1990.  The merger was expected to be completed in 1991.  As of Dec. 31, Marine Midland held warrants which, if exercised, would give it about 25% of First Pennsylvania's common stock.  Meridian said Marine Midland agreed to "certain accommodations with a view of facilitating Meridian's proposal."  For its part, Marine Midland said, "The Meridian offer is obviously more advantageous to First Pennsy than ours, and we wouldn't stand in the way of a transaction."  A Marine Midland spokesman declined to say what the accommodations were or to disclose any terms of the pact between Marine Midland and Meridian.  He wouldn't indicate whether Marine Midland will receive any compensation from Meridian if the earlier merger agreement is dissolved, but he said, "There would be no financial disadvantage to Marine Midland."  First Pennsylvania has sent mixed signals as to which deal it prefers.  In a statement, the company said its position "continues to be that we have a merger agreement with Marine Midland which our shareholders have approved."  However, Leslie Butler, vice chairman of First Pennsylvania, called the Meridian talks "friendly," adding that "the tone, in our view, is positive."  He also said the talks have been "chairman to chairman."  It is unclear whether Marine Midland would be willing to acquire a Meridian-First Pennsylvania combination.  When Meridian's Mr. McCullough was asked if he would like to see Marine Midland take over the combined Pennsylvania banks, he replied, "No, sir."  Indeed, Meridian's offer may be a move to dissuade other banks from eyeing its assets too hungrily, particularly National Westminster Bank PLC of Great Britain, which is on the prowl for a Pennsylvania bank.  Meridian prefers to be the one doing the acquiring, having made 30 acquisitions in the last 35 years.  In the first six months of 1989, Meridian posted a net income of $45.8 million, or $1.18 a primary share.  First Pennsylvania, which mounted a strong comeback in the mid-1980s after a federal bailout of $1.5 billion, reported net income for the latest six months of $37.6 million, or 91 cents a share.  ---  Robert Guenther contributed to this article.  As Europe moves to knock down trade barriers among European Community nations by 1992, there is optimism the European currency unit will grow more active in the foreign bond and currency markets, analysts say.  The ECU, which represents a basket of European currencies, is used as a unit of account by European Community members.  There is a distinct chance that "the ECU, over time, will gradually grow in favor," says a New York economist.  The positive sentiment, however, is being tempered by deep uncertainties about the possible establishment of a common European currency someday.  The ECU, which was created in 1979, is the composite value of currencies of EC members.  The European Community comprises West Germany, Britain, France, Italy, the Netherlands, Belgium, Luxembourg, Denmark, Ireland, Greece, Spain and Portugal.  Used by European Community members for purposes including budgets and loans, the ECU doesn't exist as a hard currency.  The unit can, however, be used in the form of travelers checks, checking accounts, savings accounts, or credit cards.  The ECU, which traded at $1.0594 late Friday here, has fluctuated between about $1.02 and $1.14 so far this year.  While the unit's exchange rate represents a basket of currencies, yields on ECU investments reflect the composite value of the rates on instruments denominated in the underlying currencies.  Both the currency and rate aspects are attractive, analysts say, because they eliminate the risk that would be involved in investing in the individual currencies.  But the primary focus is currently on the ECU rate advantage, which is drawing interest in the foreign bond market.  Corporations and nations with high interest rates don't mind issuing ECU-denominated investments because they can carry out "cheaper financing" than might otherwise be necessary, says Keith Skeoch, chief economist at James Capel & Co. in London.  The market for ECU-denominated investments is attractive if the issuer is "at the upper end of the spectrum of rates," he says.  Mr. Skeoch and other economists note that the Italian government is among active issuers of ECU-denominated offerings.  Three-month ECU deposits currently yield about 9.40%, while three-month Euro lira deposits yield roughly 12%.  "I think it's increasingly likely that the ECU (issues) will be used more and more in things like trade finance" as 1992 nears, says Mr. Skeoch.  International bond issues in 1988 totaled more than $200 billion, of which ECU-denominated issues accounted for roughly $12 billion.  That level of offerings of ECU bonds was almost double the 1985 showing, when approximately $7 billion of bonds was issued.  "We hope and expect that bonds will increasingly be issued in ECUs.  We've seen a growth in the market certainly in the last 10 years," says a representative of the Washington delegation of the European Community Commission.  Amid expectations of a pickup in ECU bond activity, some analysts see the unit taking on a bigger role in the foreign exchange market -- but not likely to the degree of dominant currencies such as the dollar, deutsche mark and yen.  "As we get more and more (ECU) issues out there, more and more people will want to protect themselves" by using hedges in the foreign exchange market, says Carl Weinberg, chief economist at High Frequency Economics Inc., an international consulting firm based in New York.  ECU forward contracts are available, but ECU futures aren't actively traded on global exchanges.  "We're going to see growth if these hedging instruments increase" if the ECU bond market indeed takes off, says Mr. Weinberg.  While the ECU seems to be poised for better fortunes, some analysts warn that there are a lot of wrinkles in the move to end European trade barriers that need to be ironed out.  A main concern is a plan by European Community President Jacques Delors, which proposes the establishment someday of a single European currency and a sole European central bank.  Because it is uncertain whether or not the ECU will ever be selected as such a common currency, it may be premature to get excited about the fate of the unit, says John Lipsky, director of international bond market research at Salomon Brothers Inc. in London.  Although he concedes that the ECU is an "efficient basket of the underlying markets," he says the unit needs "the political commitment to generalize use of the ECU."  Estimating that ECU bonds have accounted for 3% of this year's total foreign bond issuance while Eurodollar bonds have made up 51%, Mr. Lipsky says he doesn't envision accelerated growth of the ECU unless it is appointed the common European currency.  "Obviously if there is a move to create a common European currency, that common currency market would likely expand dramatically," he contends.  Because the ECU comprises the value of a band of European currencies, politics could also be a drawback for the unit, says Mr. Weinberg of High Frequency Economics.  The sentiment of market participants is that the Bundesbank and the Bank of England won't be pleased with strong growth in the ECU if it means their "central bank (governing) privileges are undermined," he asserts.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The dollar rose in trading late Friday in New York to 1.9625 marks from 1.9575 marks Thursday, and to 143.95 yen from 143.30 late Thursday.  In Tokyo Monday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 144.20 yen, up from Friday's Tokyo close of 143.53 yen.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery dropped $3.80 to $360.70 an ounce.  Estimated volume was a moderate 3.2 million ounces.  Hong Kong's markets were closed today for a holiday.  Many foreign-exchange market participants anticipate more range trading for the dollar this week and particularly thin activity, as London markets are closed for a bank holiday today and U.S. participation could dwindle near the end of the week because of the Labor Day weekend.  Hibernia Corp., New Orleans, said it acquired the deposits of a small bank in Texas, giving it its first toehold in Texas.  The acquisitive banking concern, the largest in Louisiana, said it paid about $28,000 for $30 million in deposits and other assets of First State Bank, Pflugerville, near Austin.  The bank, which had been closed by federal regulators, reopened Friday as Hibernia National Bank.  The move gives Hibernia a base in Texas from which it plans to make offers for other insolvent thrifts and banks.  The company said it looks forward to expanding its Texas operations soon.  Last week, Hibernia acquired Evangeline Federal Savings & Loan Association, a Lafayette, La., thrift.  The company, which has $6.2 billion in assets, had net income for the six months of $30.6 million, or $1.15 a share, up 17% from the year before.  President Bush this week will open new fronts internationally and domestically in his anti-drug offensive.  The Bush administration will begin shipping military equipment to Colombia, under a $65 million emergency aid program announced by White House officials at the president's vacation home here.  The U.S. will send helicopters, small arms, radios, jeeps, assault boats, grenade launchers and military technicians to help Colombia fight drug cartels that have begun widespread anti-government violence in the South American country.  Meanwhile, President Bush also will summon several members of his cabinet here later in the week to set strategy for pushing the administration's broad drug-fighting plan, which Mr. Bush is to unveil Sept. 5.  The president has approved a plan that will call for the U.S. to spend about $7.5 billion a year to fight drug use and cut off drug trafficking.  The president has "signed off on the fundamentals" of his anti-drug strategy but wants to meet with top advisers to discuss operating details and strategy for selling his proposals in Congress and to the public, the White House chief of staff, John Sununu, said in an interview.  The administration's drug czar, William Bennett, Defense Secretary Dick Cheney and Attorney General Dick Thornburgh are expected to attend.  The emergency dispatch of aid to Colombia is the most significant step the administration has taken so far to try to staunch the flow of drugs at a foreign source.  The administration acted with unusual haste, after Colombian drug dealers assassinated a leading presidential candidate, bombed political offices and declared "absolute war" on the government.  The $65 million assistance package for Colombia is paid for with funds from an emergency pool of foreign aid money that the president can use at his discretion in international emergencies.  White House officials said that the expenditure is the largest single one ever made from the special fund, and that it exhausts the money available in the fund for the current fiscal year.  The money will be used to buy, among other things, 20 Huey helicopters, one Blackhawk helicopter, an undetermined number of fixed-wing aircraft and 18-man assault boats.  The equipment will help the Colombian government quickly move troops or police to sites where drugs are being shipped or processed, which U.S. officials say is one of Colombia's most pressing needs.  And, in an indication of the growing firepower of international drug cartels, the U.S. also is including some anti-tank weapons in its emergency package.  In addition, the White House spokesman, Marlin Fitzwater, said that a "small" number of U.S. military advisers and military trainers will be dispatched to Colombia to help soldiers and police forces in that country use the new equipment.  Mr. Fitzwater insisted that the U.S. soldiers will be in Colombia to "train in the use of the equipment and not there for combat advisory purposes or anything like that."  The question of U.S. troops has become a sensitive one for both the Bush administration and Colombia.  After Attorney General Thornburgh said recently that the U.S. would consider dispatching troops to help Colombia fight drugs if asked, there was a flurry of speculation that U.S. forces might be requested.  But Colombian officials were embarrassed by the implication that they might have to rely on U.S. soldiers to fight their battle with drug cartels, and President Bush himself quickly tried to quash speculation that he would send troops.  The Colombian emergency package only sets the stage for Mr. Bush to announce another dose of drug-fighting aid for Colombia and other South American countries, when he announces his broad drug-fighting plan next week.  Though the drug plan will focus most heavily on cracking down on drug use in the U.S., it also will include millions of dollars in funds to help foreign lands try to eradicate drug crops or cut off drug shipments to the U.S.  In Washington, Justice Department officials said a meeting between Mr. Thornburgh and top Colombian law-enforcement officials, planned for last week, had been postponed.  U.S. officials said that, among other problems, there are concerns about ensuring the security of the Colombian officials.  Separately, Colombian President Virgilio Barco said in an address to his country that he plans to speak before the United Nations at the end of September "to carry our message to the world community."  Vitro S.A., which has made a hostile $20-a-share tender offer for Anchor Glass Container Corp., said the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act related to the offer has expired.  That indicates federal regulators didn't see any antitrust questions in the proposed acquisition.  Separately, in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Anchor Glass said Rodney Shields, one of its shareholders, filed suit in Delaware Chancery Court seeking to block the Tampa, Fla.-based concern from using its poison pill, or shareholder rights anti-takeover plan.  The complaint filed last Wednesday accuses Anchor's directors of "self dealing" and trying to entrench themselves in their positions" by failing to adequately consider the Vitro offer.  As reported, Anchor Glass rejected the tender offer as inadequate, saying it would explore various alternatives, including a possible restructuring or recapitalization, a sale of assets, a merger or a leveraged buy-out.  The government's hard-line approach in the commodities trading investigation is working -- though not quite as quickly as some officials had predicted.  The number of traders to plead guilty and testify against others for now appears to be falling short of estimates three weeks ago of 25 or more out of the 46 traders indicted.  As of Friday, it appeared guilty pleas would number in the mid-teens.  A dozen soybean pit traders from the Chicago Board of Trade pleaded innocent Friday, and two traders and one former clerk pleaded guilty.  A yen pit trader from the Chicago Mercantile Exchange also pleaded guilty Friday.  An indication of the government's hard line, and the kind of evidence it has, came in the guilty plea of 21-year-old Michael Weiser, a former Board of Trade clerk who made about $8,000 a year working for floor brokers.  Mr. Weiser was indicted along with 18 soybean pit traders earlier this month in the sweeping federal case.  He was charged with eight counts of mail fraud and 21 violations of commodities law.  In return for his guilty plea and expected testimony against traders, prosecutors reduced the charges against him to four misdemeanors, including failing to file a 1987 tax return on his $7,784 income.  The other charges he pleaded to involved helping indicted broker James D. Nowak and others allegedly prearrange trades and make profits at the expense of outside investors.  As a clerk for Mr. Nowak, Mr. Weiser allegedly withheld orders that came in from investors, matched up the buy and sell orders, and then after trading stopped, helped create fictitious trades between the broker and another trader.  Mr. Weiser, who told federal Judge William Hart that he lives with his parents and three sisters on Chicago's west side, started at the exchange shortly after graduating from high school.  He faces a maximum sentence of one year in prison and a $100,000 fine for each of the four counts.  His lawyer, public defender Carol Brook, wouldn't comment.  The two exchanges here have traditionally done little to instill ethics in young traders and clerks.  Both exchanges have set up ethics programs since the government investigation was disclosed.  U.S. Attorney Anton R. Valukas has set a goal of convicting more than 100 individuals.  James Streicker, Mr. Nowak's lawyer, said, "Jim Nowak may have violated some Board of Trade rules.  But the evidence won't show any customers got defrauded."  Also pleading guilty were David J. Skrodski, 32, to one count of mail fraud and one illegal trade, and Craig LaCrosse, 40, to two illegal trades.  Both men are expected to testify against other traders as part of their plea agreements.  Mr. Skrodski admitted participating in a prearranged trade that was used to allegedly pass him $350 from another indicted trader Charles Bergstrom.  Mr. LaCrosse admitted getting $5,000 in a prearranged trade that allegedly included Mr. Nowak, Mr. Bergstrom and an FBI agent, Richard Ostrom, posing as soybean trader Richard Carlson.  Mr. Nowak, charged under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law with conspiracy and multiple counts of mail fraud and commodities law violations, pleaded innocent.  Mr. Bergstrom, facing similar charges, also pleaded innocent.  They were joined in pleading innocent by Scott Anixter, Bradley Ashman, William A. Barcal III, Edward Cox III, Martin J. Dempsey, Joel J. Fetchenhier, Thomas P. Kenney, Bruce W. Mittelstadt, Sheldon Schneider and John A. Vercillo.  The four remaining indicted soybean traders are scheduled to plead Sept. 7.  Judge Hart set a Feb. 5 trial date, which defense lawyers complained won't give them nearly enough time to get ready to fight the government's 2 1/2 year-old case.  "That makes it very difficult to get prepared," Mr. Streiker said.  The government plans to turn over soon to defense lawyers 323 hour-long tapes that contain conversations of traders with -- and near to -- the FBI agent posing as a trader.  There are also thousands of pages of trading records and other documents that figure in the case.  Assistant U.S. Attorney Ira Raphaelson said he doesn't yet have all the documents needed as evidence for the case.  The government began subpoenaing trading records in January.  The government expects to take two months to three months to put on its prosecution.  Society Corp., Cleveland, said its board approved a shareholder rights plan, although the financial services concern said it doesn't know of any effort to take over the company.  The rights will attach to all Society common shares currently outstanding and any issued while the plan is in effect, including those to be issued in exchange for common of Trustcorp Inc., which has agreed to merge with Society.  Society said the rights, which will be issued to holders of record Sept. 12, are designed to protect the interests of Society and its holders against coercive takeover tactics by encouraging potential acquirers to negotiate with Society's board.  Details of the rights plan will be provided in a letter mailed to holders, the company said.  Resolution Trust Corp. took over three more insolvent savings and loans, bringing to 267 the number of thrift institutions under government control.  The three thrifts, Heritage Savings & Loan, Jerseyville, Ill., with $32.9 million in assets, Home Federal Savings & Loan Association, Mountain Home, Ark., with $46 million in assets, and Denton Savings Association, Denton, Texas, with $143 million in assets, were placed in receivership.  The RTC, established by the new savings and loan legislation to sell off failed thrifts, also placed in receivership five institutions that were taken over this year.  The five are Broadview Savings Bank, Cleveland; Arrowhead Pacific Savings Bank, San Bernardino, Calif.; Gateway Savings Bank, San Francisco; Alpine Federal Savings & Loan, Steamboat Springs, Colo.; and Valley Federal Savings & Loan, Grand Junction, Colo.  The five thrifts had been in RTC conservatorship.  Most of the thrifts in the program are in conservatorship, in which daily operations are controlled by federal regulators but current owners and debtholders retain their interests pending further action.  By putting institutions in receivership, regulators wipe out the interests of stockholders and any subordinated debtholders.  All deposits up to $100,000 in the thrifts are guaranteed.  The thrifts are being taken over as part of President Bush's program to restructure the S&L industry.  COLOMBIA'S JUSTICE CHIEF QUIT after death threats, local reports said.  According to news agencies in Colombia, Monica de Greiff, 32, told President Barco she was resigning before leaving for the U.S. Friday.  A communique issued later by the presidency, however, said Barco "denied reports related to the resignation" of de Greiff.  She has been justice minister for six weeks and received death threats after the government cracked down on drug lords Aug. 18 and the traffickers, in turn, declared war on the government.  Meanwhile, an appeals court reportedly revoked an arrest order accusing a drug lord in two assassinations.  Bush will begin shipping military equipment to Colombia under a $65 million emergency aid program to help Colombia fight the drug cartels.  ---  A U.S. commercial rocket roared into space from Cape Canaveral, Fla., carrying a British communications satellite.  The launch, using a McDonnell Douglas Delta booster, was the first in a space program that started in 1986, when Reagan ordered NASA to stop launching commercial payloads after the Challenger exploded.  ---  Israel deported five Palestinians it accused of leading the uprising in the occupied territories.  Four of the Palestinians were deported to Lebanon.  The fifth, a physicist whose cause has received international attention, was expelled to France.  The deportations raise to 60 the number of Palestinians expelled during the 20-month revolt.  ---  Photos from Voyager 2 show that bizarre frozen geysers may be erupting on the Neptunian moon of Triton, spewing nitrogen crystals and organic compounds 20 miles high.  If scientists can confirm the discovery, Triton would become only the third place in the solar system known to have active volcanic eruptions.  ---  Hundreds of thousands rallied in Moldavia to demand that Moldavian be made the republic's official language.  In the Baltics, activists sent Gorbachev a telegram criticizing a directive issued Saturday.  The Central Committee had warned the republics to curb their nationalist demands, saying destructive forces could break up the nation.  --- A Reagan-Bush campaign adviser said he was paid $103,000 for work on an apartment project instead of the $25,000 he reported earlier.  The Durham, N.C., project got U.S. aid despite opposition from many HUD officials.  Lou Kitchin, Reagan's Southern political director in 1984, denies that he influenced HUD officials.  ---  Israeli jets bombed a stronghold of the pro-Iranian Hezbollah in southeast Lebanon, killing one guerrilla and wounding five, police said.  In Jerusalem, military officials reported destroying the site and said all Israeli planes returned safely.  It was Israel's ninth air raid in Lebanon this year.  ---  Chinese security forces will stop people on the streets and check their identification in a new effort to round up dissidents, the official Beijing Daily said.  The policy, which takes effect Friday, runs counter to the gradual reduction of a security presence in Beijing since the military crackdown on democracy demonstrators in early June.  ---  Sihanouk resigned as head of his Cambodian guerrilla faction before the final session of peace talks in Paris.  Diplomats at the deadlocked conference said he might be trying to distance himself from the Khmer Rouge, his allies in the resistance coalition.  But a spokesman denied the prince stepped down as president of the coalition.  ---  Savimbi met with South Africa's acting president and promised to attend an African summit in Zaire next month to try to get Angolan peace talks back on track.  On Thursday the Angolan guerrilla leader canceled a two-month cease-fire.  On Friday, de Klerk met with Zaire's Mobuto, and the two agreed to mediate between the opposing sides.  ---  Rep. Barney Frank may face a House ethics inquiry after admitting he paid for sex with a prostitute and then hired the man as a personal aide.  Sources said some of the Massachusetts congressman's fellow Democrats may seek an investigation to prevent Republicans from taking the initiative.  ---  A gout treatment may cut the cost of drug therapy for people with AIDS. Experiments in Baltimore indicate the drug, probenecid, enhances the action of AZT, the only drug formally approved for treating AIDS, and could cut AZT requirements 50%.  AZT treatment for an individual costs $7,000 to $8,000 a year.  ---  Died: Irving Stone, 86, biographical novelist, in Los Angeles, from heart failure.  Though the forms for the 1990 census are already at the printers, Congress is contemplating adding a question: Are you an illegal immigrant?  The Census Bureau, as it has in the past, is planning to count all residents of the nation regardless of legal status.  But the Senate already has voted to force the Census Bureau to exclude illegal immigrants in preparing tallies for congressional reapportionment.  A majority of the members of the House of Representatives has signaled support.  "It is wrong to apportion congressional seats by counting people who would be deported if our immigration laws were enforced," Rep. Thomas Petri (R., Wis.) said in a recent House debate.  Replied Rep. Jim Kolbe (R., Ariz.): "A very clear reading of the Constitution says that we shall count all those who are present."  Although the debate is often couched in constitutional arguments, it's largely driven by geography.  Wisconsin has few illegal immigrants; Arizona has lots.  "It boils down to regional politics," says Arturo Vargas, census-program director for the Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational Fund, one of several Hispanic organizations lobbying in favor of counting illegal immigrants.  Counting illegal immigrants in 1990 is likely to mean one less seat in the House for Pennsylvania and one more for California, according to the private Population Reference Bureau.  The Census Bureau's chief antagonist in the Senate, Sen. Richard Shelby (D., Ala.), says seats for Connecticut, Michigan, North Carolina and Alabama also are at risk.  On the other hand, Texas, Florida and New York could benefit.  "Illegal aliens are actually taking representation away from Americans," says David Ray, spokesman for the Federation for American Immigration Reform.  The Census Bureau, based on comparisons of its data with figures kept by the Immigration and Naturalization Service, estimates that it counted about two million illegal immigrants in 1980, half of them in California.  That meant one extra seat in the House for California and New York and one less seat for Indiana and Georgia.  "You end up diluting the vote when you start including illegals," says Rep. Thomas Ridge (R., Pa.), who leads the charge against the practice in the House.  Organizations that represent Hispanics are particularly worried about the congressional campaign.  They fear that any attempt to ascertain the legal status of respondents will exacerbate difficulties the Census Bureau already faces in accurately counting Hispanics and blacks.  "As it is, the Census Bureau has a tremendous challenge in trying to convince everybody that the census is confidential," Mr. Vargas says.  "If the Census Bureau attempts to ask people their immigration status, that's going to be even harder."  The Census Bureau agrees.  "We tell people: Put your name down on the census form.  We won't report you to the housing authority {if there are too many occupants}," says Peter Bonpanne, an assistant director.  "If they see a lot of questions on there about somebody's legal status, that could hurt all kinds of people's participation."  Although the 106 million census forms can be reprinted if Congress acts soon, wording a question so that illegal immigrants answer accurately is a challenge, Mr. Bonpanne says.  The bureau already plans to ask one in six respondents if they are citizens.  To satisfy congressional critics, it would have to ask everyone that question, and then ask the legal status of anyone who isn't a citizen.  Rep. Ridge dismisses the practical problems.  "We're spending billions on the census, and the only thing we get is a bunch of belly-aching about how difficult it will be," he complains.  "The primary purpose of the census is to distribute political power . . . not to gather demographic information."  The Senate, by a vote of 58-41, added a provision to a pending immigration bill to require the government to subtract illegal immigrants when it comes up with figures used for reapportionment.  Because California, Texas and other populous states that benefit from counting the illegal immigrants have such large delegations in the House, the House has always presented a bigger obstacle to the opponents of counting such immigrants.  The House did open the door to an amendment to a spending bill that would have barred census takers from "knowingly" counting any illegal immigrants, but the provision was quickly sidetracked on procedural grounds.  All sides in the debate predict a lawsuit no matter what Congress does.  In 1980, a federal appeals court upheld a lower-court decision throwing out a suit that sought to bar the government from counting illegal immigrants.  A similar suit was dismissed this year when a federal district judge in Pittsburgh ruled that the states that sued -- Pennsylvania, Kansas and Alabama -- couldn't show they had been harmed.  The Constitution simply calls for apportioning the House on the basis of the "the whole number of persons" in each state.  The Constitution originally called for counting "free persons" and indentured servants, and for counting slaves as three-fifths of a person.  That was changed with the passage of the 14th Amendment in 1868.  Only "Indians not taxed" were excluded, but no one has fallen into that category since 1940.  Much of the argument in Congress turns on the use of the word "person" in references to the census.  Elsewhere in the Constitution, the framers used the word "citizen."  They wrote, for instance, that only those who have been "seven years a citizen of the United States" can serve in the House.  The word "person" was repeated in the 14th Amendment, which was drafted after the Civil War.  Those in Congress and at the Census Bureau who favor continuing the practice of counting all residents of the U.S. conclude that this language unambiguously resolves the debate.  Their opponents say the drafters of the Constitution and the 14th Amendment never even considered the concept of an "illegal immigrant," let alone contemplated their current numbers.  ---  @ Estimates of Illegal Aliens  @ Counted in 1980 Census  @ TOTAL U.S. 2,057,000  @ California 1,024,000  @ New York 234,000  @ Texas 186,000  @ Illinois 135,000  @ Florida 80,000  @ Source: Census Bureau  The Canadian government said it will call for early redemption on Oct. 15 of an issue of 9.25% U.S.-dollar denominated bonds maturing Oct. 15, 1998.  The government has already purchased in the bond market more than one-fifth of the initial $350 million issue, which was made in New York in October 1978.  A redemption price of 103.26% of the principal amount will be paid.  A government spokesman said the redemption is part of the government's effort to manage its foreign-currency debt in a cost-effective manner.  Baby Shamu is an orphan now.  The infant killer whale, whose father died last year just days after she was born, lost her mother, Kandu, in a whale fight last Monday at Sea World in San Diego.  The bloody event was on the network news, and a lot of people are grieving.  "Anybody who hasn't heard of Shamu must be living in an igloo," says Thomas Francis, a New York truck driver vacationing with his family at the Orlando, Fla., tourist haven that includes a Sea World theme park and Walt Disney World.  Actually, people living in igloos are probably more familar with killer whales than most other people, but Mr. Francis does have a point.  In the booming theme park business, success requires a cast of identifiable characters amenable to marketing.  And if millions know Shamu now, just wait till the trademarked character falls into the hands of whoever is about to pay a mint for her.  Look for the Shamu TV series sure to follow.  The peculiar dynamics of the theme park business were thrown into bold relief last June when Harcourt Brace Jovanovich Inc., the debt-plagued publishing and insurance giant that owns the four Sea Worlds (the other two are in Aurora, Ohio, and San Antonio, Texas) announced the parks were for sale.  Potential buyers from Japan, Europe and the U.S. have flooded Harcourt with inquiries, leading to predictions that the Sea Worlds, along with some other minor real-estate and amusement-park assets, could fetch up to $1.5 billion.  That is more than 23 times what Harcourt paid for its first three Sea Worlds in 1976.  Interested parties are said to include MCA Inc., Anheuser-Busch Cos., Walt Disney Co. and Wesray Capital Corp., 80%-owner of the Six Flags park chain.  All that money for an Aurora park that is closed eight months of the year yet requires year-round care of the marine mammals by their paid trainers.  All that money for a brand-new, $200 million park in economically stressed San Antonio that analysts say is twice as big as the city can support.  All that for two smaller parks near Orlando -- one called Boardwalk and Baseball, the other Cypress Gardens -- that "compete with each other, believe it or not," says Abraham Pizam, director of the Institute of Tourism Studies at the University of Central Florida.  The Orlando and San Diego Sea Worlds are far more successful properties, but what the buyers really are after is Shamu -- and the potential to take the lucrative, lovable character overseas. (Shamu actually is not one but several whales that perform under the name, a sort of Sea World generic.)  "The biggest market in the world right now is Japan, South Korean, Taiwan," says Larry Cochran, the president of Six Flags.  Europe, Australia and Latin America are huge potential markets as well.  Theme parks depend for their business on creating a unique fantasy experience on which parents will lavish vacation money.  Shamu (like the prototypical Mickey Mouse, who continues to enrich Disney) is an indispensable character of the sort that can be used to entertain visitors to the parks, to adorn the ubiquitous souvenirs, and to grace marketing blitzes for the parks and various consumer goods.  Mickey Mouse on Pampers sells diapers.  Disney Chairman Michael Eisner says the use of characters isn't just an aspect of the company, "that is all our company is.  We are nothing else."  Caroline Todd, an eight-year-old from Manchester, England, bolsters the point.  She has never heard of the Statue of Liberty, the Golden Gate Bridge or the Grand Canyon.  But this child with a broad smile and a Daisy Duck hat knows exactly what she wants from her trip to America: to meet Mickey Mouse and the gang at Walt Disney World.  "You hear of Disney everywhere in England," says Jean Todd, Caroline's mother.  "It is America to us."  And there is no way not to spend money at a theme park.  "How can you say no?" asks Tammy Enriquez of Miami, whose two-year-old son, Justin, can't say much of anything yet, but blurts out "Shamoooo" at the sight of his souvenir whale.  Mrs. Enriquez says she and her husband, Felix, come back to Orlando every summer: That's where Justin was conceived, she says, on a trip to Sea World.  What MCA theme park chief Jay Stein calls the characters' "mesmerizing effect on children" is why most people go to theme parks -- and the proprietors know it.  Mr. Eisner, since becoming chairman of Disney in 1984, has counted on parental love in jacking up ticket prices at Disney World nearly 100%, to $30 a day.  This year a four-day ticket costs $100 per person.  "There isn't a lot of price resistance by tourists," says consultant John L. Gerner, of Economic Research Associates in Fort Lauderdale.  "They've already invested a lot of money to come to the area, they've got the kids with them, and they're not going to turn around, especially if the park provides a unique experience."  Disney, of course, remains the undisputed master of character creation and exploitation, having parlayed its animated images into $4 billion a year in revenue from theme parks, movies, and consumer goods.  On a given summer's day, some 150,000 people pass through the turnstiles of Disney's parks, estimates Tom Powell, the editor of Amusement Business magazine.  They spend at least $10 each on food and souvenirs, he says, and they are happy, or at least willing, to stand in hour-long lines.  Under Mr. Eisner, Disney has pumped money into new attractions, including the hot Disney-MGM Studio at Walt Disney World, and the company has increased advertising and cross-promotional activities.  By revitalizing Disney's film business, Mr. Eisner has greatly expanded the cross-marketing possibilities of Disney's parks, movies and TV shows.  Witness eight-year-old Ernie Ballesteros of Los Angeles, making his fourth trip to a Disney park, his first to Disney-MGM Studio.  "Mom, Mom, you're not looking] Here's what Roger Rabbit did," he shouts, as he crashes his body repeatedly against a barrier at the end of some railroad tracks.  Ernie is in Toontown, a reproduction of the animated ghetto where cartoon characters resided in the hit Disney film "Who Framed Roger Rabbit."  Roger Rabbit is an "arriviste" among Disney characters, and the company is always on the prowl for more.  Disney is reportedly on the brink of buying The Muppets from Henson Associates Inc. to further expand its stable of characters.  Neither side will comment.  "We're one of the few companies in America where each of the pieces supports {the others}, and the sum of all these pieces makes them greater," says Mr. Eisner.  "The television supports the motion pictures, which support the animation, which supports the parks."  The synergy has worked so well at Disney that others try to copy it.  MCA is pouring $600 million into a Universal Studio park in Orlando where it hopes to capitalize on such popular characters as "E.T." and the shark from "Jaws."  Whoever buys Sea World is likely to invest heavily in touting Shamu, if anything an underdeveloped character.  Sea World's parks could use a little work, too.  Two years ago, Harcourt, which is based in Orlando, fought off a hostile takeover attempt by British publisher Robert Maxwell, plunging the company into more than $2 billion of debt.  The financial burden forced Harcourt to curtail spending on the Sea World attractions.  The company fired 731 workers last year, or 10% of the parks' work force, and it cut marketing and advertising.  Moreover, it hasn't built major new attractions since it added a penguin exhibit more than two years ago.  Attendance, analysts say, has slipped as a result.  "In this business, it's essential to reinvest," says Michael Demetrias, the president of Marine World-Africa USA in Vallejo, Calif., which is also looking for expansion money.  A rule of thumb, he says, is that it takes an investment of between $5 million and $15 million in new attractions to increase attendance 10% to 20%.  Six Flags' Mr. Cochran says his company spends $30 million a year for new attractions and an additional $23 million for maintenance, just to keep abreast of the competition in such markets as Texas and Southern California.  Harcourt's painful recapitalization merely added to what some company insiders believed was a deteriorating cash situation at its parks.  In 1984, William Jovanovich, Harcourt's chairman, committed the company to building the largest of the four Sea Worlds in San Antonio, despite objections from Sea World executives.  Determined to proceed with the only Harcourt-built park, Mr. Jovanovich killed a feasibility study by Harrison Price Co., a firm that did similar research for Disney's parks.  Harrison Price favored a park half the size and cost of what Mr. Jovanovich envisioned, according to former Harcourt executives.  These executives say the Texas Sea World eventually cost nearly $200 million to build, putting it some $60 million over budget.  Last year, they say, with heavy local promotions, discounting and some loose tabulating at the gate, the park drew 3.3 million visitors.  This year, attendance is off about 40%, say the former insiders.  "The Texas situation had a tremendous impact on all the parks because it left a lot less money for new paint, maintenance and basic upkeep," says a former Sea World official.  This is most clearly seen at Harcourt's Cypress Gardens outside Orlando.  Driving up, a visitor, still dazzled by the order and spotlessness of Walt Disney World, is jolted by the rust coating the huge white letters spelling out the park's name on the front lawn.  Inside, a jumble of wires and pipes protrudes from a dry fountain.  In another corner, a sign reads: "Please Excuse the Mess.  More Improvements Being Made."  Margaret Mary McQuillan, senior vice president and secretary of Harcourt, declines comment in behalf of the company and Mr. Jovanovich, citing the sale talks.  Harcourt's president and chief executive, Ralph Caulo, who has said he would leave the company to run the parks for new owners, didn't return phone calls.  But it's Shamu, anyway, that buyers are after, not Cypress Gardens.  It isn't just the trademark that is so valuable.  Killer whales are hard to come by because of the rigid permit process now required to capture them in the wild.  Kandu, who was killed last week, may have been worth $1 million.  But Sea World still has 15 killer whales at its parks, including five young ones born in captivity.  The many inquiries that have come in from around the world about Sea World suggest that Shamu and the "fish park" concept could thrive overseas.  With the Florida and Southern California areas awash in theme parks, with Texas still reeling economically and with the rest of the country less hospitable because of weather, theme-park people have reason to be looking abroad.  In Europe, parks definitely are taking off.  Two large, $100 million-plus theme attractions recently opened in France, and Disney's $2 billion joint venture outside Paris is scheduled to open in 1992.  In Spain, Anheuser-Busch is going ahead with plans for a $300 million park and resort complex near Barcelona, and Six Flags has a contract to develop a park on the Costa del Sol.  MCA is looking at sites in Britain, France and Japan.  Sea World has tremendous domestic appeal, too.  Theme-park watchers say both Anheuser-Busch and MCA could use the Harcourt parks to create cross-marketing and ticket packages with which to attack dominant Disney.  Shamu in the hands of MCA, which owns Universal Studios and is building its theme park in Orlando, could be a natural for further exploitation on TV and film.  MCA won't comment on what interest it might have in Sea World, but officials acknowledge that promoting it in tandem with its new Orlando park, offering admission packages for both attractions, would make sense, given that Disney has long tried to monopolize the time tourists spend in Orlando.  Then, too, Busch's "Dark Continent" African and zoological park in Tampa is just 80 miles from Orlando.  Though declining comment on Sea World, W. Randolph Baker, the president of Busch's entertainment unit, says the company wants to expand its park operations.  They include a small park outside Philadelphia based on "Sesame Street," a Williamsburg, Va., park with a European village theme, and the zoo theme park in Tampa.  But Busch isn't in the same league as Disney and MCA when it comes to characters that can be exploited on TV. "Busch's parks will never be more than a public-relations arm of the company," claims a competitor.  And though Busch balks at this characterization -- its parks are profitable, Mr. Baker says -- the first "Busch Gardens" began as a beer and bird park adjacent to the company's brewery in Van Nuys, Calif.  When faced with the choice of keeping the gardens or expanding the plant to make more beer, beer won.  Disney too is said to have expressed an interest in Sea World, but it probably won't buy the parks because it prefers to build its own projects from scratch.  The company won't comment.  Acting as a bidder, Disney would get to see Harcourt's books, and if "they could make it more expensive for MCA to buy it, they'd be happy to do that," says Mara Balsbaugh, an entertainment analyst with Smith Barney.  The competition may sound a bit cutthroat for a business that thrives on making children smile.  But Joseph Barbera, who with his partner William Hannah created "Yogi Bear" and "The Flintstones," says big business can hide small truths: "People love the characters because they're lovable," he says.  "They don't take drugs.  They don't drink."  And, except now and then in Sea World's aquariums, they don't die.  Pauline A. Ellison and Richard L. Morrill were elected directors of this bank holding concern.  Ms. Ellison and Mr. Morrill will be succeeding Rhae W. Adams and William H. Chambliss, both of whom retired.  The board's membership will remain at 21.  Tokyo stocks closed lower Friday for the fourth consecutive day.  London shares rose to a 1989 closing high but still ended short of the 2400 level on the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index.  Shares also rose again on every other major European stock exchange.  Tokyo's 225-stock Nikkei index edged up early in the day in response to Thursday's record close on the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  But the market lacked the energy to keep the index aloft, traders said, with institutional participation especially sluggish.  The Nikkei index, which was down 106.73 points Thursday, fell 46.62 to close at 34739.93.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 400 million shares, compared with 390 million Thursday.  Declining issues led advancers 456-423, with 220 unchanged.  In early trading in Tokyo Monday, the Nikkei index shed 29.12 points to 34710.81.  Friday, the Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which lost 13.05 Thursday, was down 8.27, or 0.31%, at 2622.70.  The Second Section Index, which fell 5.98 Thursday, was up 6.82, or 0.21%, to close at 3289.41.  Volume on the second section was estimated at 24 million shares, compared with 24.8 million Thursday.  The Nikkei index advanced to a record close of 35140.83 Monday but dropped 400.90 points over the rest of the week.  Traders said the losses were partly due to profit-taking by institutional investors trying to lock in a return as their September book-closing nears.  Japanese institutions will start to close their fiscal first-half books around the middle of September.  Pharmaceuticals were mostly higher.  Sankyo was up in moderately heavy trading on reports it had developed a promising new medicine.  Sankyo closed 90 yen higher at 2,860 yen ($19.96) a share.  Similar reports on new medicines pushed up other pharmaceuticals, but many of them wound up lower despite the reports.  Yamanouchi closed at 3,750, down 10, Mochida gained 90 to 3,690, and Ono was up 20 at 5,900.  Friday's winners included Sony, which closed at 8,900, up 100.  Its better-than-expected results, announced Thursday after the market closed, appealed to investors despite diminished hopes of a large free distribution, traders said.  Securities issues were generally lower.  Some traders said investors believe brokerage houses' commissions must be declining, with stock-trading volume showing little sign of picking up.  Nomura Securities lost 90 to 3,210, Nikko Securities was down 10 at 1,860, Yamaichi Securities fell 40 to 1,840, and Daiwa Securities was down 60 to 2,260.  London prices ended below their intraday peaks as buying interest wilted, prompting market-makers to trim prices in a vain effort to reignite interest.  Several dealers complained that the London market didn't take Wall Street's surge Thursday as a cue to bounce sharply higher.  A quiet opening Friday on Wall Street, combined with scant interest ahead of a three-day British holiday weekend, led many market participants to give up early.  The FT-SE 100 closed 4.3 points higher at 2397.4, down from an intraday high of 2404.5.  The London market has surged more than 30% in 1989 and is setting its sights on its record close of 2443.4.  The Financial Times 30-share index rose 3.1 to 1981.0.  Volume was a moderate 431.2 million shares, compared with 475.7 million Thursday.  "This market's incredibly robust and is simply refusing to go down," one trader said.  "Selling pressure is continually being soaked up by eager buyers."  But even while bullish sentiment rules, some dealers cautioned that the market is looking "distinctly toppy."  "I'm convinced this market has rallied too quickly and is set for a correction," one trader said.  On the other hand, some traders argued that buying interest is focused on less expensive defensive stocks.  Among these, financial issues continued to lure investors, with banks once again leading the way forward.  Since announcing interim results this month that included heavy provisions against losses on Third World loans, bank stocks have rallied vigorously.  Barclays climbed 4 pence to 556 pence ($8.74) a share, National Westminster rose 4 to 359, and Lloyds jumped 3 to 419.  Midland, however, encountered profit-taking and slipped 2 to 367.  Insurance stocks rose again, with General Accident up 5 at #10.40 and Royal Insurance advancing 1 to 456.  Reckitt & Colman rose 28 to #12.74 on news that its drug buprenorphine appears to be effective in reducing cocaine addiction.  "It's a dull stock, and the market was pleased to find a reason to push it higher," one dealer said.  Glaxo continued to gain on rumors that the company might be gearing up for a big U.S.-style merger.  Most traders, however, downplayed the rumor and said they were interested in Glaxo as a "quality defensive stock."  Glaxo firmed 21 to #15.70.  Unilever rose 12 to 671 on rumors that Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, the U.S. leveraged buy-out specialist, is considering taking a stake.  Construction company Redland fell 18 to 543 as traders continued to watch the slowdown in the U.K residential property market, an area where Redland is heavily exposed.  In other European markets, shares surged to a second consecutive record in Paris and reached a 1989 high for the third time in a week in Milan.  Prices also rose in Frankfurt, Zurich, Brussels, Amsterdam and Stockholm.  South African gold stocks closed slightly lower.  Share prices also closed higher in Sydney, Hong Kong and Taipei, were mixed in Manila and fell in Singapore, Seoul and Wellington.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 24 Aug 23 Year  @ U.S. ................ 323.5 317.2 + 26.3  @ Britain ............. 718.4 715.3 + 31.6  @ Canada .............. 432.9 428.4 + 17.9  @ Japan ............... 1553.6 1562.7 + 9.4  @ France .............. 533.9 522.8 + 20.6  @ Germany ............. 251.2 251.3 + 20.8  @ Hong Kong ........... 1860.5 1882.2 - 8.3  @ Switzerland ......... 239.0 238.7 + 38.2  @ Australia ........... 349.4 348.0 + 20.3  @ World index ......... 539.2 537.2 + 9.1  Bel Fuse Inc., Jersey City, N.J., said it received an offer from Santa Monica Partners and Initio Inc. to be purchased for about $36.8 million.  Bel Fuse, a maker of electronic parts, said Santa Monica and Initio are prepared to offer $7.50 a share.  It said the offer will be considered by the board and is subject to the obtainment of financing.  Initio is a mail-order company based in Carson City, Nev.  Santa Monica Partners is a New York-based investment partnership.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, Bel Fuse closed at $6.25, up $1.50.  Federal Reserve policy makers differed on how fast to push down interest rates when they met in early July, newly disclosed minutes show.  The minutes confirm that the Fed's policy-setting Federal Open Market Committee decided 10-1 to ease its grip on credit slightly when it met July 5 and 6.  The Fed eased a second time later in July.  The committee met again last week, but there are no indications it decided to alter monetary policy.  Minutes of that session won't be released until October.  The July minutes say that "nearly all" committee members favored an easier policy, reflecting concern about the slowing economy and slower-than-desired growth in the money supply.  But some feared that anything beyond "a slight move . . . could have an undesirable effect on inflationary expectations and . . . could lead eventually to upward pressure on interest rates."  Only Reserve Board member Martha Seger dissented from the final vote; she wanted a greater reduction in interest rates.  Another committee member, who isn't identified in the minutes, wanted a series of easing moves over several weeks.  And some members, worried about the risks of recession, wanted the committee at least to agree to lean toward additional easing later in the summer.  The final decision was to issue instructions to the staff making a subsequent easing or tightening equally likely, depending on economic conditions.  "This caution was dictated by current uncertainties regarding the economic outlook, the still rapid rate of inflation and the relatively sensitive conditions in financial markets," the minutes say.  The Fed did, however, ease again during the last week in July, the third such move this year.  Since the spring, the federal funds interest rate -- controlled by the Fed -- has been reduced by 3/4 of a percentage point to about 9%.  The rate is what banks charge each other on overnight loans.  The latest minutes offer an example of the Fed's reluctance to disclose details of its deliberations even months after decisions have been made.  The minutes disguise the tensions that preceded a decision to lower interest rates in June, the first such reduction in more than a year.  That decision, the most significant that Fed policy makers have made so far this year, came only after a series of telephone conferences in late May and early June.  The minutes say simply: "A variety of developments began to suggest that a slackening in inflation pressures might be in prospect as indications of slower economic expansion continued to accumulate, monetary growth remained sluggish, and the dollar climbed further."  "In these circumstances," the minutes say without any reference to the conference calls, the Fed staff member charged with carrying out committee decisions injected additional credit into the economy.  The wording apparently reflects a tactical decision by Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan not to take a formal vote at the June 3 meeting.  The minutes disclose that Silas Keehn, president of the Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago, objected to the committee's decision, disclosed last month, to set tentative ranges for growth in the money supply for 1990 at the same level as in 1989.  In the recent past, the Fed has lowered those ranges each year.  Mr. Keehn sought to continue that practice to underscore the Fed's commitment to price stability.  The open market committee consists of the six current Reserve Board members and five of the 12 presidents of the regional reserve banks.  There is one vacancy on the board, and Bush administration officials say they aren't close to filling it.  A federal judge here denied a motion by Sir James Goldsmith's Hoylake Investments Ltd. for a preliminary injunction blocking the Texas insurance commissioner's review of Hoylake's #13.35 billion ($20.99 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC.  Hoylake said it will appeal.  At the same time, the judge denied a motion by B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc. unit to dismiss a Hoylake federal suit challenging the constitutionality of the insurance commissioner's right to review the takeover bid.  Texas is one of nine states in which Los Angeles-based Farmers has insurance operations.  Sir James's group has filed federal suits in all nine to try to block insurance regulators from reviewing the takeover bid for B.A.T, a tobacco, retailing, paper and financial services concern based in London.  Last week, Sir James reached an agreement to sell Farmers -- if his bid for B.A.T is successful -- to France's Axa Midi Assurances for $4.5 billion.  The sale is designed to win insurance regulators' clearance for his bid, eliminating a major obstacle to acquiring B.A.T.  Walter A. Drexel, who joined Singer Co.'s board earlier this month, was elected chairman of the defense contractor.  Before joining Singer, which primarily has interests in making flight simulators, Mr. Drexel was vice chairman of Burlington Northern Inc.  Joseph J. Campanella, president and chief executive officer of Jet Aviation Holdings Inc., and David L. Redmond, senior vice president and chief financial officer of Singer, are the company's other directors.  None has a financial position in closely-held Singer.  In June, Paul A. Bilzerian, who took the company private in January 1988, resigned as chairman of Singer, the same day the Securities and Exchange Commission filed civil charges of securities law violations against him.  Separately, Mr. Bilzerian was convicted on criminal charges stemming from the takeover.  Singer's other three directors resigned in early August.  Also on Friday, Singer said Robert Kent Scott resigned as senior vice president, general counsel and secretary.  A successor wasn't named.  The U.S. comptroller of the currency has proposed an accounting change that could discourage banks from making large additions to their loan-loss reserves because to do so would jeopardize their quarterly dividend payments.  The proposal comes at an especially sensitive time.  The Federal Reserve Banks have been quietly pressuring banks with low reserve levels to build them up following the $1.6 billion in write-offs of debt owed by developing nations in the second quarter.  H. Rodgin Cohen, a partner in Sullivan & Cromwell, a New York law firm, said, "This rule could have serious ramifications for how banks operate, particularly with regard to less-developed country debt.  If adopted, there would be a significant likelihood of legal challenge to the rule."  Added an accountant who works with major banks: "Right now, it's total confusion out there among banks on what to do about reserve levels and the various options in the debt reduction plan for Mexico.  This action by the comptroller further muddies the waters."  Under the comptroller's proposal, provisions for loan losses would be deducted from calculations for determining banks' capacity to pay dividends.  Heretofore, banks deducted only actual charge-offs for bad assets when calculating dividend capacity.  If a bank were forced to suspend its dividend payment, its stock price could plummet, undermining confidence in it.  Although the comptroller's rule nominally applies just to national banks, state-chartered banks that are members of the Federal Reserve System would also be affected unless the Fed takes exception to the comptroller's action.  The comptroller is expected to act on the change later this fall.  Lawrence Senter, an examiner in the comptroller's policy and research office, said the change in the treatment of loan-loss provisions is intended to harmonize federal law with the new risk-based capital guidelines adopted for international banks.  Under the new guidelines, loan-loss reserves aren't counted as capital because they are set aside for anticipated losses.  "If you're making provisions for expected losses, you shouldn't be able to use the provision to calculate a bank's dividend capacity," Mr. Senter said.  "You can't have your cake and eat it, too."  Speculation has been rife over whether big U.S. banks will replenish their loan-loss reserves in the third and fourth quarters, following the 20% write-off of their Argentine loans in the second quarter.  Most banks, following Citicorp's lead, took the write-offs against their reserves without taking a charge against earnings for a significant increase in their quarterly provision to the reserve.  As a result, the reserve coverage for developing nation loans has been dropping at most banks.  Notably, several banks, including Bankers Trust New York Corp. and Chase Manhattan Corp., have boosted their coverage for such loans.  Pressure on U.S. banks' reserves intensified in the second quarter as the big British banks boosted their reserves for developing nation debt to 50% or more of their exposure.  At the dozen largest U.S. banks, reserve coverage for developing nation debt currently ranges from 19% at Manufacturers Hanover Corp. to 38% at Security Pacific Corp., according to IBCA Inc., a bank ratings concern.  Unlike U.S. banks, British banks can take advantage of tax benefits when they make reserve additions.  U.S. banks only receive tax benefits when bad loans are written off.  Moreover, U.S. banks may be loath to make big reserve additions right now because they have spent the past 15 months rebuilding their capital base following the last big round of reserve-building.  Inflation fears have subsided for now, but price increases haven't.  Unless the economy plunges into a recession, prices will rise at a 4% to 5% annual rate next year, many manufacturing executives and economists agree.  Moreover, there's growing concern that a boost in the economy could trigger higher inflation next spring.  Prompting that spiral would be the Federal Reserve Board's recent moves to lower interest rates.  That could accelerate the economy enough to cause price increases above and beyond the annual raises companies seek at the beginning of the year to cover anticipated labor and other cost increases.  For now, demand has eased enough to halt skyrocketing prices of steel, paper, plastics, chemicals and other basic commodities that earlier this year threatened to ratchet the nation's inflation rate up a notch, into the 6% to 7% area.  "We're over the hump on pricing pressure," says John Nyhuis, manager of purchasing for Giddings & Lewis Inc., a Fond du Lac, Wis., machine tool producer.  Oil prices also have dropped over the past three months, cutting prices at the gas pump and reducing costs of making some chemicals.  In addition, the dollar has climbed enough this year to slow the rise in prices of imported goods and force some domestic producers to moderate their own pricing to stay competitive.  Producer prices in July declined for the second consecutive month, the Labor Department reported recently.  Still, wholesale prices last month were 5% higher than a year earlier.  And there's little evidence the Fed has made any headway in its goal of reducing the underlying inflation rate.  "You would expect prices to soften quicker than they have," says H. James Murdoch, director of purchases for Reliance Electric Co.  In fact, the nation's inflation rate has been remarkably stable in recent years, if the effects of oil price fluctuations are eliminated.  The consumer price index at midyear, excluding energy, was 4.8% higher than a year earlier.  From the beginning of 1982 to the end of 1988, that index rose an average of 4.2% annually.  The smallest increase was 3.8% during 1986 and largest was last year's 4.7%.  Even optimists say it would take more than the current slowdown to drop inflation out of that range.  Maury Harris, economist with PaineWebber, who considers himself an optimist, says the consumer price index will rise at a 4% annual rate over the next 18 months.  "We're not yet at full employment," he says, "and I expect the dollar to hold up relatively well because of an inflow of foreign investment."  Thus, he says, wages and benefits won't soar, nor will prices of imported goods.  And he expects the economy to grow at a modest 2% pace, avoiding pressure on productive capacity.  Most economists foresee prices rising a little faster than that.  The consensus of 50 leading economists polled by Blue Chip Economic Indicators, an economic newsletter, calls for a 4.6% rise in consumer prices next year.  One dissenter, A. Gary Shilling, contends the economy "in all likelihood is now in a recession" that will wring most inflation out of the economy by late next year.  Beneath the modest change in the overall inflation figures are violent crosscurrents.  The big winners of the previous two years, commodity producers, will see profits trimmed over the next 12 months as price increases give way to discounting.  On the other hand, lower commodity prices will alleviate a profit pinch for some companies that turn basic materials into consumer goods and industrial equipment.  "Copper has dropped 30%, aluminum pretty close to that and brass is beginning to fall," says Leo W. Ladehoff, chairman and chief executive of Amcast Industrial Corp., Dayton, Ohio, which buys a lot of all three.  Prices for some of Amcast's products are slipping, too, he says, but not as rapidly, and profit margins are recovering.  The maker of valves and fittings, auto parts and aerospace products reported a 46% earnings drop for the May 28 third quarter, mainly because of the difficulty in passing through soaring materials costs.  Employment costs, however, have been rising more rapidly in recent quarters, replacing commodities as the primary engine of inflation.  Should the economy pick up briskly early next year, those labor costs, combined with higher capacity utilization, could trigger inflation at a rate of well over 5%.  Also, the downturn in prices for steel, plastic resins, aluminum and copper won't immediately alleviate all materials cost pressures, because the huge commodity price increases of late 1988 and early 1989 haven't worked their way through the system yet.  The auto makers illustrate the upward price pressure lurking behind the recent weakening in wholesale prices.  To unload excess stock of 1989 cars, producers have been cutting prices, through cash rebates, dealer allowances and other promotions.  Lower auto prices helped reduce the July wholesale price index.  However, when 1990 model cars appear in the showrooms this fall, sticker prices will be 4% to 9% higher than for the 1989s.  Some of that increase will cover costs of air bags and other optional equipment that will be standard on the 1990s.  Just how much more buyers pay for comparably equipped 1990 autos depends on how well they sell.  If sales perk up enough for auto makers and dealers to curtail promotions, buyers could pay 20% more for some models.  A 4% to 5% inflation rate, while upsetting to many economists, is comfortable for many businesses.  They've gotten used to it, which may be one reason it's so durable.  Few companies want to squeeze all the profit away from their suppliers, even when they have a bit more muscle because business is slowing.  And they're even more loath to deny wage and salary increases to their own employees, much less cut compensation, unless the business is in imminent danger of going under.  Wages and benefits rose a disturbing 5.4% in the 12 months ended June 30, the Labor Department reported.  Some economists think that overstates the longer-term compensation rise, but many foresee a 1990 rise of 4.5%.  For commodity producers, the recent price decline stems primarily from lower plant utilization rates as the economy's growth slows and new capacity comes on line.  Only six months ago, producers of a wide range of metals, paper products, plastics and chemicals were running all-out, and still had customers on allocation.  There's hardly anything that scarce now, and commodity prices are "spotty," producers say.  For instance, prices of high-quality coated papers used in commercial printing are firm, say industry officials.  But an attempt to raise prices on uncoated papers used by office copiers failed, and there's paper available at discounts of 2% or so.  Likewise, there's "a little deal-making going on" with linerboard, which is used to make corrugated boxes.  However, bleached board and coated natural kraft, two premium packaging materials, are moving up about 5%.  And there's talk of another attempt to raise linerboard prices $30 a ton, or about 7%, this fall.  Several earlier attempts failed.  So far, commodity prices aren't cascading downward, partly because demand is strong across much of the world.  Also, the rising dollar's impact on U.S. commodity prices is mitigated by a plethora of import restrictions on everything from steel, bearings and machine tools to clothing.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Deb Shops $ .32 ... $ .18 (3) 77.78  @ NEGATIVE  @Charming Shoppe $ .23 ... $ .25 (12) 8.00  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  PANTYHOSE MADE A MAJOR U.S. DEBUT in 1959 and won their full lift in 1967 when Mary Quant's miniskirts forced more women to wear them.  Waist-high hosiery sales have stayed high ever since despite the ups and downs of skirt lengths.  This replacement for the girdle and garter belt owes its origins to many.  Full-length tights have been worn by dancers for generations.  Chadbourn-Gotham Hosiery of Charlotte, N.C., was making sheer nylon tights for J.C. Penney customers in the early 1950s.  And a French company offered mid-length tights in 1958.  But a major step came in the late 1950s when a manager of Glen Raven Mills of Altamahaw, N.C., asked Margaret Minor, a seamer, to stitch a pair of nylons to a nylon crotch.  Earlier, Allen Gant, then president of the mill, had asked his wife, Ethel, "How would it be if we made a pair of panties and fastened the stockings to it?"  Ethel, like most women who loathed snapping nylons to bumpy garter belts and girdles, did some home stiching and said go for it.  After trials at the mill (some models were so stretchy they came up to the wearer's chin), Glen Raven began selling them in 1959 and trademarked "Panti-Legs" on Jan. 26, 1960.  National sales figures didn't start until 1968.  Enter Mary Quant, the British cult designer of the 1960s miniskirt, who has said that "sex" is the point of fashion.  In her book "What We Wore" Ellen Melinkoff wrote: "Pantyhose edited legs.  They hid the hair, the blotches, the cellulite...(they) were emancipation."  U.S. producers had to use converted stocking-making machines until 1968, when installations of many special, automated Italian-made pantyhose machines began.  U.S. shipments -- made by Hanes, Kayser-Roth and 72 other companies -- have topped one billion pairs annually since 1982.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  WHEN JACQUES CARTIER, THE FRENCH NAVIGATOR, first sailed up the St. Lawrence River in 1535, the rapids blocked him at Montreal.  The same fate awaited every ocean-going ship for the next four centuries, until the St. Lawrence Seaway was opened in 1959 with President Dwight Eisenhower and Britain's Queen Elizabeth doing the honors.  The Seaway created a 2,350-mile route into mid-America.  Politics, not engineering, had kept the river blocked.  The Canadians had locks around the rapids by 1903 but only for vessels up to 3,000 tons.  Before World War I, a U.S.-Canadian commission recommended beating the rapids with a combined power and navigation project.  Canada's Prime Minister Mackenzie King, urged on by the abiding Canadian fear of any involvement with the U.S., shelved it.  Finally, in 1954, Congress approved a power and navigation pact that let work begin on the "North Coast," as Seaway boosters called the new waterway.  Unfortunately, the Seaway never lived up to its billing.  Cargo ships and tankers outgrew the Seaway's 830-foot locks.  The need for Labrador iron ore to replace Minnesota's dwindling Mesabi deposits -- a defense argument that Eisenhower used to great effect -- faded as steel mills on the Great Lakes became less important.  General cargo went elsewhere.  By 1984, critics were calling the Seaway a billion-dollar boondoggie.  Congress had to write off its original cost.  Schemes for icebreakers to lengthen the Seaway's 8 1/2-month season and to enlarge the locks never materialized.  But U.S. administrator James Emery says things are picking up.  In 1988, Canadian grain tonnage -- 40% of the waterway's cargo -- fell 71%, but overall toonage declined only 9%.  And Emery hopes to find an East Coast port to handle overseas Seaway winter traffic for onward shipment by rail.  That, he says, will let his big ditch offer 12-month service, ice or no ice.  GENERAL DEVELOPMENT CORP., Miami, said its board approved a measure it believes will make its $175 million of 12 5/8% subordinated debentures due 2005 more attractive to investors.  Under an added covenant, the land development company would be required to redeem the debt at par in the event of a merger or buy-out.  It said the debentures also will be amended to eliminate the annual sinking fund requirement currently set to begin Sept. 1, 1995.  General Development said the change is subject to approval by holders of at least two-thirds of the debt's principal amount.  The company said such "event risk" protection already exists in the company's 12 7/8% senior subordinated notes due 1995.  FEDERAL-MOGUL Corp., Southfield, Mich., said it completed a revolving credit agreement with 10 domestic and foreign banks for $150 million, which officials of the auto parts maker said meets its needs for short-term and medium-term borrowing.  The company said a previous revolving credit agreement expired in April.  Times Mirror Co. said advertising revenue of its newspaper publishing group rose 4.9% for the five weeks ended Aug. 6 to $142.8 million from $136.1 million a year earlier.  For the 31 weeks from Jan. 1 through Aug. 6, advertising revenue rose 6% to $994.6 million from $937.9 million a year ago.  The cumulative results for 1989 had five additional days, including a Sunday, as compared with 1988.  Times Mirror is a publishing, broadcasting and cable-TV concern.  General Motors Corp.'s Oldsmobile division said it increased indefinitely the cash rebate it is offering on its Toronado coupe to $2,500 from $1,500, effective yesterday.  The full-sized Toronado has been a slow-selling car this year.  As of last month, Oldsmobile and its dealers had enough of the cars on hand to meet demand for a whopping 158 days.  Auto makers generally prefer to keep their unsold inventories at a supply of 60 to 65 days.  A subsidiary of U.K. television rental giant Granada Group PLC has disinvested from South Africa by disposing of its 41.3% stake in South African TV rental company Teljoy Ltd. to local interests for 74 million rand ($26.8 million) in cash.  Local industrial holding group Federale Volksbeleggings Beperk, or Fedvolks, which already holds 26.9% of Teljoy, and Fedvolks subsidiary Sankorp announced in a statement that they have acquired the shareholding from Granada subsidiary Electronic Rentals Group PLC effective July 1 this year.  Teljoy is South Africa's leading television rental company.  The deal increases Fedvolks' interest in Teljoy to 36.6% and Sankorp will hold 31.2%.  Hong Kong's main measure of consumer prices rose 10.3% in July from a year earlier, the government said.  The consumer price index "A," which monitors price changes for the 50% of urban households that spend between 2,000 Hong Kong dollars and HK$6,499 (US$256 and US$832) a month, rose 0.3% in July from June, mostly because of higher restaurant meal prices, movie tickets and bus fares.  The consumer price index "B," which reflects price changes for the 30% of urban households that spend between HK$6,500 and HK$9,999 a month, posted a rise of 0.4% from June and an increase of 10% from a year earlier.  July's Hang Seng consumer price index, which measures price changes for the 10% of urban households spending HK$10,000 to HK$24,999 a month, was up 0.2% from June and up 11.1% from a year earlier.  West Germany's import prices in July fell 1.5% from June, a sharper-than-expected decline, but rose 3.1% from a year earlier, the Federal Statistics Office said.  The month-to-month decline followed a 0.6% decline in import prices in the May-June period, which brought the year-to-year rise in June to 5.3%.  Import prices were up as much as 7.3% on a year-to-year basis in April.  H. Patrick Jack was named vice president of this oil and natural gas exploration and production concern, and vice president, chemicals, of the company's Fina Oil & Chemical Co. unit.  Mr. Jack succeeds R.J. Comeaux, who resigned to accept a position with another company.  Chiron Corp., a biotechnology concern, said it and Ortho Diagnostic Systems Inc. have filed an application with the Food and Drug Administration to make and market a screening test for a hepatitis virus.  Chiron said it expects FDA approval for the test by early next year.  The test detects the presence of antibodies against hepatitis C virus in blood and plasma.  Chiron and Ortho Diagnostic, a subsidiary of Johnson & Johnson based in Raritan, N.J., have developed the test jointly.  Robert C. Humphrey, former chairman of NBD Bank Evanston, was named a director of this bentonite producer, filling a vacancy and returning board membership to nine.  Mr. Humphrey had been an American Colloid director for several years, but didn't stand for election in May.  Paul R. Low was named a director of this maker of microwave equipment.  Mr. Low is president of International Business Machines Corp.'s General Products division.  He fills a vacancy on Avantek's six-member board.  When Ferdinand and Imelda Marcos fled the Philippines in 1986, the new government knew it would have its work cut out in retrieving the hundreds of millions of dollars the couple allegedly fleeced from the country.  In New York City, where the Marcoses owned four prime commercial buildings, the task has proven more difficult than the Manila government could have imagined.  In the latest twist, a defaulted $7.3 million loan by a Chemical Bank unit to a friend of Mrs. Marcos's threatens to imperil the Philippine government's claim on a $100 million building on Madison Avenue.  The dispute pits Chemical Bank (Suisse) against the Philippines and the U.S. attorney's office, both of which have said the bank is avoiding the jurisdiction of U.S. courts by litigating the matter in Curacao, where the building corporations are registered.  Chemical, which transferred the loan to Chemical Bank (Suisse) in 1986, says it is doing what any bank would do to retrieve its assets.  The facts of the case are as follows: In 1985, Chemical Bank lent $7.3 million to two Marcos-controlled corporations that owned two Manhattan office buildings.  While the Marcoses owned the buildings, they leased the land underneath the property.  The loans were backed by letters of credit secured by deposits in Swiss bank accounts of Gliceria Tantoco, a friend of Mrs. Marcos's, who also is a defendant in the federal criminal case against the Marcoses.  Ms. Tantoco is also said to be one of the largest owners of department stores in the Philippines.  The funds in Switzerland were subsequently frozen as part of the Philippines' attempt to retrieve the Marcoses' assets.  The U.S. claims the money should be part of its criminal claim, under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, against the Marcoses and Ms. Tantoco.  Also, said Assistant U.S. Attorney Thomas A. Zaccaro, the properties are subject to RICO forfeiture and the only recourse Chemical Bank (Suisse) has is to await the conclusion of the criminal proceedings against the Marcoses and Ms. Tantoco.  Under the RICO statute, Chemical can petition the court to establish its interest only after forfeiture is awarded to the U.S., he said.  One of the two buildings, at 200 Madison Ave., is owned by Blockhurst Corp., which is the subject of the current Chemical action. (The other office building, at 40 Wall St., was sold at auction last week and presumably isn't affected by the dispute.)  After Ms. Tantoco failed to repay the loan in 1986, Chemical (Suisse) obtained a default judgment against Blockhurst in Curacao.  Last month, against the wishes of the U.S. attorney's office in New York and the Philippine government, a Curacao court held Blockhurst to be bankrupt, and appointed a custodian with full authority over the company.  The forced bankruptcy could have grave implications for the Philippines' interest in the building.  In letters to the court, the owner of the land underneath the building, Alex DiLorenzo, has asserted that the Curacao bankruptcy constitutes a default of the lease.  Such a default would lead to a termination of the leasehold, which in turn would eliminate the Philippines' claim to the building.  If that happens, the actual building would revert to Mr. DiLorenzo; it is estimated to be worth at least $100 million.  So far, U.S. courts haven't allowed that to happen.  On Sept. 6, Judge John F. Keenan will decide whether Chemical will be paid from Blockhurst's assets.  If, as Chemical Bank wants, Judge Keenan decides the bank should be paid, then there is less money for the Philippines, but the bankruptcy will be lifted and their claim on the building won't be endangered.  But, if Judge Keenan decides to hold up the payment, that would trigger a claim by Mr. DiLorenzo, claiming Blockhurst's lease is invalid because of the Curacao bankruptcy.  Mr. DiLorenzo didn't return phone calls.  Jeffrey Greenbaum, who represents the Philippines in its attempt to retrieve the Marcos assets, said Chemical Bank's actions are meant to avoid the jurisdiction of U.S. courts.  Because the money eventually is thought to have gone to the Marcoses, Mr. Greenbaum said the Philippines has first claim on it.  Chemical Bank said it had no knowledge that the money found its way into the Marcos's pockets.  Chemical Vice President Dieter Boehme said that if the Philippines wanted to remove the threat of losing its claim on 200 Madison Ave., it should pay the loan, which would wipe out the bankruptcy.  "Our claim should have no impact on the buildings," he said.  Henley Group Inc. said it completed its $22.25-a-share tender offer for the 19% of Fisher Scientific Group Inc. it didn't previously own.  The industrial and investment concern said a preliminary count showed 3.9 million Fisher shares were accepted for payment.  The response to the offer, which had a total value of $144 million, gave Henley ownership of more than 90% prior to its completion of the merger with the maker of medical and scientific equipment.  Canadian steel-ingot production totaled 293,566 metric tons in the week ended Saturday, up 3.3% from 284,207 tons a week earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The week's total was up 24.1% from 236,496 tons a year earlier.  The 1989 cumulative total is 10,088,333 tons, up 7.6% from 9,373,002 tons a year earlier.  This is in response to James Stewart's July 26 letter to the editor, "Some Businesses Put Prisons to Work."  Mr. Stewart touts the benefits of employing prison labor.  While this is a very underutilized labor source, employees need to be aware of the risks associated with the indiscriminate employment of convicted criminals.  One of the fastest-growing bodies of law is the concept of negligent hiring.  More and more courts are finding employers liable for the criminal acts of employees.  This liability extends beyond the workplace and scope of employment.  In some cases, employers have been sued for acts that occurred miles from the job site and during non-work hours.  Courts have held that employers must make a reasonable effort to determine if an employee is fit for a specific job and does not pose an unreasonable risk to co-workers and customers.  If businesses elect to employ convicted criminals, steps must be taken to ensure the protection of customers and co-workers.  Those steps should include proper supervision, limited access to personal data on customers and co-workers, no unsupervised access to residences, and limited nonpublic contact with customers.  Employment of convicted felons must be done responsibly.  Prisoners and those on parole haven't yet paid their debt to society and the crimes they committed must be evaluated when assigning them to a job.  Should a convicted burglar use company information to commit additional crimes, the business could be held liable.  The cost of defense would be substantial, so it is incumbent upon the employer to work harder with those who have demonstrated a propensity toward criminal behavior.  Gary F. Davis  Wichita, Kan.  Israel's Labor Party leader, Shimon Peres, wants the U.S. to concentrate its attention on bringing the Palestinians and Israelis together.  He hopes the U.S. will continue to push for the foundering plan for elections in the occupied territories rather than switching its attention to the Palestinians' preferred option of an international conference.  "The U.S. is the connector between us and the Palestinians -- there is no replacement.  It is a job for one country," he states in an interview.But although the Labor Party is holding on to its place in Israel's coalition, its voice in government is becoming ever fainter.  Just in the past week, Labor has found itself at odds with Likud pronouncements by both Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir and Foreign Minister Moshe Arens.  The first disagreement came over Syria's stepped-up military action against Christian forces in Lebanon, with Mr. Peres, the finance minister, saying Israel wouldn't contemplate resending troops to deal with the troubles of its northern neighbor after having pulled them out of Lebanon in 1985.  Mr. Shamir and Mr. Arens, meanwhile, warned Syria that there were "red lines" in Lebanon which, if crossed, could trigger an aggressive Israeli response.  The second difference came after Mr. Arens responded to Egyptian queries on the Israeli proposal for elections in the occupied territories of the West Bank and Gaza.  Mr. Arens's response was entirely based on the Likud Party's policy, which rules out election participation by Arabs in East Jerusalem and also bars any territorial concessions.  The position of the Labor Party and the coalition as a whole is that such issues are open to negotiation.  Last month's Israeli capture of the Lebanese Shiite leader Sheik Abdel Karim Obeid has distracted attention from the election plan, but the plan remains the only active Israeli proposal to advance the peace process, and the U.S. has wholeheartedly supported it.  When Mr. Shamir in July yielded to demands of Likud hardliners by attaching tough conditions to the plan, many Labor politicians advocated withdrawing from the coalition.  A majority, however, eyeing opinion polls predicting a catastrophic loss for Labor if an early election were held, decided to stay put.  "Labor is really guaranteeing that the peace process will stay alive," says Mr. Peres, casting a positive light on the party's decision to remain in the coalition.  By staying, he argues, Labor already has forced Mr. Shamir to climb down somewhat from his July pronouncements.  "Likud has retreated from part of its conditions {for elections}: that the intifada be over," Mr. Peres said in an interview.  Mr. Shamir said in July that elections couldn't take place until the violence of the 20-month Palestinian uprising ended.  However, he has since said that didn't rule out talks on election arrangements.  Such talks, he said, can take place despite the ongoing unrest.  He already has initiated contacts with at least one Palestinian representative.  Mr. Peres dismisses as "a passing mood" polls that show a strong drift to the right in Israeli opinion.  "I don't like it," he says, "but I don't take it seriously.  If you had taken a poll before {former Egyptian President Anwar} Sadat came to Israel nobody would have said they'd give up a piece of sand to Egypt.  But the reaction of the people after Sadat came was so different that peace {with Egypt} became possible."  Stephanie Coontz's Aug. 9 editorial-page article, "Pro-Family but Divorced From the Facts," is itself remarkably estranged from fact.  For example, the number of female-headed families as a percentage of all families with children has more than doubled since the 1960s, rising to its current level of more than 21%.  Since nearly half of all such families headed by single mothers are poor, it is incredible to assert, as Ms. Coontz does, that changes in family structure have had a negligible impact on poverty.  Similarly, she asserts "black children living with two parents have a lower standard of living than white children living with only one parent."  The Census Bureau does not agree, showing that in 1986 a black married couple with children had an average post-tax income of $30,228, while families with children headed by white single women had an average post-tax income of $17,108.  Even after adjusting for differences in family size, the two-parent black family comes out well ahead.  Contrary to Ms. Coontz's beliefs, black married-couple families with children do reasonably well in our society, with a median income only 12% below similar white families.  The contention that "poverty derives from class, race and work relations, not family ones" simply misses the mark.  The primary cause of black poverty remains the disintegration of the family.  The black illegitimate birth rate now exceeds 60%.  More than 42% of black families with children are headed by single mothers, compared with 13% among whites.  The poverty rate of children in black single-headed families approaches 50%.  In contrast, the poverty rate of children in black two-parent families is 10.6%, compared with 6.4% in similar white families.  What caused the collapse of the black family?  There is some truth in both the liberal and conservative positions, i.e., both the welfare state and the decline in earnings and employment of black males have contributed.  However, Ms. Coontz's efforts to pin the fall in young black male employment primarily on economic factors is simplistic at best.  Her article also is devoid of positive policy suggestions.  Despite her pleas for accepting diversity in family structure, she fails to recognize that the current welfare system is structured primarily to assist non-employed single mothers.  It provides strong incentives for non-work and family dissolution.  In contrast, conservative policies of expanding the earned-income tax credit and providing badly needed tax relief to families in the $10,000 to $20,000 income range will help all families striving to be self-sufficient: both "traditional" and "non-traditional."  Conservatives also seek to empower low-income parents by placing resources directly in their hands, while old-style liberals favor trickle-down strategies, channeling funds to social-service monopolies that then provide bureaucratically selected "benefits" to the poor.  Robert Rector  Policy Analyst for Social Welfare and the Family  Heritage Foundation  Washington  ---  Why has the proportion of families headed by single mothers increased?  The explanation offered by Ms. Coontz points to "deeper structural transformations in the economy and polity" and "the economic marginalization of black men {that} began in the 1950s, as blacks were displaced from agriculture without being absorbed into manufacturing."  However, an analysis of Census data on the income of black men shows, to the contrary, that they have made enormous economic progress both in absolute terms and relative to white men.  For example, the annual wage and salary income of younger black men (ages 25 to 34) increased from 47% to 60% of that of white men between 1940 and 1960, and from 60% to 75% between 1960 and 1980.  Yet prior to 1960, the black family was largely composed of married-couple families.  In the years since 1979 the economy went into a deep recession followed by a slow but long recovery.  Poverty rose and then fell in response to these economic changes.  Ms. Coontz incorrectly views this cyclical change in poverty as a new trend (since 1979) in which two-parent families are becoming increasingly more important contributors to poverty.  What she misses is that the incomes of two-parent families are much more dependent on employment and earnings and, therefore, are more cyclically sensitive than those of single-parent families.  For this reason the share of family poverty accounted for by married-couple families rose during the recession and then declined during the recovery.  It is now back to its 1979 level.  The rate of increase in female family headship, however, did not accelerate during the recession years.  In fact there has been a significant slowdown in the formation of these families during the 1980s.  If economic distress is not the impetus for the rise in single-parent families, what then has caused it?  One likely catalyst, which Ms. Coontz dismisses, is the expansion and liberalization of the welfare system during the 1965-1975 period.  In many states, welfare came to provide a guaranteed income that was a tempting alternative to marriage or work, especially for those in the lower half of the income distribution.  In addition, cash benefits were increasingly supplemented with non-cash benefits -- food stamps, WIC program food benefits, Medicaid, subsidized housing -- and although they are not counted as income, they have contributed greatly to the economic attractiveness of the welfare alternative.  June O'Neill  Professor of Economics  Director, Center for the Study of Business and Government  Baruch College  City University of New York  New York  Shareholders of Bank north Group and Howard Bancorp approved a proposed merger, resulting in a holding company with assets of $1.6 billion called Banknorth Group, the companies said.  Completion of the merger is expected in the next few months.  Your July 13 article about the site of the Paris Summit, at La Defense, calls the office center a grimy jumble of steel and concrete.  I have been to La Defense many times and go out of my way to walk through the "jumble" since it is so enjoyable.  It is vibrant and exciting, truly a world-class office center.  It's exceptionally easy to get to, either by the RER, SNCF or Metro, which is being extended to make it even more accessible.  Getting there is certainly not "maddening," as you call it.  Gerald Z. Gibian  Greenwich, Conn.  NCR Corp. said it completed the sale of its South African unit to a Fintech Ltd. subsidiary of Allied Electronics Corp. Ltd., a South African-owned group of technology-based companies.  Terms of the sale were not disclosed but the computer company said there would be no substantial impact on revenue or earnings.  Concerning your July 7 page-one article "Legacy of Terror" about the Lockerbie air tragedy, which took the life of my husband, Raymond, the co-pilot:  Your description of Raymond did not even begin to scratch the surface of the true essence of the man.  Totally left out was his deep commitment to and involvement with children and young people ranging from the local children to seven shoeshine boys in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.  Also ignored was the manner in which I have dealt with the aftermath of this shattering tragedy.  I do not nor did I ever "dwell" on what Raymond might have done.  My immediate and ongoing need was to achieve some positive result out of this devastating experience.  That was accomplished with a scholarship fund established in memory of Raymond R. Wagner, which so far has raised enough capital to present two $1,000 awards from the generated income to two high-school graduates each year.  Contributions came from all over our nation, plus Canada, China, England and Scotland.  Norma Wagner  Pennington, N.J.  Ardsley Partners, a New York investment partnership, said it reduced its position in Occupational-Urgent Care Health Systems Inc. to 5.6% of the common shares outstanding.  Occupational-Urgent, Sacramento, Calif., provides medical-cost containment programs marketed to insurance firms.  Ardsley Partners "held the stock for a long time, and they were just doing some profit-taking," said a spokeswoman for Occupational-Urgent.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Ardsley Partners said it sold 106,000 Occupational-Urgent common shares from June 30 to Tuesday for $25.916 to $39.666 each.  It currently holds 253,500 shares, the filing said.  Ardsley Partners gave no reason in the filing for reducing its stake.  Tyler Corp. said its shareholders approved the sale of its Reliance Universal unit to Akzo N.V. in a complex stock transaction.  Under the transaction, all of Tyler's assets except its investment in Reliance and $165 million in debt were spun off into a new Tyler Corp. to Tyler's shareholders.  The old Tyler Corp. was acquired by Akzo for either Akzo shares or American depositary receipts.  Shareholders of the old Tyler had the option of receiving either one Akzo common share for each 13.74 Tyler shares owned or one Akzo-American depositary receipt, representing half of an Akzo common share, for every 6.87 Tyler shares owned.  Reliance makes a variety of industrial coatings.  Tyler now owns an industrial explosives concern and a maker of pipes and fittings.  Instead of a watershed event, next month's OPEC meeting is shaping up as a stop-gap session.  After the haggling of recent years over how to share oil markets, several oil ministers had looked to September as a possible historic turning point for the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  The idea -- initiated at June's acrimonious meeting where Kuwait joined the United Arab Emirates in openly flouting production quotas -- was that the ministers would gather quietly for 10 days to two weeks to discuss overhauling their entire system for parceling out production.  That plan seems to be unraveling, now.  The ministers had wanted to meet in Paris to try to develop a permanent system acceptable to all 13 oil exporters while ensuring them against another oil-price crash.  But Paris was too crowded this year, and they've had to settle on Geneva, where their meeting begins Sept. 23.  More recently, OPEC insiders are beginning to downgrade the importance of the meeting itself.  They now stress that the Geneva session isn't a formal conference and that there aren't any immediate plans to turn it into one.  It's actually a meeting of only the eight oil ministers who make up the OPEC monitoring committee, although all 13 ministers still are invited and could turn it into a special conference.  Some delegates suggest that nothing can come of the difficult launching of a new system of permanent quotas until the presidents and kings of the OPEC nations get together and decide to push it.  An OPEC summit is planned.  But it probably won't be held before late next year to coincide with OPEC's 30th anniversary.  A senior OPEC official confirmed that the organization's Vienna headquarters is conducting new studies on a permanent-quota system.  Also, he said, a proposal will be submitted to the oil ministers when they meet in Geneva.  "They will look at it," the OPEC official said, "but then it will have to go to a regular conference" later this year or next before there could be any action.  Although there is growing doubt that the September meeting will be able to go much beyond a preliminary discussion on a new system of long-term quotas, short-term allotments will definitely be on the agenda.  OPEC insiders agreed that something has to be done now to prevent current quota cheating from getting out of hand.  So what is likely to result in September, they said, will be a higher but temporary production ceiling just for the fourth quarter and based on hopes that total output won't rise.  Some OPEC members wouldn't be able to produce any more, even with higher quotas, the sources said.  Also, the increases might, at this time, be disproportionate to satisfy those countries such as Kuwait that currently ignore quotas and are pushing for a new permanent system.  "As a result, even if there is an increase in the quotas for the fourth quarter," said one OPEC delegate, "it won't make much difference in total production."  The likely ceiling for the fourth quarter is 20 million or 20.5 million barrels a day.  That compares to the current official ceiling of 19.5 million and actual production of some 21.5 million barrels a day.  That would hardly eliminate all the production cheating that goes on.  But it can shrink the total amount of cheating because it makes more of the production legal, OPEC delegates noted.  OPEC sources now readily confirm outside estimates that actual output of the 13 oil exporting countries is well beyond the current production ceiling.  Official production statistics released this week by OPEC's headquarters put total "supplies" for July for 12 of the 13 members at 18.7 million barrels a day, the highest level for the year.  This figure excludes the United Arab Emirates, which is widely known for its quota cheating and is believed to be producing some 700,000 barrels a day beyond its allotment of slightly more than one million barrels a day.  Shareholders of Wheelabrator Technologies Inc. and the Wheelabrator Group Inc. approved a proposal to merge into a new energy-recovery and recycling company named Wheelabrator Technologies Inc.  The merger was completed yesterday.  Short interest in Nasdaq over-the-counter stocks was up 4.2% in mid-August from a month earlier, reflecting growing pessimism about the outlook for the market's biggest issues.  The rise compares with a previously reported 14.3% jump in short interest on the New York Stock Exchange and a 6.4% rise on the American Stock Exchange, where short interest set another record during the July-August period.  Among the largest OTC issues, short interest was up 9% in the latest month after declining slightly in the previous period.  Stocks with big short-interest gains as of Aug. 15 included the American depositary receipts of Jaguar PLC, which saw a 400% jump to 1.5 million shares.  Short interest in Wheelabrator Technologies rose nearly as much, reaching 1.3 million shares.  In First Executive, the insurer that is a big buyer of junk bonds, short interest rose 68% to 2.1 million shares after a 35% rise the previous month.  For the third consecutive month, Meritor Savings Bank, with short interest of 4.6 million shares, had the largest short position on Nasdaq.  A short position generally represents a bet that a stock's price will fall.  In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares in the hope of being able to replace the shares later with ones purchased at a lower price.  Short interest is the number of shares borrowed and sold but not yet replaced.  Although heavy short-selling is generally regarded as a barometer of negative expectations for a stock, a firm base of short interest also can be viewed as a healthy sign, on the ground that shorted shares must eventually be replaced through buying.  Changes in short interest may also be caused by arbitrage.  For example, an investor may seek to profit in some merger situations by buying stock in one company involved and selling short the stock of the other.  Nasdaq stocks showing a drop in short interest included Sun Microsystems, whose short interest fell 19% to 2.9 million shares.  But Sun still had the fifth largest short interest position on Nasdaq in the latest period.  McCaw Cellular saw its short interest decline about 18% to 1.6 million shares.  Short interest in MCI Communications fell 24% to 954,161 shares.  The National Association of Securities Dealers, which operates the Nasdaq computer system on which 5,200 OTC issues trade, compiles short interest data in two categories: the approximately two-thirds, and generally biggest, Nasdaq stocks that trade on the National Market System; and the other one-third of the Nasdaq stocks that aren't part of that system.  The latest jump in short interest resulted from a surge in short-selling of larger stocks.  Short interest in 2,446 National Market System securities totaled 187.8 million shares, compared with 172.3 million shares in 2,390 issues in July.  The August short interest represents 1.94 days' average trading volume on the National Market System for the reporting period, compared with 1.95 days a month earlier.  Among smaller stocks, short interest tumbled 16%.  In non-NMS stocks, short interest in 1,344 issues totaled 34.2 million shares for August, down from 40.7 million shares in 1,304 securities for July.  The August figures represent 0.91 day's average volume, compared with 1.1 days in the June-July period.  The adjacent tables show the issues in which a short interest position of at least 50,000 shares existed as of Aug. 15 or in which there was a short position change of at least 25,000 shares since July 14 (see accompanying tables -- WSJ Aug. 22, 1989).  Japan's crude-oil imports in June grew 14.2% from May to about 99.1 million barrels, a preliminary report by the Ministry of International Trade and Industry said.  The report also showed an increase in sales of most petroleum products, particularly such light, or "white," products as motor gasoline and naphtha.  While crude sales were higher on the month, imports fell from year-earlier levels.  July 1988 imports, however, were exceptionally high, because refiners were bringing in oil ahead of an import tax that took effect in August last year.  This year's imports were in line with earlier growth patterns, the ministry said.  Conmed Corp., which makes medical products for surgery and critical care, said it will acquire Aspen Laboratories Inc., a unit of New York-based Bristol-Myers Co.'s Zimmer Inc. subsidiary.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Denver-based Aspen Labs makes electro-surgical products.  Bristol-Myers is a pharmaceuticals company.  Balance Sheet  The executive life is exacting.  Its rewards, though, are often quite high.  From your personal life you're subtracting  So your corporate perks multiply.  -- Louise Lane.  ---  Net Prophet  I'd be in a higher bracket  Of the tennis-playing set  If I had a bigger racket  And the court, a lower net.  -- G. Sterling Leiby.  ---  Daffynition  Riot leader: spur of the foment.  -- Manfred G. Davidson.  After scoring big with home sewing patterns and custom graphics, Triton Group Ltd. is turning to liquor.  The holding company and two San Diego investors have agreed to buy the assets of Liquor Barn, which is operating under federal bankruptcy-law protection.  Under the management of the investors, Harvey W. Rosen and Lewis H. Silverberg, Triton hopes to return the 68-store chain to its glory days as the nation's largest specialty liquor retailer.  The transaction, valued at $40 million, is subject to the signing of a definitive agreement, regulatory approvals and other conditions.  It is expected to close next month.  Liquor Barn seems like an odd fit with Triton's other interests, which range from steakhouses to turbine-engine overhauling, but Triton isn't patching together a classic 1960s-style conglomerate.  Triton and its 40% shareholder, Intermark Inc. of La Jolla, both specialize in buying stakes in promising, but usually underperforming, midsize companies.  Charles R. Scott, who heads both publicly traded concerns, believes in giving management a share of the equity, boosting performance, then selling out and moving on to the next business.  That formula worked well for such companies as Simplicity Patterns Co., which Triton sold at a $45 million profit for $117.5 million in fiscal 1988, and Continental Graphics Corp., in which it had an 89% stake and sold at a $79 million profit for $180 million last year.  Triton's largest investment is its 18.5% stake in Fuqua Industries Inc., an Atlanta-based consumer products and services company in which Triton intends to gain a controlling interest.  Triton also is considering merging with Intermark.  The two companies already share office space and much of their lean corporate staff.  While the Fuqua purchase stems from a longstanding friendly relationship with management, the Liquor Barn chain is more typical of Triton's taste for companies with underused assets.  "A valuable asset is the name Liquor Barn, which is a household name throughout California," Mr. Scott said of the latest venture.  Formed by Safeway Stores Inc. of Oakland, Calif., in 1979, Liquor Barn thrived as a discount merchandiser.  By 1986, the chain operated 104 stores with sales of more than $300 million, and maintained a loyal flock of customers drawn by aggressive pricing and deep inventories.  Majestic Wine Warehouse Ltd. of London bought Liquor Barn in 1987 for a reported $110 million, but new managers struggled with a heavy debt load and a problematic marketing program that tried to transform the bargain liquor outlets to more upscale stores.  If the acquisition proceeds on schedule, the investors hope to woo back old customers with the old Liquor Barn formula of low prices and wide selection at large supermarket-type stores.  As with other purchases, Triton intends to give the managers of its new units a free hand in running the companies.  "That autonomy is a key to our success," said Mitchell R. Woodbury, Triton's vice president and corporate counsel.  "It's important for the management to have a significant stake and eat their own cooking, as they say."  Because of the cyclical nature of Triton's investing strategy, the Liquor Barn purchase and last year's $95 million purchase of the Western Sizzlin Inc. franchised steakhouse chain, Triton doesn't expect to see immediate earnings growth.  For the fiscal year ended Jan. 31, Triton reported net income of $59.6 million, or $5.41 a share, on revenue of $155.6 million.  Sir Ron Brierley said he will step down as chairman of Brierley Investments Ltd. to be a "freewheeling" entrepreneur, searching out investment opportunities for the company he founded almost 30 years ago.  Separately, Brierley Investments said profit for the year ended June 30 will be at least 350 million New Zealand dollars (US$207.7 million).  In fiscal 1988, the company had after-tax profit of NZ$264.8 million.  Sir Ron will be succeeded by Bruce Hancox, deputy chairman.  There will be no new deputy chairman, and Paul Collins will remain chief executive.  Sir Ron, 52 years old, will take the title of founder/president and will remain on the board.  At a news conference yesterday, Sir Ron said Brierley won't be greatly changed by the shuffle.  "The most cynical view of it all is that it's exactly the same people doing exactly the same things with different titles," he said.  "But, more positively, I see myself having more of a freewheeling role to develop concepts and strategies and entrepreneurial activity without having the formal duties of chairman."  He said he doesn't expect any major changes to Brierley Investments with Mr. Hancox as chairman, but added: "The chairman obviously has a lot of influence on where the group does go, and with Bruce as chairman it may well be he will try to take it in a slightly different direction than I would."  Sir Ron said he hopes international investors will be as positive about the changes as he and other directors are, stressing that investors have long recognized that Brierley Investments hasn't been a one-man show.  Brierley's share price has risen steeply within the past month, to around NZ$2.50 (US$1.50) from below NZ$2 -- a gain Mr. Collins attributed mostly to investment from British institutions.  Sir Ron said there also won't be any initial changes to Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd., Brierley's Hong Kong-based subsidiary that invests primarily in Britain and the U.S.  But he said he may become more involved with Industrial Equity.  "I tend to go where the opportunities are, and logically the bigger and better opportunities are probably going to be outside of New Zealand."  Sir Ron said the decision to relinquish the chairmanship was difficult, and he made clear his commitment to the company.  While increases in Brierley's capital have diluted his shareholding to about 4% from an initial 20%, he said: "Whatever I do is still tied up with Brierley Investments."  Volunteer Capital Corp. said it completed the sale of the assets of its Mrs. Winner's division to RTM Inc., Atlanta, for about $30 million in cash and the assumption of certain lease obligations.  The company said the sale was approved last Friday by Winner's Corp. shareholders, who also approved changing the company's name to Volunteer Capital.  Volunteer Capital operates 50 Wendy's restaurants in four states.  RTM is an Arby's franchisee, and Mrs. Winner's is a chicken-and-biscuits restaurant chain.  Trimedyne Inc. said it received approval from the Food and Drug Administration to market its three-millimeter diameter Laser-probe SLR catheter.  The catheter, the largest-diameter device approved for marketing to date, is designed for use in laser-assisted balloon angioplasty or by itself to open leg arteries blocked by atherosclerosis, as an alternative to bypass surgery, Trimedyne said.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Trimedyne shares closed at $9, up 50 cents.  Trimedyne makes lasers and laser catheters for removing blockages from blood vessels.  The world's major gold futures exchange brought its biggest-ever disciplinary action, against a major figure in the continuing U.S. probe of New York futures trading.  The Commodity Exchange accused a 39-year-old gold and silver broker, Preston H. Semel, of "fraudulent conduct" and improper trading.  The Comex fined him and his company a total of $550,000 -- an extraordinarily large amount for a commodity-exchange disciplinary case.  In contrast, the exchange levied a total of $622,000 in trading fines during all of 1988.  The Comex, which posted notice of the disciplinary action yesterday, didn't disclose details of the alleged violations.  But traders and others familiar with the case said it largely involves trading in April 1987, when a Comex trade-processing snarl caused by an explosive rise in silver and other precious-metal prices forced Comex to close early for three days.  The events led to suspicion among traders about possible wrongdoing during the market chaos.  Mr. Semel is already involved in the U.S. criminal and civil investigation of New York's commodity exchanges that surfaced in May.  The office of Mr. Semel's commodity brokerage firm, Semel & Co., was searched by federal investigators in a surprise May 4 raid on the Comex and three other New York commodity exchanges.  Neither he nor anyone else has been charged in the joint investigation by the Justice Department and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, the futures industry's federal regulator.  The New York investigation is unrelated to the commodity-trading crackdown in Chicago by the Justice Department and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.  Mr. Semel couldn't be reached to comment.  But his attorney said Mr. Semel will fight the Comex ruling.  "We believe the decision is incorrect" and will be reversed, said David Bernfeld, a partner at Hoffinger Friedland Dobrish Bernfeld & Hasen in New York.  Mr. Bernfeld wouldn't elaborate, but said the ruling will be appealed to the CFTC. Meantime, Mr. Semel continues to trade on the Comex.  He is also a member of the New York Mercantile Exchange, the New York Cotton Exchange and the Coffee, Sugar & Cocoa Exchange.  According to the Comex disciplinary notice, Mr. Semel violated rules against disreputable or fraudulent conduct and against certain prohibited kinds of "dual" trading.  A trader who handles orders for both his own account and for customers is practicing dual trading; rules intend for the customers to come first.  Comex and other exchanges recently have renewed their support for dual trading -- when done within exchange rules -- despite the potential abuses associated with it.  The Comex said the Semel case was first presented by the exchange's business-conduct committee in June 1988.  The exchange said $350,000 of the fine was levied on Mr. Semel.  He also was suspended for nine months, although that ban isn't effective for 15 days and could be delayed pending a CFTC appeal.  The fine's other $200,000 was levied on Semel & Co.  CFTC or Justice Department charges in the investigation of the New York exchanges aren't expected for at least one or two months.  Meantime, investigators have been perusing thousands of documents.  But traders say they've grown jumpy in recent weeks as CFTC and U.S. postal-service inspectors have toured the exchanges' joint trading floor at the World Trade Center, their government badges in full view.  In Washington, bad ideas are like Arnold Schwarzenegger as the cyborg killer in "The Terminator."  They just won't die.  A case in point is the odd notion that taxpayers should subsidize big business, an idea many times buried but now making a comeback under the guise of U.S. high-technology "competitiveness."  A remarkable letter circulating privately in the Bush administration illustrates the heated internal debate over what used to be known as "industrial policy."  No one dares call it that anymore (industrial policy is supposed to be for Democrats), but as someone once said about taxes, "if it quacks like a duck . . ."  The quacking letter was written by Craig Fields, director of the Department of Defense's main research arm, at the request of Deputy Commerce Secretary Thomas Murrin.  It's candid in appealing for subsidy.  "It seems to me that the fundamental problem is: We have an American theology of how to approach competitiveness; other countries follow a different theology; their theology is working better," Mr. Fields writes, in a declaration of American defeat that would amaze the Soviets.  So what to do?  "We need a national religious conversion," Mr. Fields says, laying out a series of policy options -- subsidies, protection -- that would amount to an industrial policy baptism.  He adds, "A presidential state of the union initiative in U.S. information infrastructure and technology . . . would be nice."  Reached by telephone, Mr. Fields says the letter wasn't expressing his own views so much as summing up "what some people have been talking about."  The people he may have in mind are officials at the Commerce Department, who've become the leading lobbyists for corporate welfare.  They're waging an internal battle to provide federal support for high-definition television, or HDTV, a technology for sharper TV reception in which the Japanese have a huge lead.  In public, Commerce officials flee industrial policy like Poles from socialism.  "There's no industrial policy at Commerce. . . .  The reason is it doesn't work in the American context," says Wayne Berman, counselor to Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher and one of those on Mr. Fields's mailing list.  Mr. Berman is too coy.  He also leads an administration working group on HDTV that would be pressing boldly ahead if not for White House skepticism.  Earlier this summer, Mr. Berman put together a policy options paper that several sources describe as blatant HDTV "advocacy."  Its three options ranged from limited government support to full corporate socialism.  An option to do nothing wasn't even included.  With unwitting irony, one of the negatives listed under the socialist option was that someone might accuse the Bush administration of practicing industrial policy.  Aides to budget director Dick Darman, economics adviser Michael Boskin and Vice President Dan Quayle barraged the paper with critical comments that totaled more pages than the original.  A quieter attempt to resurrect the paper was also scotched, after the same senior aides heard about it.  In his letter, Mr. Fields may have had this trio in mind when he criticized "highly placed individuals who think . . . that everything will turn out all right if we persist just a little longer in following the American way."  Mr. Fields won't say whose "way" he supports, though presumably it's the Japanese or Korean.  Mr. Boskin won't comment on the debate, but says, "The president made it clear in the campaign that he believes that any policy which picked winners and losers, rather than letting the marketplace decide, is at best foolish and at worst dangerous."  Mr. Boskin says he favors "generic" changes to improve the U.S. economy -- e.g., an enhanced research and development tax credit, a capital gains tax cut -- but not subsidies for specific industries.  In other words, big new subsidies for HDTV are dead unless Mr. Mosbacher can somehow use his influence with George Bush to prevail.  Beyond the details, this dispute matters because it's a prelude to what may be the most important political debate of the 1990s.  With communism ebbing, the next great threat to freedom is the corporate, mercantile state.  Democrats like Rep. Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.) think mercantile policies are the path back to a political majority.  Many Republicans have a soft spot for big business or "national security" pleaders.  Japan is their new common enemy.  All of these neo-statists should read George Gilder's luminous new book, "Microcosm."  It's a freedom-lover's guide to high technology.  "In the world-wide rivalry in information technology," Mr. Gilder writes, "the greatest American advantage is that the U.S. system, for all its flaws, accords best with the inner logic of the microcosm."  Mr. Gilder's microcosm is the world of the computer and microchip, where individual creativity and work, rather than bureaucratic control, are the key to success.  The U.S. is already winning this rivalry -- despite such self-imposed handicaps as awful schools.  In the case of HDTV, U.S. politicians are frantic to catch up with the Japanese to make what Mr. Gilder says is already a "dead technology."  HDTV offers a sharper picture, but it remains a passive, reception -- only technology.  The better, and not too distant, future will be computerized, interactive TV.  The equivalent of a Cray supercomputer, with a video screen, will eventually sit in your living room.  Unless, of course, the industrial politicians decide to get in the way.  Investors burned in the Washington Public Power Supply System's massive bond default are getting a new chance to recoup their losses, this time in state court.  The Washington state Supreme Court has given the green light to about 25,000 bondholders to proceed with a class action filed against the state in 1984.  The bondholders could gain at least $2 billion, the face value of the bonds plus interest to date.  Investors sued the state for fraud and negligence after WPPSS defaulted on $2.25 billion in bonds sold in 1983 to finance the building of two nuclear power plants.  It was the largest municipal bond default in U.S. history.  The same group also filed a federal suit alleging securities fraud against about 100 public utilities, as well as securities firms and engineers involved with the projects.  Late last year the bondholders entered into the last of several settlements in the federal suit, in which defendants agreed to pay the plaintiffs $747 million.  Washington's legislature appropriated $10 million as its share of the settlement.  A federal court in Tucson, Ariz., still must approve the settlements.  Meanwhile, the state court case was deadlocked over the issue of whether the bondholders had any legal basis for their claims against the state.  The plaintiffs contend that Washington is culpable in the WPPSS default because the state auditor was negligent in signing off on the bond sale.  The plaintiffs also allege that the auditor's certification of the bonds contained fraudulent and negligent misrepresentations and that the state's participation in the decision to abandon the plants interfered with the contractual relations between the supply system and the bondholders.  In July 1985, a state court in Washington said the plaintiffs didn't have the right to pursue the case.  The state couldn't be sued for any role it may have played in the sale of the bonds, the court ruled.  The case was dismissed.  In May 1988, the state Supreme Court, responding to the bondholders' appeal, reversed the 1985 decision of the lower court and upheld the bondholders' right to press eight of their nine claims against the state.  The court ruled that the state couldn't shield itself from liability in the case.  The state then filed a motion to have the case reconsidered.  But on July 27 this year, Washington's high court denied the state's motion and gave the bondholders the go-ahead to take their case to trial.  "We're gratified that the court has validated our case and we're preparing to take it to trial if necessary," said Theodore Steingut, an attorney for the plaintiffs at the New York law firm Berger & Steingut.  "A whole new chapter in the WPPSS litigation is about to unfold."  Attorneys for the state disagree.  They are not making plans for a trial, they say.  Instead, the state attorneys are eagerly awaiting the Tucson federal court's decision on the settlements.  The judge's approval could derail or at least delay the state case once again, the attorneys argue.  Ed Mackie, an attorney at the state attorney general's office in Olympia, Wash., said that if the state's $10 million share of the settlement is approved, he will urge Washington's high court to reconsider the bondholders' suit against the state.  Because the class of bondholders are the same in the state and federal cases, he believes the settlement in federal court satisfies the state's obligation to the plaintiffs.  "The Tucson settlement is a comprehensive settlement to resolve all claims for people, whether named in the suit or not," said Mr. Mackie.  Mr. Steingut said that to dispense with a state case through federal court would be "irregular."  He added: "There was never any negotiation between the state and bondholders."  ---  Alexandra Peers contributed to this article.  Shippers are trying to dodge a cantankerous dispute between CSX Corp. and Guilford Transportation Industries Inc., which they say could derail freight shipments of $32 million a year.  The multilayered squabble, replete with insults, a lawsuit and filings at the Interstate Commerce Commission in Washington, involves freight charge payments between CSX and Guilford's Maine Central Railroad Co. unit.  Also at issue are the financial health of closely held Guilford and the fate of the bankrupt Delaware & Hudson Railway.  "It's an old-fashioned pistol duel between railroads, with the shippers dead center in the line of fire," says Fred Zitto, manager of U.S. distribution operations of International Paper Co., based in Purchase, N.Y.  "We want them to go off and settle it themselves and not hurt us."  Earlier this month CSX and Guilford filed conflicting tariffs at the ICC. CSX, the Richmond, Va.-based transportation company, said it will stop interchanging freight with the Maine Central effective Aug. 30 unless CSX collects all charges from freight shippers and receivers.  Guilford, North Billerica, Mass., then said its Maine Central unit would stop doing business with CSX on the same day unless Guilford collects all payments on shipments between the two railroads.  The tariffs filed by CSX and Guilford are "an obvious effort by the carriers to retaliate against each other," said James Bartley, executive director of the National Industrial Transportation League.  That shipper group and other shippers are vigorously protesting the filings at the ICC, warning that freight shipments between the two railroads would cease if both tariffs are allowed to take effect.  By some estimates, 12,700 freight cars a year are transported between CSX and the Maine Central at an average rate of about $2,500 a car.  Most of the cars carry paper or paper products from Maine and chemicals or clay from the South to Maine paper mills.  Under normal rail industry practices, the carrier that delivers the freight collects from the shipper and once a month pays intermediate carriers their share of the freight haul.  The arrangement particularly benefits smaller railroads such as the 325-mile Maine Central which terminate substantial volumes of freight and are able to control the cash an extra 15 to 45 days.  Officials of CSX, which operates 19,300 route miles, now want to collect all payments from customers shipping between CSX and the Maine Central.  That's because they say the Maine Central has failed to make timely settlement of its inter-line balances due CSX.  For example, CSX said Maine Central paid the $745,000 owed to CSX last month a week-and-a-half late and then not in the full amount.  CSX is a "financially responsible carrier," the company said in its ICC filing.  But the Maine Central's "financial status is questionable."  Last year CSX began to collect payments from shippers moving freight beween CSX and the Boston & Maine Co., another Guilford rail subsidiary, which CSX said failed to make timely payments in excess of $100,000 to CSX.  Guilford officials bristle at such charges.  "It just makes me angry," said F. Colin Pease, a Guilford vice president, adding that "CSX is an enormous Goliath railroad picking on the Maine Central."  Mr. Pease said Guilford's rail operations, had first-half net income of $13 million on revenue of about $60 million.  The company's first-half earnings include more than $7 million from sale of stock and real estate.  In a suit filed in federal court in Alexandria, Va., early this month, Guilford charged CSX with making "false and misleading statements" about Guilford.  For example, Guilford said a CSX official told a shipper that Guilford "is not paying and cannot pay its bills and is about to declare bankruptcy."  CSX acknowledged that an official had said that Maine Central was late in making payments to CSX but denied any statements about Guilford's financial health.  Guilford's suit also charged that by seeking to collect payment on shipments to Maine Central destinations CSX threatened to erode Guilford's freight business and profits and impede Guilford's ability to make a bid for the bankrupt Delaware & Hudson Sept. 25.  In June 1988 the Delaware & Hudson, then a subsidiary of Guilford, filed for Chapter 11 protection because efforts to reduce the railroad's labor costs collapsed.  Guilford said CSX is lending financial and other support to Delaware Otsego Corp., Cooperstown, N.Y., the interim operator of the Delaware & Hudson and a likely bidder for the railroad.  Guilford is no stranger to controversy.  In 1986 the company mounted an attack on railroad work rules, but Congress settled a three-month strike at Guilford on terms favorable to labor.  Guilford then transferred the Boston & Maine and Maine Central to Springfield Terminal, a subsidiary that has lenient work rules.  That maneuver was followed by more labor unrest.  Guilford, owned by Timothy Mellon of the Pittsburgh Mellon family, likes to portray itself as a scrappy railroad willing to fight battles vital to the railroad industry's future that bigger carriers would rather avoid.  However, other railroads say Guilford is needlessly confrontational.  Working at Guilford is "like being on the operations deck of an attack destroyer," said David Fink, chairman of Guilford's rail system.  But "CSX is like being on the fantail of Donald Trump's yacht.  We're out there toiling in the vineyards, not sunning ourselves."  A CSX spokeswoman responded, "I can't fathom what he's talking about."  A group of visiting U.S. lawmakers asked Solidarity leader Lech Walesa this week what the U.S. could do to revive the stagnant Polish economy.  His instant answer: Open a bank.  "He said it several times, very animated," recalls Sen. Charles Robb (D., Va.).  "He said, 'I want a bank, and it will have a big sign that says American Bank, and computers that link it directly to the U.S.'"  In the wake of yesterday's historic assumption of power by a Solidarity prime minister, U.S. government officials have begun working on programs to nurture Poland's flight from communism.  It is a sort of mini-Marshall Plan, designed to plant the seeds of capitalism -- such as a banking system -- in hopes of jump-starting sectors of the Polish economy.  And it seeks to avoid the mistake of the 1970s, when the Western money that poured into Poland only delayed economic reform.  U.S. planners say they are focusing on specific economic targets:  -- Banks.  Even before Mr. Walesa's request to the senators, U.S. officials had discussed ways of getting U.S. banking expertise into Poland, citing Citibank's successful joint venture in Budapest as a model.  Mr. Walesa maintains Poles have lost faith in their own government-controlled banks.  "He said there's $5 billion in that economy that they'd like to smoke out and put to work," says Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.), who also visited Warsaw last week.  -- Farming.  While nearly all Polish industry is owned by the government, more than 70% of Polish farms are privately owned.  Thus, administration officials believe agriculture may be an area where they can teach the Poles to operate more efficiently.  The State Department already has been in contact with a foundation, established by David Rockefeller, that last year began a program to assist Polish pig farmers in exporting hams to the U.S.  -- The World Bank.  The U.S. has begun pushing the international lending institution to act on two project loans to Poland valued at $325 million.  The loans have been pending for several years, but the bank's staff didn't push for approval because of the U.S. and other nations opposed loans for Communist Poland.  If the approach works, it could well become the working model for future Western efforts to respond to sweeping economic and political changes in Hungary, the Baltic states and even the Soviet Union itself.  In part, the administration's modest response is born of necessity.  With its current budget deficit and other economic woes, the U.S. simply isn't in a position to provide Poland with aid on the scale of the post-World War II Marshall Plan.  "We've looked pretty hard at what resources are available," says Deputy Secretary of State Lawrence Eagleburger, "and we have one hell of a budgetary problem."  Moreover, adds one official working on the Polish package, "it's appropriate for Europe to take the lead on this" because of its geographic and economic ties.  Playing down the U.S. role also helps avoid provoking the Soviet Union into thinking the U.S. is taking advantage of the mounting turmoil in Moscow's empire.  The most important constraint on U.S. aid, though, is the bitter lesson learned from previous efforts to help Poland.  Much of the $24 billion the West pumped into the Polish economy in the 1970s wound up being used to prop up inefficient industries, leaving the country with $40 billion in debt it can't repay.  "The one thing the West should not do is repeat the mistake of the 1970s, and give cash to a child," says Polish journalist Andrzej Wroblewski, a fellow at the Wilson Center in Washington.  Before Western assistance can be of much help, experts agree, Poland must make major economic reforms on its own.  The vast majority of Poles are employed by inefficient, state-controlled enterprises that are supported by continuous government subsidies.  In an effort to curry favor with workers prior to last June's election, the government more than tripled those subsidies to accommodate wage rises, flooding the Polish economy with zlotys.  The result was rampant inflation, running over 100% this year.  The International Monetary Fund has already quietly begun talks with Polish officials on crafting an economic reform plan, and new Prime Minister Tadeusz Mazowiecki has indicated he will carry through with plans to meet again with IMF officials next month.  But an IMF program certainly will involve curbing subsidies, cutting wages and allowing some inefficient industrial dinosaurs to fail.  It's far from clear whether Solidarity, which has militantly opposed such measures in the past, can muster the political will to accomplish this task.  "We have to be skeptical of what will go on because we have in power a government that primarily represents labor interests," says Jan Vanous of PlanEcon, a Washington economic consulting firm specializing in Eastern bloc nations.  "In the past, the objective of Solidarity has been to protect living standards and guarantee against a reduction in real wages.  Now they must do just the opposite."  Once it's clear that economic reform is under way, the biggest infusion of Western cash could come in the form of relief on Poland's onerous debt.  In his meeting with U.S. lawmakers, Mr. Walesa emphasized the need for debt relief, which he counts as a key part of the $10 billion package he has requested from the West.  The U.S. government holds only $2 billion to $3 billion of Poland's debt; most of it is owed to European governments.  Nevertheless, Treasury officials have been pushing for an early refinancing.  White House Chief of Staff John Sununu says the biggest dollar help for the Polish economy could come from debt relief, rather than direct government aid.  Polish officials are already working on a reform plan that would include a big dose of debt relief, according to U.S. businessman George Soros, who has close contacts with the Poles.  He says that plan calls for reducing industrial subsidies, enacting currency reform, and creating a market-oriented economy for most commodities.  In return, Mr. Soros says, the Poles would like the West to declare a three-year moratorium on debt service, which totaled about $1.6 billion last year.  They would also like to receive $1 billion from the IMF and between $600 million and $700 million from the World Bank in this period, plus an agreement from the European Community to open its market to Polish exports.  If that can be accomplished, Mr. Soros says, Poland could eventually attract substantial amounts of private foreign capital.  U.S. officials agree that, despite the current state of its economy, Poland has many attractive qualities for foreign investors: a trained and educated work force, wage levels considerably below those of Western Europe and Hungary, a central location well suited to European trade, and rich farmland.  "The main point is to emphasize that Poland is a dirt-cheap country," says Mr. Vanous.  "If you spend $100 million in the U.S. you don't get much.  In Poland, you own a hell of a lot."  Many U.S. experts agree that an important first step toward capitalism in Poland would be the establishment of a private commercial banking system.  That step was taken three and a half years ago in Hungary when Citibank opened the first private bank there.  The bank, 80%-owned by Citibank with the rest held by the National Bank of Hungary, provides full banking services to Hungarian corporations.  Such an operation in Poland would give private companies access to capital and help free them from the government subsidy system.  Establishing new private farm programs also will help.  But ultimately Poland itself will have to create an environment where market forces guide economic behavior rather than the government.  "Right now, they have economic apathy," says Paul Marer, professor of international business at Indiana University.  "They have to learn how to create a system and a psychology in which they can approach the productivity of the Polish people in Chicago."  (See related story: "Mazowiecki Vows to Form Coalition Government Reflecting All Factions" -- WSJ Aug. 25, 1989)  STONE CONTAINER Corp. said it extended until 5 p.m. EDT next Friday its offer to purchase all -- and not less than all -- of the $75 million principal amount outstanding of its Stone Forest Industries unit's 15 3/4% senior subordinated notes, due 1997.  The Chicago-based paper-packaging products maker's offer had been scheduled to expire at 5 p.m. EDT yesterday.  Though all $75 million of the notes had been tendered as of yesterday morning pursuant the offer, Stone said, the extension was made because all of the conditions hadn't been satisfied before the scheduled expiration.  A Stone official said the financing needed to complete the transaction -- related to the previously announced purchase of the 51% of Stone Forest that the parent doesn't already own -- hadn't been completed.  But he said, "We do not expect an additional extension," as the financing package nears completion.  LTV Corp. received a $43 million Army contract for heavy trucks.  Grumman Corp. was awarded a $14.1 million Navy contract for aircraft-electronics equipment.  Rockwell International Corp. received a $12 million Air Force contract for B-1B flight tests.  Tadeusz Mazowiecki became Poland's first non-Communist prime minister in 45 years, winning an overwhelming vote in the Polish Sejm, or parliament.  Mr. Mazowiecki, a Roman Catholic thinker and a leader of the Solidarity trade-union movement, was moved into office by a vote of 378-4, with 41 abstentions.  He thus received more than 130 votes from Communist Party members.  In a brief and moving acceptance speech, Mr. Mazowiecki pledged to be the "prime minister of all Poles" and said he would assemble a coalition government representing all factions in the Sejm, including the Communists.  He declined, during his speech and later at a news conference, to give details of his new government, saying he was just starting to work on it but hoped to complete it by the end of the month.  The Communists will certainly retain control of the Interior and Defense ministries, and thus the police and the army, as well as getting one or two other key posts.  But Solidarity is likely to reserve for itself control of the judicial system and has pledged to open up the state-run mass media to dissenting voices.  "Deep reform can only come from a government acting on behalf of all political forces in the country," he added, a reference to possible obstruction of the new government by Communist Party members in Parliament and in millions of local-government and state-industry jobs all over Poland.  He appealed for the Communists and everyone else to "make it normal" for governments of different hues to come in and out of power, and said "constant political struggle must give way to partnership."  Mr. Mazowiecki outlined few specfics of his new government's program.  He said his economic philosophy was that "the State can't guarantee everything, it can only make it easier for economic actors to act."  He called Poland's economic situation "critical" and said his long-term strategy would be to "bring back the long-proven institution of the market."  He said, "We are moving back to a market economy where the role of the state is more like that in developed countries."  The government's first priority, he added, would be to try to tackle Poland's inflation, estimated at an annual rate of more than 100%.  He said the lack of "balance" that causes such inflation "increases social tensions," a reference to chronic strikes for higher wages to keep up with galloping prices.  But he didn't indicate how he would fight inflation.  He asked all workers to end their strikes to give the government a chance.  "He's got to show real progress on bringing prices down and getting more goods in the shops," said a European diplomat who listened to the speech.  "They've got a couple of months to prove things are changing.  Otherwise people will come back from their vacations broke, find prices skyrocketing and increase their pay demands.  Sooner or later Mazowiecki will have to quit, and then Poland is in a real mess."  Although Mr. Mazowiecki and other Solidarity leaders, including Lech Walesa, who is the chairman of the union, have appealed for economic aid from both West and East, the new prime minister said: "Poland's economic problems will be solved by Poles.  Our own inventiveness and patience will determine whether we succeed."  But he added: "The world is watching the changes here with much hope."  Foreign countries should send whatever help they can soon, he said, to help Poland succeed, "rather than waiting for Poland to sink."  Solidarity has asked for $10 billion in Western aid and loan forgiveness.  Mr. Mazowiecki reiterated previous statements that his government would stay firmly in the Warsaw Pact military alliance and the Soviet-led Council for Mutual Economic Assistance, or Comecon, an economic grouping that includes most of Eastern Europe plus Soviet allies Cuba, Vietnam and Mongolia.  "The real question is, can things get better?" the new prime minister said.  "We will all answer this together.  Poland will be different if everybody here wants it to be."  Mr. Mazowiecki's speech got a warm reception from the Solidarity benches, a polite reception from two of its coalition partners, the Peasants' and Democratic parties, and a frosty reception from the Communists.  Party parliamentary chief Marian Orzechowski, who abstained in the vote, said he wanted to hear more specifics of Mr. Mazowiecki's program and government before he lends his full backing.  "If he keeps his promises on letting us participate, then I'll vote with the government the next time," he said.  Political analysts here said that the role of the Communists remains crucial to the success of the new regime and that they could probably torpedo Mr. Mazowiecki if they wanted to by withholding their support.  But because Communist-led regimes have failed repeatedly this year to win public backing, they might face harsh political consequences.  At his news conference, Mr. Mazowiecki, a devout Catholic, said he intended to maintain the separation of church and state, because he didn't want to "replace one 'one-outlook' government with another."  He said that while he personally opposed abortion, he wouldn't favor recriminalization of it here, adding that "education is a better method than law to fight abortion."  The new prime minister then left the news conference in a welter of TV cameras and hopped into a bright-blue Polish limousine for a meeting with his political mentor, Mr. Walesa.  After that, he said, he was going to call his spiritual mentor: Pope John Paul II.  (See related story: "'Mini-Marshall Plan' Targets Banking, Farm Sectors For American Funding" -- WSJ Aug. 25, 1989)  The New York Stock Exchange delisted Armada Corp., following the alloy metals maker's buy-back of as many as 300,000 common shares.  A Big Board spokeswoman said the company was delisted because fewer than 600,000 Armada common shares were held by the public.  Armada officials were unavailable to confirm how many of its shares the company purchased in the tender offer that expired Tuesday.  Wherever trees grow on private land, forest owners seem to draw the ire of their governments.  The government of Ontario has a problem with the way many of its small, private woodlot owners tend their forests: They won't cut down their trees.  The government's surveys conclude that these smallholders -- mostly farmers, professionals and retirees, who control more than 10 million acres of timberland -- have what the government's experts call "a rather indifferent attitude" toward their land.  The Ontario government, like governments in wooded areas everywhere, wants to stimulate the exploitation of its forests.  But no matter what it tries -- and that includes everything from free advice and harvesting services to tax holidays for those joining a government Woodlot Improvement Plan -- most woodlot owners refuse to clear-cut their private forests for personal gain, or even to harvest their older timber at the accelerated rate the government favors.  Deforestation and the degradation of Ontario's forest lands make the papers every day in Ontario, but it isn't the private sector, which owns less than 10% of Ontario's timber, that is to blame.  The deforestation is occurring in the government's land.  While governments act like capitalists, seeing trees as piles of lumber and talking of economic growth, woodlot owners often attend to more spiritual needs: cross country skiing, hunting, birdwatching, or simply the pleasure of owning a piece of wooded land.  When they do sell their trees, they tend to avoid clear-cutting and they hold out for prices that are typically two or three times those set by the government for timber.  Sweden has more standing forest today than at any time in its past; bogs have been reclaimed and reforestation is mandatory.  Unlike Canada, most of the forest land is privately owned, but the government of Sweden, too, has a problem with its small woodlot owners: Sweden's forest industry has become a major importer of wood because the smallholders don't want to cut down their trees fast enough.  Each year, Sweden grows 100 million cubic meters of wood while harvesting only 70 million cubic meters, leaving a large and growing surplus on private ground.  This surplus has also stimulated a national debate over whether to "use the carrot or the whip" to get the woodlot owners to see things the state's way, says Anders Luden, agricultural attache at the Swedish Embassy in Washington.  Sweden's forest industry -- the country's second-largest industry and largest net foreign-exchange earner -- is strictly, and from the government's point of view successfully, managed as an economic resource.  Woodlot owners are required to reforest, but they are also required to harvest at least half of their trees within a decade after they mature.  Wild, unmanaged stands are forbidden, lest the nation's economy be hurt.  But these smallholders still exercise too much control, asserts Mr. Lunden, explaining that the country's forest management plans are being thwarted by the smallholders' growing affluence, which allows them to forgo the income that harvesting would bring.  Neighboring Finland also has a huge forest industry and, like Sweden, has more forest than ever before.  Five years ago, when the industry was importing 30% of its wood, the Central Association of Forest Industries, a trade association, blamed its woes on the ignorance of many of the country's 300,000 small woodlot owners, who were refusing to cut their wood out of "their gut reaction . . . to leave the trees alone, even though the forest environment actually deteriorates without judicious felling."  The industry lamented being "reduced to importing wood, while all the time we were surrounded by trees ready to be felled."  The Finnish government agreed that the small woodlot owners posed a problem: New government and industry measures -- augmenting a pre-existing policy that taxed the recalcitrant woodlot owners on the amount they would have earned if they had harvested their trees -- have since reduced imports to about 10% of the total wood used.  But because increasing numbers of Finnish forest owners live in urban areas, and derive a yield from their woodlots that can't be measured solely in board feet, industry and government fear a resurgence of smallholder intransigence.  In Third World countries, too, the state encourages the plunder of the forest while the traditional owners of the forest -- whether individual property owners or, more often, small village or tribal communities -- vainly attempt to stave off remote governments.  In Brazil's Amazon basin, the government has subsidized the tearing down and burning of a forested area bigger than all of France over this past decade, according to the World Bank.  Subsidies of various kinds have deforested other regions of Latin America, several Asian countries, and much of Africa, often after decentralized forest holdings fell under central government control.  Federal ownership of almost 200 million acres of forest land has served U.S. forests poorly since World War II, when large-scale commercial harvesting began in the forests taken into the national trust by President Theodore Roosevelt earlier in this century.  Much of this silviculture is unprofitable: The logging on more than half the Forest Service's lands loses about $100 million a year.  Much of this loss is incurred in the Rocky Mountains, where logging on unstable soils and difficult slopes boosts both harvesting costs and wilderness damage.  Overall, however, the Forest Service turns a profit, primarily due to its highly lucrative but irreplaceable coastal rainforests, which are being logged at record rates to keep Northwest sawmills in business.  The Wilderness Society fears that America's remaining rainforests, most of which are controlled by the Forest Service, could disappear within 15 years.  Because governments around the world have such an abysmal record, environmentalists like the World Resources Institute, a U.N-funded Washington think tank, have come to favor returning state lands to private landowners and local communities, which, on the whole, have maintained their lands far better.  Private owners don't cut at a loss, they don't cut for employment reasons, and they manage their forests not as an undifferentiated commodity but as multi-purpose properties with timber being but one asset.  Governments have differing reasons for exploiting their forests: In Ontario, where the government sells its trees to logging companies for an average of 85 cents apiece, the purpose is the maintenance of forestry jobs; in Brazil the Amazon was seized from local inhabitants under land re-distribution, then harvested or burned for agricultural production; in Scandinavia the forest is little more than a feedstock for the forest products industry.  But whatever the government's motive, the result is generally the same: Forests meet a premature end, the plant and animal species nurtured by overmature trees suffer, timber gluts the marketplace and the price of wood is artificially depressed.  These low prices further discourage proper management of forest lands.  Because Ontario loggers don't own their land, and the government loses money on every tree it harvests, neither has an economic incentive to replant.  The government has scant political incentive either.  Other than token planting programs to demonstrate a concern for reforestation, the government presides over the deterioration of its holdings, since the chief political benefit of new stands to harvest -- credit for forest products jobs -- would go to the complete strangers who would be in power 80 years later when the trees mature.  Were governments to maintain only true wilderness areas (or to turn these over to conservation organizations), and then return the balance of their forests to private hands, and to the indigenous communities that have successfully managed them since time immemorial, the value of forest lands would climb to recognize their true market value: not only their worth as logpiles but also their recreational value, their development value, their ecological value, and their spiritual value to individuals from so many societies -- including our own -- around the world.  ---  Mr. Solomon is executive director of Environment Probe, a Toronto-based environmental organization.  National Education Corp., as expected, named its acting president, Jerome W. Cwiertnia, to be president and chief operating officer.  Mr. Cwiertnia, 48 years old, resigned as president in March to seek an operating chief's post at another company.  H. David Bright, 55, who then was National Education's chairman, also was named acting president.  Mr. Bright, however, resigned as chairman, chief executive officer and acting president last month during a management realignment.  This change, a spokesman said yesterday, reflected poor recent financial results at the vocational and industrial training and educational publishing company.  Mr. Bright has remained on the board, though he hasn't taken an operating position at any company, the spokesman said.  David C. Jones, 68, remains chairman and acting chief executive.  National Education also said it named Kenneth G. Riedlinger to its six-member board, filling a vacancy created earlier this year by the resignation of Eugene Auerbach.  Mr. Riedlinger, 49, is president of the company's Applied Learning subsidiary.  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits rose to a seasonally adjusted 323,000 in the week ended Aug. 12 from 317,000 in the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended Aug. 5 increased to a seasonally adjusted 2,205,000, or 2.2% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,185,000 in the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was 2.1%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended Aug. 5 rose to 2,131,800 from a revised 2,123,500 a week earlier.  These figures aren't adjusted for seasonal change.  Marion Laboratories Inc. is being removed from the drug industry group of the Dow Jones Equity Market Index, effective today.  The company is being 67%-acquired by Dow Chemical Co.  Also effective today, Wheelabrator Group Inc. is changing its name to Wheelabrator Technologies Inc.; it will remain in the pollution and waste-management industry group.  Longtime Republican speech writer Vic Gold in the September issue of the American Spectator:  In the flush of recent victories, conservatives would do well to consider that most fundamental principle of all political principles in a democracy: What goes around comes around.  Phillips Petroleum Corp. said five people were injured in an explosion in the boiler house of its plastics manufacturing facility here.  The cause of the explosion, which has temporarily halted production, wasn't immediately known.  The oil and chemical concern said the explosion occurred about 9:30 a.m. yesterday at the Houston Chemicals Complex, east of Houston in the Houston ship channel area.  A company spokesman said four of the injured workers were contract employees and one was an employee of Phillips.  The company manufactures polyethylene, polypropylene and K-resin plastics at the facility.  The extent of damage caused by the explosion hasn't been determined, although the spokesman described it as "minimal."  The savings and loan bailout bill slid through Congress in time to let the lawmakers go home for a summer vacation.  As legislation it was enormously expensive -- no one yet knows just how expensive it will turn out to be.  The upshot will be massive organizational changes, with many S&Ls disappearing -- some of them into commercial banks and some of them, well, just disappearing.  One thing, however, has not and probably won't change: Politicians will go right on playing games with the S&Ls.  An example of that is the bailout bill's provision requiring Federal Home Loan Banks, which supposedly oversee the thrift units, to set aside part of earnings to finance low-income mortgages.  Such mortgages may be a good idea, but the fundamental job here is, or should be, trying to restore some order to the industry.  The savings and loan mess did not happen suddenly -- its beginnings go back at least 25 years.  The system, in effect, was borrowing short (soliciting money from depositors) and lending long (making home mortgage loans).  This worked reasonably well until the mid-1960s, when market interest rates began to move higher; suddenly, thrifts faced the possibility that their income wouldn't cover their outgo.  A sensible political solution would have been to tighten up monetary and fiscal policy and thus promote lower inflation -- and lower interest rates.  The politicians didn't like that idea, and in the 1970s the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries helped push inflation and interest rates even higher.  The politicians came up with one stopgap after another.  Interest-rate ceilings were set, with the S&Ls allowed to pay a little more than the banks.  No one saw this as a full solution, but politicians thought it might push the problem over to the people on the next watch.  During the 1970s it occurred to some observers that S&Ls might have outlived their usefulness.  It was suggested that those that could meet the capital requirements might become commercial banks and that others would be phased out.  The thought was that a pre-emptive strike might make sense, since many thrifts seemed to be headed for trouble.  That idea didn't appeal to the industry, since a number of firms simply could not meet bank capital standards, and death wasn't an especially appealing alternative.  Instead, the politicians were persuaded to apply new patches to the industry.  In the early 1980s, for instance, S&Ls were allowed to broaden their portfolios, making other types of loans and even some direct equity investments.  Little thought apparently was given to the fact that thrifts were experienced only in home mortgage lending.  The rules were changing so fast that it was hard to keep track of them.  Before Congress finished work on the bailout bill, Edward Kane, an Ohio State University economist, was thinking about the politics of the S&L mess.  What irritated him especially was that there appeared to be no effort to stop politicians from extracting political payoffs from troubled firms.  "Politicians are allowed to reap short-term quasi-extortionary benefits from not settling festering regulatory problems," he said.  "The existence of recognized but unsettled problems creates opportunities to shake down political action committees and various individuals interested in financial legislation."  It has been evident at least since the beginning of the 1980s that the various short-term palliatives that were being tried were not going to be enough.  There was going to have to be a head-on attack on the problem, and the cost of the attack was growing with every day that an overhaul was postponed.  "However," Mr. Kane notes, "from 1965 to 1989 federal authorities sought principally only to buy time."  There are at least two sad aspects to the federal "solution."  First, there is only a limited amount of true reform in the bill.  The tougher capital requirements are surely a step in the right direction.  For too long the inclination of the politically sensitive system has been to move the opposite way.  There is much to be said, too, for limiting the thrifts' investments largely to mortgages, which were, after all, the reason for the S&Ls' existence.  Beyond those two areas, however, there is little that looks like reform.  The thrifts will have to pay larger premiums for deposit insurance, but the insurance system, which many people think was the major cause of the mess, survives largely intact.  There will, however, be an 18-month government "study" of the insurance setup.  At least equally important, the politicians apparently are free to pursue business as usual.  One indication of this is in the bailout bill.  Danny Wall, the beleaguered head of the Federal Savings & Loan Insurance Corp., has powerful political friends and was allowed to keep his job.  Moreover, it was arranged so that he won't need Senate confirmation, which might have led to a rehashing of all of the S&L problems on his watch.  Mr. Kane would have liked to see several provisions in the bill, none of which showed up.  First, he wanted changes in the appraised market value of federal deposit guarantees to be entered each year in the federal budget.  This would at least have given taxpayers a clearer idea of the liabilities they might be facing.  Second, "members of Congress must be required to report their efforts to win lenient regulatory treatment for individual constitutents to their banking and ethics committees.  In turn, these committees must be required to define limits of appropriate constituent service and to impose sanctions on any member who oversteps these bounds."  Finally, Mr. Kane said, "banking and ethics committees must be required to solicit and openly review outside experts' opinions of politicians' and regulators' compliance with these new requirements on an ongoing basis."  Mr. Kane sees little hope that Congress would ever impose such strong restraints on itself.  What he urges is that the sound, well-capitalized financial institutions of all types -- there really are a lot of them around the country -- band together in a cross-industry group and demand such rules.  It sounds like a fine idea.  Lane Kirkland, president of the AFL-CIO, and Richard Trumka, president of the United Mine Workers, were arrested Wednesday for blocking the entrance to a Virginia courthouse.  The two labor leaders, along with several other demonstrators, staged the protest in support of the UMW's five-month strike against Pittston Co. Mr. Kirkland and the other demonstrators were released, pending a Dec. 5 hearing.  The UMW contends Pittston, based in Greenwich, Conn., is guilty of numerous unfair labor practices, including changes in work rules at its mines.  The National Labor Relations Board regional office in Cincinnati this week issued numerous complaints against Pittston, but has dismissed many of the UMW's charges.  An Oct. 23 hearing is set to rule on the complaints, which Pittston officials contend are without merit.  Pittston and the UMW have been locked in a bitter dispute since last year when the company refused to sign the union's industrywide contract.  In addition, the UMW recently ordered selective strikes against three small West Virginia coal companies that have hired non-union contractors, which the union says violates the contract.  Sony Corp. reported that net income for its first quarter ended June 30 surged 44% to 23.21 billion yen ($162.2 million) from 16.09 billion yen a year earlier.  The company cited favorable sales in electronic and record business products, combined with continuing cost reductions and productivity boosts.  Sales rose 23% to 571.812 billion yen from 463.566 billion yen.  This included a 28% rise in sales to the U.S. to 164.24 billion yen from 128.1 billion yen a year earlier.  Operating profit climbed 96% to 60.04 billion yen from 30.59 billion yen.  Net income per depositary share increased to 74.60 yen on a primary basis from 57.20 yen, and rose to 74.60 yen from 55.20 yen on a fully diluted basis.  SALES OF DOMESTIC-MADE CARS and trucks rose 2.6% in mid-August from the year-ago period, and sales of domesticmade cars alone increased 5.4%.  An earlier edition incorrectly reported the figures because of an error in tabulating Chrysler Corp.'s domestic car sales.  They increased 6% instead of declining, as was incorrectly reported.  A corrected sales table appears {today}.  (See: "Economy: Vehicle Sales Increased 1.8% in Mid-August --- U.S.-Built Japanese Models Record Biggest Gains; Price Discounting Cited" -- WSJ Aug. 24, 1989)  The oat cereal war is heating up.  Kellogg Co., which makes neither an oatmeal nor any other cooked cereal, is introducing a ready-to-eat product that can be heated as well as eaten right out of the box.  Moreover, the product, called Oatbake, bears a striking similarity to rival General Mills Inc.'s oat-based powerhouse, Cheerios.  The cereal will come in rings about the size of a dime, a spokeswoman said.  A combination of whole-kernel oats, corn and wheat bran, Oatbake will come in two varieties -- Raisin Nut and Honey Bran.  Among Kellogg's recent efforts to capitalize on oats' nutritional popularity was Cracklin' Oat Bran cereal.  While Oatbake is designed primarily for eating cold, the cereal's boxes will include directions for heating Oatbake with milk, either in a microwave oven or on the range top.  The company said yesterday it expects "significant incremental consumption as a hot cereal" as well as a snack.  Kellogg said it would roll out the product this fall with its largest cereal advertising and promotion budget ever.  The company wouldn't disclose any figures, but noted that it would exceed the $33 million spent to introduce Mueslix in 1987.  Most ad dollars will go into television, the company said.  Leo Burnett Co., Chicago, will produce the spots.  THE ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY said it has proposed barring Big Apple Wrecking Corp., Bronx, N.Y., and J.Y. Arnold & Associates, Central City, Ky., from receiving federal loans, contracts or grants.  Previously, the EPA said the two companies were being barred, and it didn't explain that the companies can request a hearing and can appeal before they are barred.  (See: "EPA Files Suit Against 34 in Move Against Asbestos" -- WSJ Aug. 23, 1989)  The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, in the midst of an "organization assessment," has sent its executive director, Stephen Berger, on a trip to Asia.  His assignment: To drum up business as the Port of New York struggles to snare revenue from an expanded field of players.  "We're in a much more competitive environment," said John J. Collura, director of management and budget for the Port Authority, a quasi-corporate entity that oversees three major airports, Hudson River crossings, the Port of New York, railroads and world trade and economic development.  The New York metropolitan area, the Port Authority concedes, faces a gloomy regional economy this year.  The big agency's net income fell in 1988 to $73.9 million from $84 million the year before.  "As a region, we're catching our breath," says Mr. Collura, noting the effect of the October 1987 stock market crash and the flattening of traffic volume at tunnels and bridges.  "We've had strong growth for the past 10 years," he said.  "We're looking at flat growth now."  "You can't wait for customers to come to you, you've got to go out and get them," Mr. Collura said.  Mr. Berger "has had a vision in terms of what the agency was and should be all about," since becoming executive director in 1985.  Mr. Berger's move into Asia apparently represents a third step in his overall plan.  First, there was a five-year capital plan.  Then, Mr. Berger turned his attention to the internal bureaucracy, and how to streamline the organization.  That, by the way, will result in a trimming of between 250 and 300 jobs from the agency's 9,600-member work force, Mr. Collura estimated, adding that the cuts will be achieved by attrition.  With his Asia trip, Mr. Berger is playing catch-up with some officials of other ports, who have made the sojourn previously.  The advent of double-stack rail-container trains has made it very attractive for Far Eastern shippers to unload goods on the West Coast and send them East by rail.  And as the economies of developing countries in Southeast Asia continue to grow, there has been greater competition among ports on both U.S. coasts for their business.  A federal magistrate ruled that fugitive banker George Koskotas can be extradited to Greece to stand trial on charges that he embezzled more than $250 million.  The allegations at home against Mr. Koskotas helped topple the government of former Prime Minister Andreas Papandreou, partly because Mr. Koskotas said the money he moved may have been diverted to Mr. Papandreou's party.  An attorney for Mr. Koskotas said he intended to appeal the extradition ruling.  Under terms of the U.S. extradition treaty with Greece, the State Department makes the final decision of whether a suspect is sent home, after a court certifies extraditability.  The department hasn't said what its plans are for Mr. Koskotas, the former president of the Bank of Crete.  Assistant U.S. Attorney Victor Wild confirmed a report that the new Greek government, formed after Mr. Papandreou's election loss, has asked the U.S. for assistance so that members of the government can interview Mr. Koskotas, who is in custody in Salem, Mass.  Mr. Koskotas declined to testify during his extradition trial, saying he feared for the safety of his wife and children if he talked.  His attorney has also said that Greek secret police have had orders to kill him.  The Federal Reserve Board, as expected, voted unanimously to allow bank-holding companies to buy healthy savings and loan institutions.  The Fed had proposed two years ago to allow such acquisitions, and Congress authorized it to do so in the savings and loan bailout legislation President Bush signed earlier this month.  Banking companies were already allowed to buy failed and failing S&Ls, a move aimed at widening the potential market for sick thrifts.  John LaWare, a member of the Reserve Board, said he expects the latest change will accelerate the expansion of interstate banking.  C.R. "Randy" Wortham, vice president, real estate, was named to the new position of senior vice president of this retail convenience store chain.  Thursday, August 24, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 8 15/16% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.75% 30 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.33% one month; 8.32% two months; 8.29% three months; 8.25% six months; 8.22% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.80% one month; 8.70% three months; 8.70% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.72% 30 days; 8.62% 60 days; 8.52% 90 days; 8.45% 120 days; 8.40% 150 days; 8.32% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/ 16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 21, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.99% 13 weeks; 7.85% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.20%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.13%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.15%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.13%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  As Spaniards return from their summer vacations, speculation is mounting that Prime Minister Felipe Gonzalez will soon call for early elections.  Although voting isn't officially due until next June, analysts say the opposition's disarray means that a vote now would almost certainly give the Socialists a third term in office.  And with opposition parties gradually reorganizing themselves and with soon-to-be-licensed private television stations posing a potential new threat to the government, advisers to Mr. Gonzalez have stressed that it would be foolish to miss this opportunity.  Considering the problems emerging in Spain's overheated economy, as well as the prospect of unpopular taxes this winter to counteract them, a decision to hold early elections seems an almost foregone conclusion.  "From the economic point of view they have to call the elections now," says Francisco Alvira, director of the private opinion poll agency OTR-IS.  "There's still some euphoria in the economy but that will have gone by January."  Adds Francisco Alvarez Cascos, secretary general of the center-right Partido Popular: "It seems practically certain that Felipe Gonzalez will dissolve parliament and call early elections."  If he does, the Socialist leader will catch his main rivals off balance.  Both Partido Popular and Spain's other main center-right opposition party, former prime minister Adolfo Suarez's Centro Democratico y Social, are still reeling from their poor performances in June's European Parliament elections.  Partido Popular still hasn't named a leader to carry its standard in a national election campaign.  Its only hope of preventing the return of a Socialist government would be a coalition with the CDS and the regional Catalan party, Convergencia i Unio.  And that could prove difficult.  The only party that expects to increase its parliamentary representation significantly is the Communists, known as Izquierda Unida.  But they are too small a group to be a serious threat.  And although the Socialists may lose some seats -- and possibly their overall majority -- they are confident of remaining Spain's dominant party.  Until now, Mr. Gonzalez has done more than anyone to fuel uncertainty over the election date.  After insisting repeatedly that he planned to complete his four-year term, he did an about-face earlier this summer by hinting at early elections, only to announce last weekend that he still hadn't made up his mind.  Mr. Gonzalez may maintain the suspense today at a cabinet meeting scheduled to choose between five groups applying for concessions for three new private TV stations.  That in itself involves a tricky political balancing act between powerful Spanish media groups, some of which have the backing of such international figures as Rupert Murdoch and Silvio Berlusconi.  The government had promised to have private TV stations on the air in time for the next parliamentary elections, but that seems unlikely now.  Once the TV matter has been decided, analysts expect little further delay in calling elections, probably in late October or early November.  Whoever wins the TV licenses, the government faces the uncomfortable possibility that the losers may turn their other media interests against it.  Pressures on the government caused by Spain's rising inflation rate and soaring trade deficit are added reasons for an early election.  Although such problems are the downside results of a strong growth rate, which has permitted large-scale job creation, they have prompted fears of higher taxes to damp consumption.  "Without such measures, the Spanish economy could find itself faced with a halt in the process of job creation and three or four years of recession," said Luis-Angel Lerena, chief economist at Banco Bilbao Vizcaya.  Re-election with a new four-year mandate, by contrast, would give Mr. Gonzalez manuevering room to plan Spain's integration into an open European Community market in 1992.  Yesterday, the Dow Jones Industrial Average poked through the peak of 2722.42 reached just before the October 1987 crash.  Stocks closed at 2734.64.  All of which offers occasion to reflect on these past 22 months.  What is most remarkable about them is the small effect the crash had on the "real," as opposed to the financial, sector of the economy.  Some 20% of Americans own stocks but it is the performance of the real sector that most affects public well-being.  Total production of goods and services (GNP) continued to grow without abatement.  The U.S. now is in its seventh year of uninterrupted economic growth.  The advance slowed in the second quarter this year after a vigorous first quarter, but now things are picking up again, judging from such indicators as housing starts and new car sales.  Unemployment is down to 5.2%, lower than the 6% at the time of the crash, and there are shortages of labor in some areas.  The nation has added some five million non-agricultural jobs.  Business confidence is strong.  Real fixed investment by business rose at an annual rate of 7.5% in the first quarter and the Federal Reserve Board's midyear review reported that such spending appeared to have increased "substantially further" in the second quarter.  Heavy spending on industrial machinery shows that manufacturing industry is gearing up to supply expected rises in consumer demand.  Consumers, for their part, seem to have regained confidence as vigorous action against inflation by the Fed has quieted inflation fears.  In one matter the crash did apparently play a role.  The U.S. personal savings rate had reached a 40-year low just before the 1987 debacle.  But the big dent made in household net worth stimulated personal saving and a more cautious approach toward consumption.  An important lesson was learned: Paper gains are not the same as realized wealth.  But today's stockholders have less reason to fear a speculative bubble.  As the accompanying chart shows, stock prices relative to corporate earnings are much lower than they were in 1987 (see accompanying illustration -- WSJ Aug. 25, 1989).  The market has a more solid foundation.  Moreover, very few professional money managers still believe that they can insure themselves against downside risk with trading programs and futures hedging.  Those techniques remain in use but we now know they are not fail-safe.  What about public policy?  It is remarkable as well how little there was in response.  The fact that Washington played a key role in triggering the crash had a chastening effect, apparently.  Treasury Secretary Baker had incautiously exacerbated international fears about the health of the dollar.  And Congress, for its part, had endangered takeover stocks by threatening to spike leveraged buyouts.  After the crash, there was a remarkable and very beneficial quietude in Washington about any subject that might affect markets.  It is only lately that we are once again hearing political murmurings about the need for a softer dollar and the like.  Which raises the question: How well did the Fed perform?  In our view, it has done well.  It quickly pumped liquidity into the securities market during the crash to prevent a collapse.  Later, with the industry on a solid footing, it adopted a more conservative approach to money management.  That conservatism became particularly important this spring when it appeared we might have a new outbreak of inflation.  So what have we learned?  We have learned that a market crash need not lead to economic disaster if public policy makers keep their heads and do not overreact.  The market itself will deal with its own problems.  That was what it was doing yesterday as it began its quest for new highs.  The federal insider-trading prosecutors finally bagged their man, er, girl, clamping a half-Boesky on unlucky Lisa Ann Jones, 26.  For bribing people to breach their fiduciary duties, Mr. Boesky is serving three years in jail; Miss Jones now stands sentenced to 18 months for perjury in denying she remembered certain securities transactions that may or may not have been illegal.  If Mr. Boesky was the Gordon Gekko of the movie "Wall Street," Miss Jones is closer to the Staten Island secretary who makes good in "Working Girl."  Miss Jones ran away from home to California at 14, got a job as a bank teller, earned a high school equivalency degree and became a trading assistant at Drexel Burnham Lambert.  She was the guppy prosecutors planned to munch to get trader Bruce Newberg, then Princeton/Newport officials, then Robert Freeman, Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor and finally, the big tuna himself, Michael Milken.  Certain hitches developed in this scenario.  This week, for example, prosecutors felt forced to admit they were off the wall in forcing Drexel to agree not to pay Mr. Milken compensation he had already earned.  The Wigton and Tabor prosecutions are officially kaput, while Mr. Freeman pleaded to a "bunny" count of mail fraud over the telephone.  The Princeton/Newport folks have been convicted of tax fraud without benefit of testimony on the tax law, and Miss Jones's luck turned bad again, as prosecutors used her to send other reluctant witnesses a message they couldn't refuse.  Miss Jones had the further hard luck to fall into the hands of Judge Leonard Sand, who earlier made headlines with such sentencing tactics as threatening to jail Yonkers city councilmen for refusing to implement the judge's housing-integration plans, ultimately crushing their resistance with $1 million-a-day fines against the city.  We suppose he may have viewed the 18 months as leniency.  Still, it's hard to believe that Miss Jones is half as culpable as Mr. Boesky.  Everyone understands that Miss Jones's real sin is refusing to testify against her Drexel superiors, but Mr. Boesky got off lightly for "cooperating" with the government.  The subsequent course of events confirms our view that Ivan conned his prosecutors.  For that matter, Boyd Jefferies, whose highly dubious testimony has helped lead to two mistrials so far in the GAF case, still won five years probation as his sentence.  Then there is Martin Siegel, whose "cooperation" was the basis for the Freeman-Wigton-Tabor cases.  He implicated them in testimony to a grand jury as part of his plea bargain on charges of trading stolen information for cash with Mr. Boesky.  So Rudy Giuliani's team arrested the three back in 1987, memorably dragging Mr. Wigton off handcuffed, only to have to drop the indictment, promise to reinstate it, and finally announce the end of two of the three investigations.  As of yet, not even a date has been set for Mr. Siegel's sentencing.  If Miss Jones gets 18 months, what will prosecutors ask for him?  Do you win points from prosecutors by "cooperating" and providing information so misleading it causes them acute embarrassment?  Are the prosecutors as mad at Mr. Siegel as they are at Miss Jones?  If not why not?  Thieves sticking together?  It's time for prosecutors, and even more the Justice Department, to start worrying about the truth of their evidence on these Wall Street cases.  So far as we can see, the big untruths have come from those who "cooperated"; prosecutors were only too willing to put aside any doubts.  But for refusing to feed the prosecutors' ambitions with lies or tantalizing ambiguities, Lisa Jones goes to jail.  Nerco Inc. said a subsidiary agreed to acquire Texas-gulf Minerals & Metals Inc, Golden, Colo.  As part of the transaction, Nerco Minerals Co., Vancouver, Wash., obtains exploration properties in six states and majority interest in a patented and unpatented claims on 4,200 acres of exploration and mining properties in central Colorado.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Texas-gulf Minerals is a unit of Elf Aquitaine Inc., Stamford, Conn.  Procordia AB's attempt to assemble an alliance of Scandinavian food producers has run into problems in neighboring Finland and Norway.  Six weeks ago, the big state-controlled Swedish conglomerate agreed to a 1.6 billion Swedish kronor ($241 million) merger with Cultor Oy, a Finnish food concern.  Analysts welcomed the accord as a long overdue first step toward a defensive alliance of Scandinavian food concerns worried about the European Community's planned single market after 1992.  The EC's tariff-free market is almost certain to topple traditional protectionist barriers in Scandinavia and intensify international competition, analysts agree.  Unless the Nordic countries consolidate their fragmented domestic food industries, warned Cultor's Chief Executive Officer Gustav von Hertzen, continental European food giants "will pick off the Nordic markets one by one."  But not everybody shares that sense of urgency.  Disgruntled Cultor shareholders, including the firm's two largest, have mounted a campaign to block the proposed merger.  They say Cultor's board discriminated against existing holders by offering Procordia a special class of so-called free shares.  Free shares usually sell at a premium to other classes of stock because they can be sold freely to non-Finnish investors.  Though embarrassing to both Procordia and Cultor, the rift isn't expected to thwart the alliance.  Analysts in Helsinki expect the Finnish government to clear the transaction this week.  In Norway, Procordia already is fighting an antitrust judgment blocking its proposed acquisition of brewer AS Hansa.  In addition, the Swedish concern's protracted courtship of Norway's biggest food group, Nora AS, is bogged down, apparently over the question of how to reconcile their difference in size.  Analysts in Oslo suspect that the Procordia may have shot itself in the foot last week by snapping up a 12.8% stake in AS Freia, Scandinavia's biggest candy company.  The Freia holding could complicate Procordia's appeal of the antitrust ruling against its Hansa acquisition.  To make matters worse, Nora was among the suitors that Procordia outbid to get the Freia stake.  Procordia's foray into Norway began in 1988 when it bought 10.1% of Nora.  With interests in brewing, beverages, food and candy, Oslo-based Nora seemed the ideal partner for the Swedish company.  Since Nora officials balked at a merger, Soeren Gyll, Procordia's chief executive, decided to try a different tack and agreed to acquire Hansa.  Nora, Norway's biggest brewer, had been barred from buying Hansa, the country's second-biggest brewer, on antitrust grounds.  After buying Hansa, Mr. Gyll resigned from Nora's board in an effort to quiet objections to the acquisition.  But the government's antitrust agency ruled that Procordia had to divest either the brewery or its Nora stake.  Procordia has appealed the decision.  The ruling underscores what many analysts consider to be outdated antitrust guidelines.  Critics say antitrust officials look exclusively at market share in Norway and ignore the broader international perspective when making a decision.  For example, Norwegian suitors were prevented from bidding for either Hansa or AS Vesta, a financially troubled insurer, in another big takeover battle last year.  Both Hansa and Vesta wound up being acquired by larger Swedish companies.  The effect, fumed an executive at one of Norway's biggest companies, "has been to prevent consolidation that's absolutely necessary for our companies to compete internationally."  Procordia's Mr. Gyll said he still hasn't decided whether to dispose of Hansa or the Nora stake if the appeal fails.  But some analysts believe that Procordia's stakebuilding in candy maker Freia is proof that Mr. Gyll has made up his mind to shed the Nora stake.  Further, analysts say Procordia is about to shift its courtship to another prospective Norwegian food ally, Norsk Hydro AS.  Norsk Hydro, the state-controlled petroleum and metals giant, is a longtime stockholder in both Nora and Freia.  But analysts didn't begin paying serious attention to Norsk Hydro's food ambitions until it doubled its Freia holding to 41% in late June.  Procordia's Mr. Gyll is optimistic that Norsk Hydro shares his view that international pressures require cross-border alliances.  A Norsk Hydro spokesman acknowledges that the company is familiar with Mr. Gyll's plans and would be willing to listen to proposals.  But he said there haven't been any talks between the two companies yet.  Norsk Hydro probably will be wary of taking any concrete steps at least until after Norway's national election in three weeks.  A recurrent debate about the company's sprawling operations, and whether it may be too big for Norway's best interests, has erupted amid the election campaign.  National Bancshares Corp. of Texas said it will pay about $1.3 million in interest that was due Aug. 1 on $25 million in 10% convertible-subordinated debentures due 2006.  The company had deferred the payment while it considered its options in light of a recent plan to recapitalize the bank with help from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  Under that agreement, new investors would pump about $117 million into the company, including $31 million from Equimark Corp.  The FDIC has pledged about $250 million as part of the open-bank bailout.  National Bancshares said the interest payment will be made Sept. 18 to bondholders of record Sept. 9 and will include interest on the amount due.  "September" it begins, and even without the title that word tells where Tracy Kidder's new book is taking us.  It is time to go back to school.  "Among Schoolchildren" (Houghton Mifflin, 340 pages, $19.95) is nominally an account of a year in Chris Zajac's fifth-grade class in Holyoke, Mass.  But like Mr. Kidder's earlier books, which also examine a small group of people and their work, "Among Schoolchildren" aims to take a significant facet of modern life and humanize it.  "The Soul of a New Machine" explored the human heart of the computer revolution.  "House" described the conflicts and cooperations entailed in building a home.  This new book examines the human interactions that structure and direct our children's education.  Mr. Kidder's writing is stylishly personal.  He doesn't talk about teaching; he shows us a teacher at work.  Instead of grouping children into social, ethnic or achievement-level categories, he shows us individuals.  His descriptions are fresh and clear and his prose concise.  And while he is sympathetic (sometimes overly so) to the people he portrays, he lets us see their less attractive moments too.  This book, like a classroom, centers on the teacher.  Mrs. Zajac, 34 years old and a lifelong resident of Holyoke, has the reputation of being the toughest teacher in school. ("You gots Mrs. Ajax, bro?  She is mean," says one boy from last year's class).  But her no-nonsense ways don't disguise the lively, caring lady underneath.  She will send a child into the hall and hug him three minutes after he gets back.  Sometimes she even acts like a fifth-grader herself, flopping down in a desk, "mouth sagged open . . . and her arms hanging lifelessly over the sides" and insisting that the children teach her how to multiply 296 by 78.  Mrs. Zajac's students play roles of varying importance.  Clarence and Robert are the class's most troublesome, and troubled, children.  Judith is "even smart about being smart," while happy, well-behaved Pedro "works so hard to get an F."  Claude is a tangle of excuses, Blanca has "frightened eyes," Dick loves social studies, and bright, spunky Alice from the good part of town has parents who care.  But whether we hear a lot about a child or a little, each is revealed as an individual.  If "Among Schoolchildren" were a novel it would be easy to criticize.  The book's characters are beautifully drawn, but there is no plot to tie things together.  The main characters don't develop over the course of the book and the changes in the minor characters are only incremental.  And when it comes to dramatic tension, the author's approach might kindly be described as naive.  The most upsetting behavioral problem in Mrs. Zajac's class is resolved by the school's principal midway through the book, and most of the other potentially dramatic situations Mr. Kidder sets forth are never explored.  Mr. Kidder stubbornly refuses to move from the specifics of Mrs. Zajac's classroom to generalizations about education.  He never delves into issues like achievement testing, bilingualism, curriculum, tenure or tracking.  Nor is he critical of Mrs. Zajac's school, even when he hears the intercom squawking the whole day through and finds that it takes six months to get a core evaluation of a child.  He merely mentions, almost as an aside, that Holyoke schools produce some of the lowest test scores in all Massachusetts.  The justification of his approach is that it doesn't bias the reporting.  But no observer reports everything, and whether it is conscious or not, the selection of what to tell directs a reader's attention and structures a reader's conclusions in a subtle but powerful way.  Mr. Kidder sat in the back of that class for a whole year; I for one would like a forthright account of what that experience taught him.  So we spend a year in a bad school with a committed, caring, hard-working teacher.  We see that children from stable homes with parents who value education do better than children who watch TV past midnight.  We watch Mrs. Zajac spend far too much time and energy on her two problem students to the detriment of the 18 children who want to learn.  And we end up fearing that the hard-won gains she achieves will prove as transitory as the stream of students that flows through this battle-scarred city school.  Mr. Kidder insists there is cause for hope.  "Good teachers put snags in the river of children passing by, and over the years, they redirect hundreds of lives."  Perhaps he is right.  But what he notices at the fifth-grade science fair seems more significant.  The results of that painful charade don't reflect social status, ethnic background, or teaching technique: They reflect the contributions of each child's parents.  Why didn't Mr. Kidder just come out and say what he saw?  Teachers can't do much teaching if we also expect them to salvage the remains of broken homes, and schools can't educate when they serve as dumping grounds for the wreckage left by uncaring parents.  Mrs. Zajac sounds like a wonderful teacher, but even she can't do it all by herself.  ---  Mr. Alden's children are entering kindergarten and the second grade.  Aaron Copland's 90th birthday is upon us.  America's most celebrated living composer doesn't actually reach the milestone until Nov. 14, 1990, but since 1990 falls within the 1989/90 season, September is not too early in the world of concert promotion to begin partying.  And that means that if Tanglewood, with its nearly half-century association with Mr. Copland, hopes to get a jump on the rest of the country for what is sure to be massive tribute throughout America over the next two seasons, this summer is the time to do it.  Tanglewood does seem the most appropriate festival to honor Mr. Copland.  Serge Koussevitzky, the famed Soviet conductor who served as music director of the Boston Symphony from 1924 to 1949 and who founded the Tanglewood Festival in the Berkshires as a summer home for his orchestra in 1936, was Mr. Copland's first and most important champion.  In 1940, when Koussevitzky began a prestigious summer institute at Tanglewood to train young musicians, he made Mr. Copland head of its composition department, a post the composer held for 25 years.  It was at Tanglewood that many now-prominent American composers came under Mr. Copland's spell, and it was in the idyllic country surroundings of the lush Berkshire hills that Mr. Copland composed some of his finest works, including his stirring Third Symphony.  Yet Tanglewood, which also made hay for Mr. Copland's 75th, 80th and 85th birthdays, is not always an ideal festival in which to offer a meaningful retrospective of Mr. Copland's works.  Mr. Copland is best known for his music from the late '30s and '40s that was written in a populist style -- "Billy the Kid," "Rodeo," "Appalachian Spring," "Fanfare for the Common Man," "The Lincoln Portrait."  These are important works for Americans, having set the tone for a nationalist style; they belong at any Copland celebration, and it was right for the orchestra to feature them prominently.  But they are hardly the sum of Mr. Copland's accomplishments.  Mr. Copland, who was not strong enough to attend this summer, wrote considerable music that is rarely if ever heard, much of it in a more abstract idiom.  Fainthearted, the Boston Symphony has deferred to students or chamber groups for the occasional challenging work or novelty.  Chief among the novelties have been the first performance in more than 50 years of an early Copland ballet, "Hear Ye] Hear Ye]" and what was billed as the first concert performance of the full ballet score to "Appalachian Spring."  But together they proved a rather peculiar way to honor a composer.  Although Mr. Copland has always pleaded for performances of his less famous works, he did not mean these two scores in these versions.  In both cases, they contain music that the composer intended as incidental to a theatrical event and that he feels is not really suited to the concert hall.  Nonetheless, "Hear Ye] Hear Ye]" was interesting to hear once, if for no other reason than to appreciate just how significant Mr. Copland's accomplishment in ballet was to become.  The score, which lasts slightly more than a half hour, was commissioned in 1934 by Ruth Page for her own ensemble to accompany a scenario for a jazz dance piece about the murder of a dancer in a Chicago speakeasy.  Mr. Copland, normally a slow worker, had only six weeks in which to write the score, and it shows.  Moreover, it was the first music Mr. Copland had written specifically for the stage.  There are amusing moments, such as a fractured fragment of the "The Star Spangled Banner"; and there is a memorable swing segment that later was transformed into the second of the "Four Piano Blues."  But mostly this is surprisingly ordinary stuff from a composer who had already written music as strikingly original as the "Short Symphony."  Mr. Copland also knew exactly what he was doing when he fashioned his famous suite from "Appalachian Spring," the ballet Mr. Copland wrote for Martha Graham in 1944 and possibly his greatest work.  While the full score is just fine for a ballet, allowing musical cushion for character development, the full work sounds diffuse compared with the suite, which is a masterpiece of musical architecture.  Curiously, one of the more intriguing elements of Tanglewood's Copland fete has been the international nature of it.  As a symbol of Americana, Mr. Copland's music has been especially popular overseas, and it just so happened that on the Saturday that "Hear Ye] Hear Ye]" was given, there was the opportunity to judge the approach of three foreign conductors to Mr. Copland's music.  In the morning Joel Levy, an Israeli who now leads the Atlanta Symphony, oversaw an open rehearsal with the Boston Symphony of Mr. Copland's grand Third Symphony.  Mr. Levy's way was broad, soft-edged and lyric, almost as if the symphony were cut of Germanic stock, rather than being the vigorous celebration of D-Day that it is.  "Hear Ye] Hear Ye]" however, was played with just the right affecting enthusiasm by the Tanglewood student orchestra and conducted with exceptional authority by Oliver Knussen, a British composer ("Where the Wild Things Are") who happens to be a real podium talent.  Finally, the evening brought Yuri Temirkanov, the music director of the Leningrad Philharmonic, in front of the Boston Symphony for the Four Dance Episodes from "Rodeo," and he was a hoot.  Mr. Temirkanov has clearly seen too many American westerns.  At least that is how it seemed when he crouched as if jauntily riding a horse while conducting or threw out cues as if he were lassoing the players.  But the crowd loved it.  All three conductors, however, somewhat embarrassed their American colleague, Richard Pittman, who, a few days later, led a sincere but ragged and plodding account of the full "Appalachian Spring" with his ensemble, Boston Musica Viva, playing the original 13-instrument orchestration.  But Leonard Bernstein, by far the most inspired conductor of Mr. Copland's music, should make up for that with his performances of "Short Symphony" and "Music for the Theater" Sunday afternoon with the BSO.  That will be the Tanglewood finale, but just the beginning of the Copland onslaught, which moves next to the New York Philharmonic in October, when Mr. Bernstein will devote a full program to Mr. Copland.  ---  Mr. Swed is a free-lance music critic based in New York.  The Nasdaq Composite Index surged nearly 1% on robust volume to set a new high, powered by renewed buying of over-the-counter stocks by both big and small investors.  As the Dow Jones Industrial Average leaped 2.1% and eclipsed its two-year-old record, the Nasdaq Composite reached a new high for the sixth time this year, closing at 465.88, up 4.20, or 0.9%.  The OTC market first hit a new peak Aug. 3.  The aggressive buying of OTC issues spawned spirited trading.  Volume totaled 144.8 million shares.  Overall, 1,228 issues advanced and 762 declined.  The Nasdaq 100 Index jumped 5.81 to 440.79 and the Nasdaq Financial Index added 2.31 to 461.68.  Ed Mazzella, executive vice president of OTC trading at Shearson Lehman Hutton, characterized the buying as "pure."  He said: "It wasn't just people running with the programs.  We saw very large institutional buyers for the first time this week."  Mr. Mazzella said some individual investors, who have been notably absent from the market for months, also returned yesterday.  Traders said buyers continued to be most interested in the OTC market's biggest issues.  The market's biggest stock in terms of market capitalization, MCI Communications, gained 2 to 39 1/2 on 2.5 million shares.  There were rumors throughout the day that MCI was contemplating paying an initial dividend.  But a spokeswoman said, "the payment of a dividend isn't under active consideration."  Some technology stocks that had helped fuel the market's rise earlier in the week faltered yesterday.  Software stocks, in particular, were weaker.  Microsoft, which had added more than 3 points in the past two sessions, lost 1/4 to 59.  Ashton-Tate dropped 7/8 to 12, and Lotus Development fell 1/4 to 26 1/2.  Among financial stocks, insurance issues continued their lackluster performance, adding only 0.79 to 533.62.  Among the insurance stocks losing ground, Hartford Steam Boiler dropped 1/4 to 52 1/4.  But other financial stocks moved more in line with the overall market.  The Nasdaq Bank Index rose a strong 5.10 to 489.95, while the Nasdaq Other Finance Index gained 2.74 to 552.08.  The Other Finance Index, which includes the market's thrift issues, is just 1.34 point below its all-time high, set in July 1986.  Since then, stocks in the index have taken a beating, reflecting the problems in the savings and loan industry.  But the recent effort to bail out the industry is making the stocks popular again.  A. Cuyler Kline, head of OTC trading at Robinson-Humphrey Co. in Atlanta, said thrift stocks have "led the parade" at his firm this year.  He said profit-taking following the passage of the savings and loan bailout bill two weeks ago has brought share prices of many issues in the group back to cheaper levels.  "A bottoming out has taken place, and now they've begun a new advance," Mr. Kline said.  Valley National Bancorp gained 1/2 point to 28.  The company agreed to acquire Meadowlands National Bank of North Bergen, N.J., for about 150,000 of its shares plus $500,000 in cash and other considerations for a total of about $4.5 million.  In other news, Class A shares of TeleCommunications added 5/8 to 38 1/8.  The company said one of its units will try to raise $200 million in the Japanese capital markets.  The American depositary receipts of a foreign telecommunications concern, L.M. Ericsson Telephone, got a boost following a string of company announcements that painted a rosy outlook for the company.  Ericsson's ADRs rose 13 5/8 to 117 1/4 after the company said its pretax earnings in the latest six months rose 164% from last year.  The company also said it expects to report higher pretax earnings, before appropriations, for the year.  Wheelabrator Group rose 1/8 to 9 7/8 on volume of about two million shares.  The merger of Wheelabrator Group and its majority-held Wheelabrator Technologies unit is expected to be completed today.  Wheelabrator Technologies added 1 to 34 1/4.  PHP Healthcare surged 1 1/8 to 6 3/8.  The company agreed in principle to settle certain lawsuits against it that have been pending since July 1987.  Class B shares of Adolph Coors slid 2 5/8 to 20.  PaineWebber downgraded its rating on the stock to "unattractive" from "attractive," according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  The brokerage firm had recently boosted the rating on the stock because of Coors's possible acquisition of some assets from Stroh Brewery.  Qintex Entertainment dropped 1 1/8 to 8 on 390,000 shares, as the company's proposed merger with MGM/UA Communications took another step forward.  Qintex said that to facilitate the merger, it amended the acquisition structure to provide for the initial acquisition of MGM/UA by a Qintex unit, Qintex Media B.V.  Medical Care International jumped 2 5/8 to 22 1/4.  The company agreed in principle to acquire Boston-based MediVision Inc., a closely held company, for a combination of cash and common stock valued at about $45 million.  Micron Technology slipped 3/4 to 14.  The Professional Investor Report said Montgomery Securities in San Francisco lowered its revenue and earnings estimates for the company because of a change in the company's product mix.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  POSITIVE  @Merry Go Round $ .15 ... $ .08 (3) 87.50  @Smucker JM $1.10 ... $1.02 (3) 7.84  NEGATIVE  @Quanex Corp. $ .51 ... $ .63 (3) 19.05  @Dollar General $ .15 ... $ .17 (3) 11.76  @Nordson Corp. $ .89 ... $1.00 (4) 11.00  @Handleman Co. $ .18 ... $ .19 (5) 5.26  Source: Zacks Investment Research  Ford Motor Co. said it will temporarily idle its Chicago assembly plant for five workdays beginning Sept. 1 because of a "shortage of dealer orders for the 1989 models" of the Ford Taurus and Mercury Sable sedans built there.  The move marks the fourth time Ford has idled a Taurus/Sable plant this summer.  Ford officials said the plant is scheduled to resume operations Sept. 11, when it will begin assembly of the 1990 models.  The temporary shutdown affects 2,500 hourly workers and will cut output by about 5,000 cars.  Meanwhile, Chrysler Corp. said it will close its Jefferson Avenue plant in Detroit for two weeks beginning Monday for a model changeover.  The shutdown will idle about 1,400 hourly workers and eliminate production of about 4,400 Dodge Omni and Plymouth Horizon subcompact cars.  General Motors Corp., as expected, said it will close its Shreveport, La., Pontiac, Mich., and Moraine, Ohio, light-truck plants next week for one week because of excess inventories of 1989 models.  The nine major domestic auto makers plan to build 130,348 cars this week, or 4% more than the 125,306 they built in the year-ago week and 2.9% more than the 126,654 cars produced last week.  Japanese transplant assembly plants are expected to account for 15.5% of U.S. car production this week, up from 14.2% a year earlier.  Year-to-date auto production of 4,546,245 cars is practically unchanged from last year's 4,545,074 units.  This week, Ford scheduled weekday overtime at its Dearborn, Mich., car plant and at its Kansas City, Mo., Norfolk, Va., and Wayne, Mich., truck plants.  Honda Motor Co.'s U.S. production dropped 27.6% because each of the two shifts at its Marysville, Ohio, plant took a floating holiday this week.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 55,496 48,706 67,577 2,061,546 2,139,333 - 4  @Ford 33,978 35,088 27,582 1,150,625 1,197,955 - 4  @Chrysler 18,600 18,715 12,357 607,363 672,471 -10  @Honda 5,210 7,114 7,198 247,505 242,010 + 2  @Nissan 2,658 2,565 2,652 76,761 70,435 + 9  @Nummi 4,000 4,123 3,241 135,233 108,987 +24  @Mazda 4,021 3,859 4,699 146,268 78,044 +87  @Toyota 3,760 3,778 0 79,238 0 d  @Diam.Star 2,625 2,706 0 41,706 0 d  @Industry 130,348 126,654 125,306 4,546,245 4,545,074 x  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%. e-Estimated. r-Revised. x-Includes Volkswagen domestic production to July 1988.  ---  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 x-%  @ Aug 11-20 Aug 11-20 Chg.  @ GM total vehicles ...... 125,906 139,277 + 1.7  @ Domestic car ........... 78,013 88,394 - 0.7  @ Imported car ........... 5,062 4,919 +15.8  @ Total car ............ 83,075 93,313 + 0.2  @ Domestic truck ......... 42,618 45,964 + 4.3  @ Imported truck ......... 213 0 d  @ Total truck .......... 42,831 45,964 + 4.8  @ FORD total vehicles.. .. 87,137 101,604 - 3.5  @ Domestic car ........... 55,020 60,184 + 2.8  @ Imported car ........... 1,523 2,868 -40.3  @ Total car ............ 56,543 63,052 + 0.9  @ Domestic truck ......... 30,594 38,552 -10.7  @ CHRYSLER total veh ..... 46,319 52,463 - 0.7  @ Domestic car ........... 24,490 25,985 + 6.0  @ Imported car ........... 2,059 3,498 -33.8  @ Total car ............ 26,549 29,483 + 1.3  @ Domestic truck ......... 18,862 21,475 - 1.2  @ Imported truck ......... 908 1,505 -32.1  @ Total truck .......... 19,770 22,980 - 3.2  @ NISSAN total vehicles .. 6,843 8,428 - 8.7  @ Domestic car ........... 3,011 4,182 -19.0  @ Domestic truck ......... 3,832 4,246 + 1.5  @ HONDA domestic car ..... 9,732 9,256 +18.3  @ TOYOTA domestic car .... 6,300 1,429 +396.0  @ MAZDA domestic car ..... 942 1,015 + 4.4  @ MITSUBISHI-c ........... 906 0 d  @ Total cars ........... 187,058 201,730 + 4.3  @ Domestic ............... 178,414 190,445 + 5.4  @ Imported ............... 8,644 11,285 -13.8  @ Total trucks ......... 97,027 111,742 - 2.3  @ Domestic ............... 95,906 110,237 - 2.1  @ Imported ............... 1,121 1,505 -16.2  @ Total domestic veh ... 274,320 300,682 + 2.6  @ Total vehicles ....... 284,085 313,472 + 2.0  a-Totals include only vehicle sales reported in the period.  c-Domestic car  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%.  x-There were 8 selling days in the most recent period and 9 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  Ritzy retailers want to rest assured that their sophisticated customers wouldn't be caught dead rummaging through the racks at discount havens such as Loehmann's.  But the reality is just the opposite.  Increasing numbers of shoppers are like Ruth Urquhart, a Long Island real estate broker who bypasses the glitzy galleria malls for outlet-store shopping centers.  There she regularly finds Calvin Klein fashions and similar designer merchandise at a third of the price department stores charge.  "It's a game for me," she says.  "You feel so good when you shop discount because it just makes sense."  In an attempt to reclaim those lost customers, a growing number of better retailers are starting to open their own discount stores.  In the past year, retailers such as Neiman-Marcus Group Inc., Woodward & Lothrop and John Wanamaker have opened separate stores stocked with marked-down goods from their regular branches.  Other department stores are looking at the idea, including Saks Fifth Avenue, which is negotiating to open a store at the Franklin Mills outlet mall near Philadelphia.  Department stores hope these outlets can help stem the growth of off-price retailers such as Loehmann's and Filene's Basement.  In recent years, both off-price and traditional discount stores such as Bradlees have been gaining share from department stores in apparel sales. (Traditional discount stores tend to sell lower-end goods, rather than marked-down designer clothes.)  At the same time, some department stores say it's now more profitable to run their own clearance stores instead of selling excess inventory to outsiders.  That's partly because of the growth of shopping centers devoted to clearance and factory-outlet stores.  George Hechtman, a Richmond, Va., retail consultant, says that rents at outlet malls, which are generally off the beaten path, are lower than at most suburban shopping centers.  But outlet malls still attract the big-spending customers department stores want.  The Potomac Mills outlet mall outside Washington, D.C., rivals a traditional shopping mall in size and scope.  The mall, which opened last year, has over 200 stores selling clothes, furniture, toys and gifts at prices 20% to 60% off regular retail prices.  Most of the stores are operated by manufacturers such as Calvin Klein, Laura Ashley and Nike.  The Franklin Mills mall, which opened in May, claims it will be the largest outlet mall -- 1.85 million square feet -- when fully occupied.  The mall's anchor stores include clearance outlets of Sears Roebuck & Co. and J.C. Penney Co.  Some outlet centers, such as one in Freeport, Maine, have even become tourist destinations, drawing chartered buses full of shoppers who spend an entire day bargain-hunting.  "As the outlet centers grow in popularity, {department stores} are seeing the cost-efficiencies in getting into that business themselves," says Mr. Hechtman, the consultant.  But some industry executives say department stores may be too eager to get into the outlet business.  They contend that discount retailing is an entirely different business, not just an extension of department-store merchandising.  Also, stores risk undermining their high-toned images by venturing into budget turf.  The clearance business isn't entirely new to department stores, many of which once operated bargain basements in their flagship stores.  Most of those operations were closed in the 1970s as retailers chased more profitable merchandise.  R.H. Macy & Co., for example, replaced its bargain basement at its main store in Manhattan with The Cellar, an emporium of kitchenware and specialty foods.  Department stores began selling their excess inventory to off-price stores or to middlemen known as liquidators.  Off-price retailing has become a sophisticated business in its own right as it has gained a broad following.  This could make it doubly hard for department stores to compete with established operators.  "These stores are tricky to operate," says Mr. Hechtman.  Maintaining a steady inventory of all types of clothes is one hurdle.  Also, off-price retailing requires skillful merchandising to make cast-offs look appealing.  Sam DeFillipo, senior vice president of marketing and merchandising at Filene's Basement, cringes at the memory of a recent visit to one department-store outlet where he noticed "100 dresses of one style and one color" lined up in a long row.  Mr. DeFillipo says he isn't worried about department stores taking business away from Filene's Basement. (Filene's Basement is a separate company from Boston-based Filene's department store.) He also says Filene's Basement no longer gets most of its merchandise from department stores, so its sources aren't threatened.  Filene's Basement, he says, buys odd lots directly from apparel makers, enabling it to offer fresh, seasonal goods only a few weeks after department stores get theirs.  Despite the challenges, department stores can't seem to resist the thrill of a bargain.  Washington-based Woodward & Lothrop says business has been going "extremely well" at its year-old clearance store in the Potomac Mills outlet mall in Prince William, Va.  By shuttling marked-down goods to the clearance store, "we're getting higher profit margins because we are able to turn stock faster and keep fresher {full-priced} goods on the selling floor at our 16 stores," says James Wells, an executive vice president at Woodward & Lothrop.  Another advantage, he says is that out-of-season clothes don't look so old at a clearance store, and thus can be sold at a higher price.  At an outlet store, "you can sell summer clothes after Labor Day," he says.  Woodward & Lothrop doesn't plan to add more clearance stores, but other department stores are expanding.  Nordstrom, which already has 10 Nordstrom Rack stores, plans to add two more in California next year.  It expects to add others to accompany its expansion across the country.  Unlike some other retailers, Nordstrom has a separate staff of buyers for its Rack stores, which carry original merchandise as well as clearance items from Nordstrom's regular 48 stores.  Retailers say they aren't concerned about diluting their image with clearance outlets.  "As a matter of fact, we feel that our image is improved if we don't have deeply discounted merchandise taking up valuable retail space," says a spokesman for Neiman-Marcus Group, which operates one clearance store.  With discount stores and off-price retailers continuing to gain market shares, most industry experts expect department stores to continue to experiment with clearance branches.  At the same time, however, some say department stores may be missing the point.  Generating healthy profits at department stores means selling fresh goods at full price, notes Alan Millstein, a New York retail consultant.  "Instead of trying to get the last drop of profits out of last season's mistakes," he says, "department stores need to be concentrating on how they are going to sell more goods at regular price."  Nine weeks of trial testimony has left no doubt that defendant Leona Helmsley is a tough business manager.  She yells, she curses and she fires underlings at the drop of a hat.  But when the jury begins deliberations, as early as this afternoon, Mrs. Helmsley's management style won't be an issue.  She is charged with tax evasion and conspiring to commit extortion.  Following the judge's directions, the jury must weed out testimony about her demeanor to focus on whether she broke the law.  The trial has displayed an image of Mrs. Helmsley as a tyrannical manager and penny-pincher.  It also has had a damaging effect on her hotel business, according to industry executives.  Mrs. Helmsley and her husband, real-estate magnate Harry Helmsley, are accused of fraudulently billing millions of dollars in personal expenses -- mainly work on their Connecticut home -- to Helmsley companies.  The U.S. attorney's office says the Helmsleys cheated the government out of $1.2 million in taxes from 1983 to 1985.  Mr. Helmsley, 80 years old, was named in the indictment but Judge John Walker Jr. ruled he wasn't well enough to stand trial.  Tax lawyers say the case involves areas where it is hard to draw the line between criminal activity and deficient tax practices.  It isn't enough to prove, for example, that the Helmsleys charged personal expenses to their companies.  The prosecutors must also prove that the defendants intended to deceive the Internal Revenue Service.  "The facts in this case are not in dispute, for the most part," said Mrs. Helmsley's lawyer, Gerald Feffer, in his closing arguments.  "What is in dispute is whether Mrs. Helmsley intended to commit a tax fraud."  Mr. Feffer says the Helmsleys believed the personal expenses could properly be deducted.  The Helmsley defense rests on the claim that business was conducted at Dunnellen Hall, the Connecticut home.  Because the Helmsleys regularly brought work home, Mr. Feffer says, they believed they could deduct much of the money they spent on enclosing a pool and installing a marble dance floor.  And Mrs. Helmsley, he said, believed she could legitimately charge such things as mascara and bras to the hotels, because as president of Helmsley Hotels Inc. she had to look her best.  "The issue is not whether they were right or wrong," Mr. Feffer told the jury.  "The issue is whether the Helmsleys believed they were right or wrong."  But if the Helmsleys believed such expenses were legally deductible, why were many of the costs billed to the companies through falsified invoices that disguised what the money was spent on?  The government has charged that the bills were falsified so that Helmsley accountants and the IRS wouldn't discover them.  "If they really thought the companies could legally pay the expenses they would have sent the real invoices," said Cathy Seibel, one of the assistant U.S. attorneys on the case.  "Why go to the trouble to create false bills?"  Mr. Feffer concedes that bills were falsified but says it wasn't to avoid taxes.  Instead, he says, it was done to circumvent Mrs. Helsmley.  He says the falsified invoices were the only way to get many of the Dunnellen Hall bills paid because Mrs. Helmsley was displeased with much of the work.  The government also argued that it would be far-fetched for any taxpayer to believe that many of the expenses were legitimate deductions.  "What business purpose does it serve if Mrs. Helmsley gets new pillows for the couch or a new stereo system?"  Ms. Seibel asked.  Mrs. Helmsley's co-defendants are Joseph V. Licari, Helmsley Enterprises Inc.'s former chief financial officer, and Frank J. Turco, who was Mrs. Helmsley's right-hand man in the hotel company.  The prosecution has charged that the two men were instrumental in helping the Helmsleys carry out the alleged tax scheme.  In addition, Mr. Turco is charged with conspiring with Mrs. Helmsley to commit extortion in several instances by threatening economic harm to people doing business with the hotels.  The government claims that through such threats the two defendants obtained cash kickbacks from liquor suppliers, for instance, and three free TVs for Mrs. Helmsley from a company supplying sets to the hotels.  Mr. Feffer said there were no kickbacks, and he challenged the veracity of witnesses who said they saw Mrs. Helmsley receiving kickbacks.  "They had an agenda when they took the witness stand, and that agenda was to get Mrs. Helmsley," he said.  He also said it was standard procedure for hotel suppliers to give demonstration models to customers.  Mrs. Helmsley's attorney has tried to make the most of her image as "the boss everyone loves to hate" by portraying her as a demanding, cost-conscious manager.  Ironically, her "strong" style doesn't appear to have helped the company's bottom line.  Consultants say the closely held Helmsley group of hotels underperforms the industry, particularly in New York City, where the industry has thrived.  The Helmsley Palace, the company's top-rated hotel -- which opened $19 million over budget in 1980 -- is said to suffer because its rooms are overpriced.  According to estimates by the accounting firm Laventhol & Horwath, the Palace had an occupancy rate between 60% and 65% last year, while the rest of the city had an average rate of 77%.  For the first half, the Palace occupancy slipped to between 50% and 55%, according to Laventhol & Horwath.  The barrage of negative publicity hasn't changed Mrs. Helmsley.  Earlier this month, she fired Julian Abio, the general manager of the Helmsley Palace.  His infraction: telling reporters the trial hadn't hurt business.  The Spain Fund is red hot, but investors who charge in now could get gored.  Even the long-term bulls on this publicly traded, one-country fund are wondering why it is trading at an unusually fat premium of more than 33% to the value of the Spanish stocks it holds.  Stocks of Spanish companies have been relatively flat for much of the year.  But the fund's shares have surged to successive 52-week highs on heavy volume, finishing yesterday at 18 1/4, up 3/8, on the New York Stock Exchange composite tape.  The run-up has left money managers and analysts astounded at the lofty price level of the $136 million-asset fund.  Traders say much of the big buying has come from Japanese institutions.  "If their clients find out, they should take them out and shoot them behind a wall," chortles George Foot, managing partner of Newgate Management Associates in Northampton, Mass.  Mr. Foot is among several money managers and traders who have recently sold short the Spain Fund, borrowing shares and selling them in hopes of buying them back at lower levels.  Even some analysts who previously recommended the fund have pulled back.  "I don't like the valuation at all," says Michael Porter, an analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., who no longer recommends the stock for short-term gains.  Spain remains one of Europe's most attractive markets, analysts say.  Despite this year's underperformance, the Spanish market should be bolstered by mergers and cross-border pacts leading up to 1992's economic unification of the 12 countries comprising the European Community, analysts say.  Spain is one of Europe's fastest growing economies, with corporate profit growth of 21% projected for this year, according to Mr. Porter.  The Spanish stock market currently trades at about 5.2 times cash flow and 1.4 times book value.  It's probably worth paying some premium for professional management of stocks in foreign countries, analysts say.  But only a few country funds trade as far above the value of their underlying holdings as Spain Fund does now.  And those high-flying funds generally invest in markets -- unlike Spain -- that are otherwise closed to American investors.  Buying any fund for more than its portfolio value can be treacherous.  That's because nearly everything has to go right for investors to make money: Even if the underlying markets surge, the fund's own stock price can fall.  Investors can find cheaper ways to play Spanish stocks.  The First Iberian Fund -- a smaller fund traded on the American Stock Exchange with a portfolio of mostly Spanish securities -- currently trades at about a 4% discount to its net asset value.  The First Spanish Fund trades on the London Stock Exchange at a discount, too.  U.S. investors also can buy American Depositary Receipts on several of the big stocks in the fund; these so-called ADRs represent shares of foreign companies traded in the U.S.  "You can put together your own Spain Fund without paying a penny extra for it," contends Jon Woronoff, who edits the International Fund Monitor, a Washington, D.C., newsletter.  Still, the fund's investment adviser, Alliance Capital Management Corp., draws praise from analysts for easily outperforming the Spanish stock market since the fund's launch in July 1988.  Many of the portfolio's biggest holdings are banks and mining and minerals companies, although the fund's bank weighting -- about 13% of the portfolio -- remains far less than the 30% weighting in leading Spanish-stock indexes.  In recent months, the fund has aggressively gobbled shares of Repsol S.A., Spain's state-controlled oil enterprise, which now makes up 8% of the portfolio, up from about 1.5%.  Fund manager Mark Breedon believes the oil giant is undervalued as it undergoes a restructuring.  Many traders who had bought Repsol when it was issued now have taken profits, Mr. Breedon says, adding: "A lot of that selling has dried up, and we think it's ready for a move."  Meanwhile, many of those shorting the fund remain undeterred.  Philip Goldstein, a New York investor, has been among those who've been hurt betting on the fund's decline.  But he says he'd do it again.  "To me, it's just a bubble waiting for someone to prick {it}," he says.  If there were awards for poor market timing this year, Renaissance Investment Management Inc. would be a strong contender.  Early in January, the Cincinnati-based money manager bailed completely out of stocks and moved $1.7 billion into cash, such as short-term Treasury bills and money-market funds.  Despite the stock market's explosive rally, Renaissance still is sticking by its guns -- even though it's been a painful experience.  "It's been a very challenging, difficult year for us, no doubt about it," said Frank Terrizzi, the firm's president.  "We feel as though we're in a home-run hitting contest, and we've been hitting nothing but singles while people around us have been hitting homers."  But switching strategy now would be a big mistake, Mr. Terrizzi said.  "Most people do what's wrong: bail out at the bottom and jump in at the top."  Renaissance, which has been in business 11 years and now manages about $1.8 billion, has lost some clients, Mr. Terrizzi conceded.  "But we've also gained some new clients to offset the old clients.  We've probably lost more accounts than we've gained, but the net additions we've gained have tended to be larger accounts."  Renaissance made its big switch last January because of instructions from its computer model.  The computer "told us that the return on cash currently is superior to every one of the asset classes we track," Mr. Terrizzi said in mid-January. (At the time, short-term Treasury bills yielded nearly 9%.) "And when you consider there's no market-price risk in cash, we'd have to be crazy not to be in it."  How does it feel now to have missed this year's huge stock market rally?  "It's not a pleasant thing," Mr. Terrizzi said.  "I certainly enjoy very much the business I'm in, but I don't enjoy this particular part of it.  I feel like I'm the bartender who's trying to throw out the drunks.  It's something that has to be done, but I don't look forward to doing it.  And every time you try to do it, someone tries to take a swing at us."  Mr. Terrizzi declined to identify any clients who've left, but said that those who defected were largely newer and smaller clients.  "There's an absence of patience in that sector of the marketplace."  Some clients have been very supportive, he said.  An officer at one publicly traded company called this week to tell Mr. Terrizzi he realized how bad he must be feeling.  He also said that despite Renaissance's poor performance, "we're very pleased that you follow your strategy and we're going to give you more money."  Renaissance hopes other clients take a similar view.  The stock market seems to be going through a "time when logic is taking a back seat to emotion," Mr. Terrizzi said.  "I don't want that to come across as sour grapes.  It's just a matter of fact."  Regarding "Your Money Matters," July 31: Who cares about the nine bids or the 11 bids for the bonds?  It is the top two or three that matter; the top to bottom spread is meaningless.  Go to 10 Porsche dealers for a bid on your Porsche and examine the spread]  Why wouldn't Wells Fargo and Chase use a broker for their bids?  Or do they enjoy making their own calls to save a small commission?  Municipal-bond brokers use a wire network for "bid wanted" items, so these items would be seen by 100 to 200 potential bidders.  Also, the reference to "getting out before their bonds mature" is strange.  Investors buy bonds for a state income based on their maturity date.  Any investor who "has to get out" should buy bonds that mature when the funds are needed so they are not at risk of the market value.  David W. Ellis  Cincinnati  DELPHI INFORMATION SYSTEMS Inc. (Westlake Village, Calif.) -- Donald L. Lucas, a 59-year-old director, was elected chairman, succeeding Walter F. Bauer, 65, who resigned.  Mr. Lucas, a venture capitalist, is chairman of Oracle Systems Corp. and Cadence Design Systems Inc.  A Delphi spokesman said that when Mr. Bauer became chairman in April 1986, the agreement was for him to remain in that post for three years.  He continues as a director of Delphi, which develops and markets hardware and software systems for insurance agents and brokers.  For a while there, it looked like A. Bart Giamatti, the baseball commissioner, would have to make an important decision this season.  No, not about Pete Rose; A. Bart slapped Charlie Hustle with a "lifetime" suspension but with provision for appeal after a year.  Aside from the observation that a year is a pretty short lifetime, one can only note that Pete the Plunger outlasted Dallas Green.  The decision I have in mind would have to do with the American League's Eastern Division, whose two front-runners, the Baltimore Orioles and Milwaukee Brewers, met for three games in sultry Crabtown earlier this week.  At sunrise Monday, the O's led the circuit by a nose (1/2 game) over the Brewers and a neck (1 1/2 games) over Toronto, with Boston and Cleveland just a few lengths behind.  Only the top three of that group had plus-.500 won-lost records, and the best of 'em, the O's paltry 64-59, would have been worth a fifth place in the AL West.  Some had suggested that the right thing for the commish to do would be to declare the Eastern race null and void and let the best of the West -- the California Angels and Oakland A's -- have it out in the playoffs.  But even a predictable cop-out on that one mightn't save Mr. G.  What if three or five of the Easterners straggled home tied for first at, say, 81-81: How would they play it off?  Round-robin?  Single-elimination?  Pepper games at 20 feet?  The mind boggles.  It just could be, though, that the Orioles, those unlikeliest of heroes, will make such speculation moot.  They swept the Brewers, or what was left of them, to open a bit of distance on the pack and, perhaps, lend some definition to the rest of the race.  The wins also boosted the O's league-wide prestige.  After Wednesday night's victory, they would have stood fourth in the West.  Anyone predicting that the Orioles would find themselves in this position with September looming could have commanded fancy odds from Rose's old pals at season's beginning.  This is the gang that lost 107 games last year and spent the winter trading away their best-known remaining player, slugger Eddie Murray.  And truth to tell, a season of relative success hasn't made household names of many O's in households out of sight of Chesapeake Bay.  Try these: Mike Devereaux, Randy Milligan, Stan Jefferson, Rene Gonzalez, Joe Orsulak and Tim Hulett.  All started games in the Brewers' series.  If you know their positions, you get an "A" in box-score watching. (Answers below.)  Here are a few more names to try: Jeff Ballard, Dave Johnson, Bob Milacki and Pete Harnisch.  I won't tease you here; all are pitchers.  In fact, they're the O's starting rotation.  Milacki and Harnisch are rookies.  Ballard is a third-year man who began the season with a 10-20 Major League won-lost record and a 5.09 earned run average.  Johnson is a 29-year-old local with a losing record to show for eight minor-league campaigns.  He and his wife live in a trailer park.  He says he's contemplated quitting the game more than once.  But that was then and this is now.  On Monday, Ballard pulled off the neat trick of shutting out Milwaukee, 5-0, without recording a strikeout or walk.  That put his record at 13-6.  The next night, Johnson walked one and struck out the same in beating the Brewers, 4-2.  It was his third complete-game victory since he was brought up Aug. 1.  Wednesday was big Milacki's turn, and he went eight innings in a 3-1 win.  Ace reliefer Gregg Olson, another rookie, got to finish that one, and said he was glad he did because with all the complete games his mates were throwing, he needed the exercise.  "What have our young guys got?" asks Al Jackson, the Baltimore pitching coach.  "A will to pitch and a will to win.  You can go a long way on those."  Frank Robinson, the Hall of Fame hitter who's the O's manager, takes a like tack.  "We're no powerhouse, but we've taken advantage of our opportunities," says he.  "If we can keep that up, we'll be all right."  The Baltimore bosses are big on intangibles because the O's tangibles aren't all that impressive.  As of Wednesday, they ranked 12th among the league's 14 teams in hitting and eighth in ERA. Only catcher Mickey Tettleton ranks among league individual hitting leaders in home runs (22) and slugging percentage (.523), and he's on the disabled list.  O hurlers' individual accomplishments are similarly modest.  But they've been getting a few things right.  While they're 12th in team batting average they're fifth in runs scored, and the pitchers are among the league leaders in fewest walks allowed.  Most importantly, they're No. 1 in fielding, and their 72 errorless games this season also is an AL best.  "You don't see good fielding plays in the box scores, but they sure help on the scoreboard," noted pitcher Ballard, whose let-'em-hit-it style depends on good support.  The O's helped Ballard Monday with a fielding gem or three, and he helped himself by holding the Brewers scoreless in the fourth inning after they put runners on second and third bases with none out.  A fifth-inning, three-run homer by shortstop Cal Ripkin Jr., one of their few name-brand players, provided more than enough scoring.  Johnson also got just enough of everything in his Tuesday win over a Milwaukee team whose disabled list has become almost as long as its active roster.  Infielders Bill Spiers and Billy Bates, fill-ins themselves, fell with injuries in that one, leaving the Brewers with catcher B.J. Surhoff playing third base and rightfielder Mike Felder at second.  "Ever since January, when we learned about {pitching ace} Teddy Higuera's back injury, I've hated to pick up a telephone," said Brewer pitching coach Chuck Hartenstein.  He said that before the injuries to Spiers and Bates.  On Wednesday, F. Robby pushed the right button, and pinch-hitter Keith Moreland's bases-loaded double scored the tying and winning runs in the eighth.  In the clubhouse afterward, new-hero Johnson voiced the common theme: "I don't care what anybody says; it's a pennant race and we're in it.  It's a heckuva lot better than where we all were last year."  ---  Quiz answers: CF, 1B, CF, 2B, RF, 3B.  After making their fortunes running mom-and-pop motels, many Indian immigrants to the U.S. are parlaying their business savvy into motel construction and other real-estate ventures.  "Indians who have been operating motels for years are now buying land and building," says Kim Nguyen, assistant vice president at a Sumitomo Bank branch in San Francisco that has been lending to Indian "moteliers" for more than 15 years.  "In some cases, they build the motels and sell them, so they make a lump-sum profit in one year."  About 40% of the small U.S. motels, or inns with fewer than 50 rooms, are run by Indian immigrants, says Kenneth Hine, chief executive officer of the American Hotel and Motel Association.  Days Inns of America Inc. says about 24% of its franchisees are of Indian origin.  A huge majority of Indian immigrants in the motel industry hail from the western Indian state of Gujarat -- and most of them have the last name Patel.  When they were getting started, most tapped into their large families to find workers, a key to much of their success.  Business grew from there.  Many who began in the early 1970s owning a tiny family-run inn, now operate strings of motels under franchises from national chains.  And now, in pockets of the U.S., they are diversifying into construction of bigger motels, as well as luxury hotels, apartments and other commercial buildings.  The push into real estate development reflects both a desire to diversify and intensifying competition among budget motels.  Industry heavyweights that previously ran upscale hotels and inns are moving into the budget sector, says Joseph Doyle, a lodging industry analyst at Smith Barney Harris Upham & Co.  For example, Holiday Corp. launched its Hampton Inns line of budget motels in 1984, and Marriott Corp. started up the Fairfield Inns line in 1987.  "It's going to be tougher for whoever runs the mom-and-pop motels," Mr. Doyle says.  But while the competition is rougher, the Indian motel owners' past successes have provided them with the cash and confidence to venture into bigger, riskier business.  "Indians can build their own properties now because they have the money and the experience," says J.P. Rama, a principal at JHM Enterprises Inc., a development and motel-operating company run by five brothers in Greenville, S.C.  Another developer, B.B. Patel of Menlo Park, Calif., contends that building residential properties is a good way to protect his business from a possible economic downturn.  This Mr. Patel, who came to the U.S. in 1967, is building a 30-house residential project in Davis, Calif.  He says strong demand for housing in the state was an incentive for the residential project, but diversification perhaps even more so.  "Motels are very vulnerable to the economic cycle," he says.  "If the economy goes down, motels and restaurants suffer."  Mr. Patel built his first motel in 1981 in the Silicon Valley area, as part of the Best Western association of motels, and went on to build four others in California, the latest of which is an all-suite affair that opened in March.  Gross sales at the motels totaled $5 million last year, he says.  California, with its soaring real estate values and huge lodging industry, is a natural hunting-ground for moteliers-turned-developers.  "Development is a good business for us because we know the land and we know the location," says Bhikhubhai Patel, a California-based developer.  Born in Gujarat, Mr. Patel came to the U.S. in 1977.  His sights turned toward the motel business partly because many of his friends were already in it.  Twelve years later, his company, Tarsadia Inc. of Costa Mesa, Calif., owns a 225-room Raddison hotel in San Diego and eight motels in Southern California.  It has built and sold several motels and is constructing two other Raddison hotels in Southern California -- one at a cost of $30 million in Anaheim and another at a cost of $11 million in Santa Ana.  "If a buyer comes, we sell the projects," Mr. Patel says of the two new Raddison hotels.  "If not, we run them."  Coming full circle, some motel owner-developers are shipping their expertise back to India.  JHM Enterprises, the Rama brothers' company, is building a luxury hotel in Surat, a region in Gujarat north of Bombay, through a joint venture with the Surat government.  JHM Enterprises, which owns and operates motels in seven U.S. states, earned $12 million last year.  The continued expansion of Indian-owned motels is encouraging some Indian-born entrepreneurs to set up support businesses.  One such businessman is Sunil Nayak, a motel owner who now builds residential and commercial properties in the New York-New Jersey area.  One of his companies, Biscon Inc., recruits managers for Indian motel owners.  "Indians went into the business as owners/managers.  Some of them even had their wives cleaning the rooms," says Mr. Nayak, also a Gujarati.  "But as they've expanded, they've lost this labor advantage and they've developed a need for professional managers."  While Indian motel-owners in general have solid credit records, bank financing for the construction of hotels and motels is drying up in parts of the country.  "Although on a case-by-case basis you can usually get money, the overall perception in the banking industry is that the motel market is overbuilt.  So they would like to restrict their lending to the industry," says H.P. Rama, chief executive officer of JHM Enterprises.  One alternative to bank financing is offered by investment banker Prakash Shah, who has concocted a security backed by motel mortgages.  Mr. Shah, who heads First Growth Group of Bridgewater, N.J., is raising $1.4 million for two New Jersey motel owners, partly through a private placement of the mortgage-backed notes and partly through a conventional bank loan.  Mr. Shah also is planning to set up a mutual fund that will invest in these and other real-estate backed securities.  But that idea, he says, hinges "on continuing to find good motel managers and motels with a solid income-producing record."  Judicate Inc., the nation's oldest private court system, is facing a severe financial crunch that could force it out of business by year's end.  The company, founded in 1983 as an alternative to public courts, disclosed in a recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that it may not survive after year's end because of continued losses and diminishing cash reserves.  This month, Judicate laid off nearly a quarter of its 22-member staff and imposed across-the-board salary cuts.  Company officials said the moves are intended to trim expenses and shift the company's focus from marketing to direct sales.  Judicate's troubles have prompted speculation over whether the legal community and the public are ready for the concept of private mediation and arbitration as an alternative to public courts.  Judicate, and private courts like it, have operated amid high hopes that they would gain popularity and help reduce the backlog of publicly filed lawsuits.  Judicate hopes to dispel concerns that either the concept of private courts or the company's future is in jeopardy.  "We are confident that we are here to stay," Judicate's chief financial officer, Michael Carney, said in an interview.  "We are predicting that the company will be breaking even by the end of the year."  Judicate functions as a private court system in which parties resolve civil disputes.  In most respects, Judicate performs much in the way of a public court: Cases are heard with lawyers in a courtroom -- like setting presided over by a judge hired by both sides, usually a trained arbitrator or a retired jurist.  The system can cut time and costs for the parties.  Still, public reaction to private courts and other alternative dispute resolution programs, remains wary, say some experts.  "The gap between the public support of alternative dispute resolution and use of alternative dispute resolution has been very very wide," said Kenneth Feinberg, a Washington lawyer who has mediated dozens of complex out-of-court settlements, including the massive lawsuit by Vietnam veterans who say they were harmed by the chemical defoliant Agent Orange.  Judicate, which has never made a profit, has predicted it could break even if it could reach a workload of 150 cases a week.  But in recent months, the pace has stagnated at about 100 a week.  Mr. Feinberg said that parties in lawsuits usually seek alternatives to litigation only if the cost and the uncertainty of going to court are exorbitantly high and where a "third-party buffer" may help circumvent deep animosities.  "I think that when private court systems entered the market, they anticipated the market to develop more quickly than it did," said Rene Ellis, director of case management for Private Adjudication Center Inc., a nonprofit arbitration and mediation service affiliated with Duke University Law School in Durham, N.C.  Most lawyers, with the exception of litigators, agree that arbitration can be a reliable alternative to court battles, said Robert Coulson, president of the American Arbitration Association in New York City.  Judicate contends that its troubles stem from too much emphasis on educating the public about its services and not enough on selling the idea directly to those who could use it -- lawyers and businesses.  Judicate faces other problems as well.  Earlier this summer, it froze $478,645 of sorely needed capital to collateralize the purchase of American Intermediation Services, a San Francisco-based arbitration company, according to Judicate's SEC filing.  The move helped shrink Judicate's net working capital to $581,665 as of June 30, compared with $1.3 million a year ago, while increasing its total staff to 43.  Max C. Chapman Jr., the ex-Marine who until January was president of Kidder, Peabody & Co., is negotiating with Nomura Securities Co. to become either co-chairman or vice chairman of the big Japanese firm's U.S. unit, according to people familiar with the talks.  Such a move would make him the highest-ranking American at the world's biggest securities company.  Nomura insiders and others say that while a deal is close -- some say it could be announced later in September -- it isn't yet signed, and Mr. Chapman could still decide to set up his own merchant bank.  When he resigned from Kidder after being passed over for the job of chief executive officer of Kidder, Peabody Group Inc., Kidder's parent, the 46-year-old executive said he planned to set up his own securities firm.  Mr. Chapman, who is vacationing in Oregon, couldn't be reached.  P.J. Johnson, a Nomura executive, said "any comment would be premature."  According to people with knowledge of Nomura's search for a senior-level American executive, negotiations with Mr. Chapman have gone on for several months.  In early August, Mr. Chapman was interviewed by top Nomura executives in Tokyo, who reportedly were as impressed with his golf game as his knowledge of the securities business.  THE RESILIENT ECONOMY confounds experts as growth estimates rise.  The Commerce Department is likely to announce Tuesday a sharp upward revision of its earlier 1.7% estimate of second-quarter growth, adjusted for inflation.  Private forecasters say the new figure could be as high as 2.7%.  The economy's surprising strength arrests the recent decline in interest rates and could even push them up.  Economists seek new metaphors to replace "soft landing."  Stephen Roach of Morgan Stanley says, "The wheels haven't hit the runway."  Kemper Financial Services' David Hale refers to a "soft takeoff."  The latest data fuel Fed worries about reigniting inflation.  But it's good news for the administration, making it easier to reach Gramm-Rudman deficit targets for fiscal 1991.  LAWMAKERS GET an earful back home about drugs and health costs.  Tennessee Sen. Sasser says constituents see victims of drug use "all around them."  Virginia Rep. Parris says "people are more worried about that than anything else."  Lawmakers encounter open hostility over taxes for catastrophic-illness coverage; Speaker Foley says he expects the reaction that lawmakers are receiving to prompt changes in the tax this fall.  But some legislators find surprisingly little reaction to issues that have preoccupied Washington.  New Jersey Rep. Roukema says worry has receded on S&Ls since the bailout bill passed: "It's behind us."  Rep. Brennan of Maine hasn't "heard a word" about congressional pay.  North Carolina's Rep. Coble says, "Wright's name almost never comes up."  THE U.S. MAPS plans to aid Colombia in its promised anti-drug crackdown.  Neither Colombian nor U.S. officials want American troops sent in.  But more U.S. technicians and military training teams might be sent to support Colombian police and soldiers using Blackhawk helicopters purchased from the Pentagon last year.  Colombia has also asked the Ex-Im Bank to guarantee a $200 million loan for more helicopters, patrol boats, weapons and parts.  The Justice Department is offering a $2 million program to help protect judges and witnesses from narcotics hoodlums.  And a visiting high-level team of Colombian officials is seeking to work out details of a deal to extradite wanted dealers to the U.S.  American officials, who have already made requests for 12 suspects, are looking at a list of 76 others.  SON OF FSX?  The U.S. and South Korea remain far apart on how many of the planned 120 new jet fighters the two are to produce jointly will be built in the U.S.  The Koreans want to buy as few as three fully assembled.  But a senior Pentagon official predicts "a nasty, prolonged fight with Congress" in that event.  "There are too many jobs involved to avoid a clash."  LAWMAKERS CONSIDER requiring the attorney general to report to them on the source of all politically motivated leaks.  Rep. Edwards, one of those thinking about a bill, cites the leak of the investigation into fellow Democrat Gray's office.  But Edwards presses Thornburgh to retract his threat to use a theft-of-government-property law to punish leakers; he says that would discourage whistle-blowers.  KEEPING DISTANCE?  Bush officials were notably absent from Malcolm Forbes's ostentatious birthday bash in Morocco.  Forbes's flack won't say who in the administration stiffed his boss, but GOP Chairman Atwater accepted and then backed out.  A White House official isn't sure if Bush was invited but says that, if so, it wasn't deemed worth bringing to Sununu's attention.  DEMOCRATIC STRATEGISTS are uneasy about how Gerald Richman, their candidate in the Florida House special election, is using race in his "American" campaign against Cuban-born GOP candidate Ros-Lehtinen.  But they think the appeal is a winner and plan a last-minute media blitz.  They also use Democratic Chairman Brown, who is black, to rebut charges of bigotry against Richman, who remains the underdog.  COMMUNIST QUALMS grow over Poland -- and Gorbachev's acquiescence.  The state-controlled Romanian press lashes out at Solidarity's rise to power and takes an indirect poke at Gorbachev for letting it happen.  East German and Czech publications also sharply criticize events in Poland, and the flood of people escaping East Germany is approaching the 1961 levels that triggered construction of the Berlin wall.  Grumbling in Moscow also rises.  Prime Minister Ryzhkov unexpectedly joins the complaining about the "scum" that has risen within the political system under glasnost.  But U.S. officials expect Gorbachev to go on the offensive again when he returns from his Black Sea vacation.  Though Gorbachev's job as head of state appears secure, some analysts see Ryzhkov as a possible rival for his other job, head of the party.  MINOR MEMOS: After hearing about the incident in which old folks angry at the Medicare tax jostled Rostenkowski, Foley observes: "I don't like anything that puts Rosty in a bad mood.". . .  The Democratic National Committee pays the last $1,969 installment on telephone bills rung up by Hubert Humphrey and Robert Kennedy in 1968.  But it still owes $24,348 to Eastern Airlines from the Humphrey campaign. . . .  Political geography: The conservative Heritage Foundation suggests Bush refer to Poland and Hungary as part of "Central Europe" instead of "Eastern Europe."  Proving there's always someone to spoil the party, eight New York Stock Exchange issues hit 52-week lows at some point during yesterday's session, while the market was surging into record territory.  Indeed, two issues -- New America High Income Fund and Prospect Street High Income Portfolio -- each hit their new lows on at least four times normal daily volume.  New America and Prospect Street are publicly traded funds that invest in high-yield, high-risk junk bonds; such funds have been among the worst-performing bond-fund groups this year.  Other Big Board issues hitting lows as the Dow rallied: Shares of Brush Wellman Inc., a Cleveland-based beryllium producer; Chrysler Corp.'s $2.375 preferred stock; shares of Eagle-Picher Industries Inc., which has asbestos-liability problems; and shares of Southmark Corp., which tumbled into bankruptcy-law proceedings in June.  Also: Shares of Storage Technology Corp., which withdrew two stock offerings in July; and Schwitzer Inc., a former Household International Inc. unit that has been trading for only four months.  Canadian and U.S. researchers said they have identified the genetic defect that causes cystic fibrosis, one of the most common inherited diseases.  A seemingly tiny mutation causes a single gene to produce a defective protein.  The defective protein is apparently what interferes with the normal movement of sodium and chloride atoms in and out of cells, a basic feature of cystic fibrosis, a team of molecular biologists and geneticists reported.  Cystic fibrosis involves a failure of various glands to work properly.  The result is that the lungs clog up with a thick mucous, rendering the person susceptible to infections.  The pancreas gland also fails to produce the enzymes that digest fats, and the sweat glands fail to work properly.  The discovery of the defective gene and protein "represents a major milestone in scientific efforts to identify the basic cellular defect and to develop new treatments and a cure for cystic fibrosis," the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation in Bethesda, Md., said.  The discovery of the defective gene and protein was announced at news conferences in Toronto and Washington, D.C., by a joint team of scientists from Toronto's Hospital for Sick Children and from the University of Michigan, Ann Arbor.  The news conferences were hastily called after news of the gene discovery leaked out earlier this week.  The scientific details are to be published in the journal Science on Sept. 8.  The discovery of the cystic fibrosis gene has been expected.  In 1986, the rough location of the cystic fibrosis gene was found by molecular geneticists Ray White of the Howard Hughes Medical Institute at the University of Utah and Robert Williamson at St. Mary's Hospital in London.  They pinpointed the gene to be near two identifiable "markers" on chromosome No.7 of the 23 pairs of chromosomes in a human cell.  The chromosomes contain the entire complement of human genes.  Since then several research teams have been racing to find the cystic fibrosis gene itself.  The race apparently has been won by a team headed jointly by geneticists Lap-Chee Tsui and John Riordan in Toronto and Francis Collins in Ann Arbor.  These researchers plucked out a gene from chromosome seven of cystic fibrosis patients and compared it with the same gene from a healthy person.  The gene, like all genes, dictated that the cell assemble a chain of simple molecules, or amino acids, to form a protein.  They found that the gene from the cystic fibrosis patients was missing the "code" for one amino acid molecule at one spot in the protein.  As a result the protein produced by the cystic fibrosis patients was missing a single amino acid molecule that was present in the same protein from healthy persons.  This defect was found in the genes of 70% of some 200 cystic fibrosis patients whose genetic material was tested.  The abnormality wasn't found in any healthy people tested.  The remaining 30% of cystic fibrosis patients may suffer any of possibly a half dozen other kinds of mutations in the same gene, the researchers suggested.  The protein is similar in several ways to a class of proteins found in the membranes of cells that are involved in regulating the passage of charged atoms, called ions, in and out of cells, including ions of sodium and chloride.  Because of this resemblance, the new-found protein was dubbed cystic fibrosis trans-membrane regulator or CFTR protein.  The researchers said the next step is to find out exactly what the normal CFTR protein does and what the defective CFTR protein fails to do to cause cystic fibrosis.  The Cystic Fibrosis Foundation cited several experts' speculations that someday it may be possible to correct the defective protein, thus curing the disorder.  Drugs, for example, might someday restore the missing amino acid to the defective protein or the normal version of the defective gene might be transplanted to patients.  Last, but not least.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average is the best-known stock market indicator, but when it finally closed above its 1987 pre-crash record yesterday, it was the last major stock indicator to climb to a new high.  In recent months, other market indicators have upstaged the Dow Jones industrials by smashing the records they set two years ago, before the market began the sickening decline that culminated in the Oct. 19 crash.  The American Stock Exchange index was the first to surpass its pre-crash record, when it closed at 366 June 8; the previous record was 365.01 Aug. 13, 1987.  About two months after the new Amex record, three other major indexes hit records in rapid succession.  Standard & Poor's 500-stock index and the New York Stock Exchange composite index did the trick July 26, when the S&P closed at 338.05 and the Big Board composite at 188.14.  Then, on Aug. 3, the Nasdaq index of over-the-counter stocks finished at 456.93, surpassing its previous high of 455.26 Aug. 26, 1987.  The industrials' new record comes at a bad time for superstitious traders.  Today, Aug. 25, is the two-year anniversary of when the average hit its old 2722.42 record in pre-crash 1987.  The rest is history.  Headhunter Thomas Neff had to move fast: He had to find someone to lead a faltering business, a company whose chairman is so tough that he fired his own son -- and do it in the middle of the dog days of August.  The executive he found was Richard W. Miller, a veteran of RCA Corp. and General Electric Co. Mr. Miller's new posts: president and chief operating officer of Wang Laboratories Inc.  His predecessor, Frederick A. Wang, was forced out of the jobs by his father.  For Mr. Neff -- president of search firm Spencer Stuart Inc. -- the key is knowing the executive market.  Today he is best known for finding Louis V. Gerstner to head RJR Nabisco Inc.  But he's no stranger to troubled companies.  He once found a chief executive for Food Fair Inc. as it reorganized under Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law proceedings.  "The fact that a company is having some trouble is a turn-on for some people," Mr. Neff says.  "Some executives thrive on it.  That's clearly what we were looking for here."  And that's what the company found.  Despite Wang's record $424.3 million loss for the year ended June 30, the problems that led to its restructuring $575 million in debt and the autocratic role of chairman and founder An Wang, "The situation fits perfectly for me," says Mr. Miller, who helped restructure Penn Central Co. during bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Mr. Neff's role in the Wang search shows the growing importance of recruiters.  David Lord, managing editor of Executive Recruiter News, a trade publication in Fitzwilliam, N.H., says employers use search firms to fill 30% of top-level positions, double the level of 10 years ago and up "from something that couldn't be measured" 20 years ago.  Mr. Neff says he first met with Mr. Wang and the company's search committee early last week at Mr. Wang's house in western Massachusetts.  Knowing that the board was looking for someone with financial savvy and operating experience who could deal with crisis and a strong corporate culture, Mr. Neff put together a list of about 20 names.  Because of Wang's troubles, the candidate had to be available immediately, thus eliminating those who would be difficult to woo, like active chief executives or those with big equity stakes in their own concerns.  That left an obvious pool: At least a half-dozen people on Mr. Neff's original list had been restructured out of their companies.  "Because of mergers, there is more good talent available now than at any time in the past," he says.  Mr. Miller, who was working at an investment concern after GE traded away the consumer-electronics business he had headed, was on the list.  He had already met with the elder Mr. Wang after being introduced through a mutual acquaintance.  Mr. Neff contacted Mr. Miller and others, as well as checking on everyone through third parties.  August complicated things.  Nearly half the candidates -- including Mr. Miller -- were traveling or on vacation.  "I could have conducted this search better from Nantucket than from New York," Mr. Neff says.  "I had office numbers, home numbers, weekend home numbers, numbers for the fax at the office, numbers for the fax at home, and car telephone numbers."  Mr. Neff also helped design the pay package, not easy because pay for top officers at family-controlled companies usually isn't competitive.  "We were building a compensation package from scratch," he says.  Neither he nor Mr. Miller will disclose Mr. Miller's compensation.  Mr. Neff probably has a stake in it, though, because recruiting firms typically bill about one-third of a candidate's first-year cash pay.  As for his own compensation, Mr. Neff will say only that last year he billed between $2.5 million and $3 million for his own firm and that his pay is "comparable to some of the people I recruit."  From beginning to end, the Wang search took less than 10 days.  ---  William M. Bulkeley in Boston contributed to this article.  Fifteen containers of chemical-contaminated waste were unloaded from a Soviet freighter early yesterday at Baie Comeau, Quebec, despite a court order and with the help of Quebec provincial police.  A coalition of environmental groups, unions and residents of the small town on the north shore of the St. Lawrence River said the waste was unloaded after the coalition obtained an emergency court order forbidding the freighter to unload.  But Quebec environment minister Lise Bacon said in Montreal that the cargo was unloaded before the freighter's captain was told of the injunction.  The cargo on the Baie Comeau wharf is the first of two shipments of chemical waste belonging to the Quebec government and turned back from British ports two weeks ago.  The waste was shipped to Britain for incineration.  But after a British tabloid dubbed a separate shipment of the waste from Quebec a "cargo of death" British port authorities banned all such shipments.  With two cargoes at sea and another 11 still at the site of a warehouse fire near Montreal -- 3,600 metric tons of debris in all -- the Quebec government decided to store the waste for at least 18 months at a hydroelectric generating station just outside Baie Comeau.  Attorneys for a group of 900 women injured by the Dalkon Shield contraceptive said they will ask the U.S. Supreme Court to consider throwing out a key aspect of a reorganization plan for A.H. Robins Co., Richmond, Va., maker of the device.  Alan B. Morrison, lead counsel for the Public Citizen Litigation Group in Washington, D.C., said the women object to a provision in the plan that bars any future lawsuits against Robins company officials, family members, or the company's former insurer, Aetna Life & Casualty Co.  The decision to appeal means a $2.48 billion settlement fund for claimants that is part of the reorganization plan is likely to remain frozen, at least until the Supreme Court considers this fall whether to hear the case.  Robins made the device in the early 1970s until growing concern that it caused severe injuries forced it off the market.  The company has been in Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law proceedings since August 1985, when it sought protection from thousands of product-liability suits over the device.  More than 150,000 claims world-wide are pending.  The plan has been approved overwhelmingly by a vote of Shield claimants, but Mr. Morrison contends that court protection against further suits denies claimants due process because it would eliminate further damage awards should the settlement fund run dry.  Robert J. Zradicka was named chairman by a unanimous decision of the board last Friday, after Alan Lipstein resigned as chairman and chief financial officer, the company said.  Mr. Zradicka, who is a founder, is also president and chief executive officer of the concern, which provides telecommunications network products to the health-care and hospitality industries.  Barrie Simon, a director and a founder, was named secretary and treasurer.  In addition, the company said William H. Jones, a certified public accountant based in Clearwater, Fla., who has served as the company's accountant since February 1988, was named to the board, expanding it to five.  Southnet gave no explanation for Mr. Zradicka's resignation or for what it described as "sweeping changes" at the company.  Officials couldn't be reached.  A group that includes Halsey Drug Co., Brooklyn, N.Y., said it sold 32,000 shares of Moore Medical Corp., reducing its stake in the company to 5.3%.  The group sold the shares on Tuesday for $13.875 to $14.24 a share, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The filing didn't give a reason for the sale.  Moore Medical, a distributor of pharmaceuticals and surgical supplies, is based in New Britain, Conn.  The old photograph was stashed away long ago, hidden from the eyes of the police.  But in the renewed spirit of defiance sweeping South Africa these days, Cassim Saloojee retrieved the photo for another look.  In the picture, Nelson Mandela, the leader of the African National Congress, is instructing the first group of volunteers for the ANC's 1952 defiance campaign against the government's policies of racial segregation known as apartheid.  Mr. Saloojee, only 17 years old at the time, is there, too, standing in the back and holding a placard protesting, "Down with the Ghetto Act."  "As schoolchildren, our minds were fired by Mandela and the idea of defiance," Mr. Saloojee remembers.  Since then, the ANC has been banned, Mr. Mandela has been jailed for life and photos of him outlawed, and the Ghetto Act, now known as the Group Areas Act, is still ordering neighborhoods by race.  But Mr. Saloojee hasn't lost the fire of resistance.  Today, as the president of the Transvaal Indian Congress, he is standing out front as the anti-apartheid movement wages its second defiance campaign, challenging the continued segregation of South African society.  "The government goes around the world saying apartheid is dead, but we know the reality of apartheid in our land," Mr. Saloojee tells a cheering crowd of about 800 people jammed into a downtown Johannesburg hall.  "We say that the beaches of this country are ours, the hospitals are ours, and we are going to live the way we want to.  We will go on resisting until we break the walls of apartheid."  Those walls have proved sturdy during the 37 years between defiance campaigns.  Every time a new flicker of resistance appeared, the government snuffed it out.  But this time, despite a state of emergency that has banned dozens of organizations and restricted hundreds of individuals, veteran activists like Mr. Saloojee say some cracks are starting to appear.  The National Party, which has governed South Africa with unchallenged power for 41 years, is coming under unprecedented pressure from white parties to both its left and its right in the Sept. 6 parliamentary elections.  In their campaigning, government candidates talk about the need to shed apartheid legislation and begin negotiations with black leaders for a new constitution.  And in an effort to improve the country's international image and relieve the pressure of economic sanctions, Acting President and National Party leader F.W. de Klerk is promising world leaders that he will build a "new, totally changed" South Africa free of racial oppression.  With their defiance campaign -- which involves desegregating whites-only facilities, defying state-of-emergency restrictions and bans, and protesting the elections, which exclude the black majority -- the anti-apartheid movement is trying to put the spotlight on the government's claims of reform and hold the current leadership to them.  "By coming out against our restrictions, we're not seeking confrontation, but expressing our legitimate right to organize our own people should negotiations come about," says Cassim Coovadia, a defiance organizer and supporter of the banned United Democratic Front, or UDF, the largest coalition of anti-apartheid groups.  "If the state doesn't give us space to exercise that right, then we see that the state isn't serious about negotiations."  Similarly, he says, the campaigns to have non-white patients treated at whites-only hospitals and to open segregated schools and beaches to all races are designed "to help the government end apartheid."  He explains: "We've seen that doctors are willing to treat patients regardless of race.  If people are refused treatment in the future, we've now isolated the state as the stumbling block."  In the 1950s, the government had no qualms about crushing the defiance campaign, but this time the authorities are caught in a dilemma.  For instance, while threatening to arrest and detain the anti-apartheid protesters, Law and Order Minister Adriaan Vlok is telling campaign crowds that apartheid is "an albatross" around the country's neck.  Thus, while police in Cape Town used dogs and whips to chase blacks off an all-white beach, police in Durban and Johannesburg stood idly by while non-whites reported for treatment at white hospitals.  Though scores of workers have been arrested for singing liberation songs on commuter trains, students have paraded freely with an ANC flag.  While some rallies have been banned or broken up by tear gas, others have been allowed to proceed.  Some activists have been detained for violating their restriction orders, but others work in the open wearing T-shirts of their banned organizations.  "The National Party accepts that it can't intellectually defend apartheid anymore," says Mr. Saloojee.  "The conditions in the country now are such that there is no going backward to the primitive segregation system.  We can only move forward, and it can be done without violence."  This, of course, remains to be seen, as the defiance organizers continue their push forward and the police stand poised to resist.  But should large-scale violence be avoided, the anti-apartheid movement will claim a big victory.  "While the defiance campaign of the '50s was intended to simply defy the apartheid laws, this one is intended to also show an alternative to apartheid," says Mr. Coovadia.  "People will see that the opening of facilities {to all races} won't bring Armageddon to South Africa."  Still, a lot of convincing lies ahead.  When members of the banned Johannesburg Democratic Action Committee, an affiliate of the UDF, recently sold T-shirts and distributed anti-apartheid leaflets at a table in an upscale shopping center in the city's white suburbs, they were confronted by an angry group of old-car enthusiasts who were promoting their hobby at the same shopping center.  While a string quartet played chamber music, officials of the Piston Ring Club lobbied police to remove the anti-apartheid group's pamphleteers, who eventually left on their own.  "They're getting in our way," complained the owner of a 1960 Lancia Appia, the car nearest the table.  "Why can't they go and defy somewhere else?"  Healthcare International Inc., which is in a severe liquidity bind, said it agreed in principle to sell two psychiatric hospitals to Charter Medical Corp. for $27.3 million.  The health-care concern said the sale, subject to several conditions, will give the company $17.5 million in much-needed cash after debt on the properties is paid.  The company said that it hopes to complete the sale in 60 days but that it could take until year end.  Healthcare, Austin, Texas, said it is continuing to negotiate with others to sell additional facilities and to place new equity or debt with investors.  It said it hopes to complete some transactions that will give it immediate cash and allow it to dispose of unprofitable operations.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Healthcare closed at $2.125, up 12.5 cents.  Yesterday's explosive stock market rally didn't inspire bond investors, many of whom stayed on the sidelines.  While the Dow Jones Industrial Average soared 56.53 points to close at 2734.64, an all-time high, bonds barely budged and ended narrowly mixed.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose 1/8 point, or about $1.25 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, was unchanged from Wednesday at 8.15%.  The Treasury's new two-year notes, which were sold at auction earlier this week, ended slightly higher at a price to yield 8.27%.  "It was a relatively quiet day," said Jeffrey A. Fagan, a trading manager at Discount Corp. here.  "Nobody seems to be inspired."  He said the bond market appears to have settled into a trading range.  There was a little more excitement in the mortgage-backed market.  High-coupon mortgage securities issued by the Government National Mortgage Association rose yesterday as an increasing number of investors began to view them favorably when compared with other mortgage securities.  High-coupon issues are those with interest rates of between 10% and 11.5%.  These issues were recently recommended by analysts at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., which called the high-coupon issues the "cheapest Ginnie Maes."  In the report, Drexel analysts David Askin and William Curtin said the high-coupon issues haven't looked this attractive relative to discount issues (those with rates at or below 9.5%) for more than two years.  That's because yields on the Ginnie Mae high-coupon issues are better than many alternative investments.  Also, the nation's savings and loan associations, which have been big sellers of mortgage securities in recent months, don't own many high-coupon issues.  The Drexel analysis is based on "option-adjusted spreads," a sophisticated analytic technique that seeks to measure the returns of varying mortgage securities in different interest rate environments.  While recommending the premium Ginnie Mae issues, Drexel said securities issued by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. and Federal National Mortgage Association could be hurt by the thrift selling.  In trading yesterday, high-coupon issues rose as much as 1/8 point, while other mortgage-backed issues ended unchanged.  Meanwhile, investors bid aggressively for the $9.26 billion of one-year Treasury bills at yesterday's government auction.  The average rate on the new bills was 7.68% and the yield was 8.27%.  That was sharply higher than the average rate of 7.22% and yield of 7.75% at the last one-year bill auction on July 27.  The Treasury said it accepted $535.1 million of noncompetitive tenders, which come mainly from individual investors.  That was slightly lower than the $550.1 million of noncompetitive bids accepted at the previous one-year Treasury bill auction.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities were unchanged to slightly higher in thin trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 99 19/32, compared with 99 15/32 Wednesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 98 22/32 to yield 8.18%, compared with Wednesday's price of 98 16/32 and yield of 8.20%  Short-term rates fell yesterday.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.94% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.2%, while six-month Treasury bills had a discount rate of 7.85% and bond-equivalent yield of 8.27%.  Here are details of yesterday's one-year Treasury bill auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon-equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 52-Week Bills  @ Applications $27,545,840,000  @ Accepted bids $9,263,830,000  @ Accepted at low price 27%  @ Accepted noncompetitively $535,080,000  @ Average price (Rate) 92.235 (7.68%)  @ High price (Rate) 92.245 (7.67%)  @ Low price (Rate) 92.225 (7.69%)  @ Coupon equivalent 8.27%  The bills are dated Aug. 31 and mature Aug. 30, 1990.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds were little changed.  Among yesterday's new issues was a $350 million junk bond offering by Bally's Park Place Funding.  The 10-year notes, underwritten by Bear, Stearns & Co., were priced to yield 11 3/4%.  Traders say the notes were well-received by junk bond investors, primarily because they are considered higher on the quality scale when compared with some other recent issues.  "This is not one that is going to blow up because the company has more than ample cash flow to service the debt," said a mutual fund portfolio manager.  In recent months, investors have been wary of buying junk bonds and have tended to favor those of companies in recession-resistant industries and with strong cash flow.  Investors have shunned the bonds of weaker companies -- no matter how high the yield.  However, some money managers say they passed on Bally's notes because the yield was too low for a high-yield portfolio.  "For investors interested in high total return, these notes aren't too exciting," one money manager said.  Many junk bond investors seek yields above 12%.  Foreign Bonds  The policy-setting committee of West Germany's central bank, returning from its monthlong summer vacation, decided to leave interest rates unchanged.  As a result, the nation's discount rate remained at 5% and the Lombard rate at 7%.  The discount rate is the lowest rate at which banks can borrow funds from the Bundesbank, and the Lombard rate is the effective ceiling for money market rates.  Rumors had swirled earlier in the week that the Bundesbank would raise rates to defend the value of the mark, which has been weakening.  But many analysts dismissed such a prospect on grounds that domestic economic conditions didn't warrant such a move.  That position was reinforced by news that West German import prices fell 1.5% in July, the biggest drop in three years.  The report helped to lift bond prices in early trading, but prices drifted later in the day.  The Treasury's 6 3/4% bonds due June 1999 ended unchanged at 99.75 to yield 6.78%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 fell 0.15 point to 99.475 to yield 6.87%.  Japanese government bonds ended unchanged.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 ended at a price of 97.17 to yield 5.07%, the same as Wednesday.  Japan sold 600 billion yen ($4.19 billion) of new 4.9% 10-year bonds Thursday.  It was "a good auction," a saleswoman at a Japanese bank said.  Traders said the small size of the new No. 123 issue helped to spur demand.  Early Friday morning Japan announced that the new 10-year notes were priced at 100.04 with an average yield of 4.894%.  British government bonds ended slightly higher after a quiet session.  The Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 1/8 point to 115 15/32 to yield 9.65%, while the Treasury's 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 2/32 to par to yield 11.69%.  Municipals  A $450 million Texas note sale provided a spot of excitement in an otherwise quiet session.  Three underwriting accounts split the one-year notes.  A Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group won $200 million of the issue, a BT Securities Corp. group another $200 million and Dillon, Read & Co., bidding alone, $50 million.  The Merrill Lynch and BT Securities groups formally reoffered their 6 1/2% notes to investors to yield 6.20%, in line with market expectations.  Dillon Read didn't reoffer its share.  The notes held up well in the secondary market, where they were being offered at 6.20% late yesterday.  Texas officials were pleased with the outcome.  The net interest cost to the state was 6.27%, within the 6.20% to 6.30% range the issuer had expected, said Paul Williams, deputy treasurer.  Active municipal dollar bonds were mostly unchanged to 1/8 point higher.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was up 1/8 point at 97 3/4 bid late yesterday.  The yield was 7.37%, vs. about 7.39% late Wednesday.  Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority of New York's 7 1/8% issue due in 2019 was 1/8 point firmer at 97 1/8 bid, to yield 7.35%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  After light dealings, Ginnie Mae 9% securities ended at 96 26/32, unchanged; 9 1/2% securities at 98 7/8, unchanged; 10% securities at 101 2/32, up 2/32; and 10 1/2% securities at 103 4/32, up 4/32.  In derivative markets, the only issue priced was a $500 million Freddie Mac real estate mortgage investment conduit underwritten by Salomon Brothers Inc.  The 11-class issue is backed by 9 1/2% securities.  It's better than bagpipes.  That thought might be some consolation the next time you're standing in line at the supermarket and a man in a funny suit starts pulling coins out of your ear.  Please, don't blame that magician.  He's just doing his job, which is to entertain you while you shop -- or at least to put you in a better mood.  "Everybody knows if you get people in a better frame of mind, they're likely to buy more," says Robert Sandelman, who takes credit for the idea of stocking supermarket aisles with conjurers.  Mr. Sandelman's sales promotion agency, Robert Brian Associates Inc., hopes packaged-goods manufacturers and food store chains will sponsor magic acts to hand out coupons and samples.  Actually, the promotion, being tested in several East Coast stores, is a refinement of an earlier idea: televised stand-up comics.  Whether or not shoppers laughed at the jokes, the programming had to be canceled.  Cashiers were getting so distracted that they had trouble ringing up the correct totals.  But Mr. Sandelman has high hopes for his magician salesmen, and says the acts seem to be working.  He cites a survey conducted in a New York City store finding that 87% of its shoppers thought the magicians were a "good idea."  Naturally, there are some drawbacks.  For one thing, the acts -- not surprisingly -- draw a crowd.  And because most of the shows' curtain times coincide with stores' busiest hours, mainly Thursday nights and Saturday mornings, the area around the check-out aisles can get a little noisy, Mr. Sandelman says.  Nevertheless, he says, the shows mainly serve to alleviate tensions of shoppers waiting to pay for their groceries.  "These magicians make people laugh and applaud," he says.  "Imagine people laughing and applauding while they're waiting in line]"  Well, not everyone is ready to enjoy the old disappearing hankie while standing in the express lane.  Some people -- maybe they weren't in good moods to begin with -- just don't seem to like being greeted by a smiling face.  Mr. Sandelman says that in one supermarket, an elderly woman approached by a magician threw up her arms and yelled, "Get away from me or I'll beat you]"  Baseball Commissioner A. Bartlett Giamatti got his man.  Pete Rose salvaged some pride -- and at least a slim possibility of a future in baseball.  And Major League Baseball closed the books on an embarrassing episode.  But baseball's settlement with Mr. Rose, which called for banning him from the game for at least a year, carried a high price: Fans may never know definitively what Mr. Rose did and didn't do.  That's because the settlement in the gambling case, announced by Mr. Giamatti yesterday, doesn't compel Mr. Rose, baseball's all-time hit leader, to admit that he gambled on baseball.  And it doesn't compel him to seek counseling for his alleged gambling habit.  Indeed, using language similar to that in Securities and Exchange Commission consent decrees, the agreement states that Mr. Rose neither denies nor admits that he bet on any major league baseball game.  Mr. Giamatti, however, said he concluded Mr. Rose bet on baseball, including the team he managed, the Cincinnati Reds.  The high-profile sports case, coming on the heels of major settlements in Wall Street insider-trading suits, highlights the trade-off that's made whenever any two parties compromise rather than fight out their battle in court.  The case is resolved, but the facts remain uncertain and blame is never fully assigned.  Many lawyers insist that it's almost always better to settle a civil case rather than go to trial -- public sentiment notwithstanding.  And they back up their opinion with action: Nationally, more than 90% of all civil cases end in settlements.  In criminal cases last year in the Southern District of New York, 83% of the resolved cases were plea agreements.  "The parties have gone to court because they want resolution," says Bud Holman, who represented Union Carbide Corp. in the Bhopal, India, poison-gas case.  "So the sooner you get resolution, the better off both parties are.  And there's a public good in ending conflict and having resolution."  The advantages of settling are obvious: Both parties avoid the risk of a worse outcome if they leave the case to a judge or jury, they reduce their legal fees and they put the matter behind them.  In addition, sometimes they succeed in keeping confidential matters from the public, a factor that corporations often find compelling.  Says Stanley Chesley, a plaintiffs' lawyer in Cincinnati, "Litigation is not for the public.  It's for the parties.  The public interest in high-profile cases is still secondary to the client's interests.  And that's the hardest thing for the public to understand."  Yet some lawyers and legal scholars point out that, in addition to resolving disputes, the court system traditionally serves another function.  It provides a forum for fact-finding, through the laborious process of court-compelled discovery, that often sheds light on matters of public concern.  And it serves as a place where major public issues -- such as abortion, prayer in schools, responsibility for environmental cleanup and school desegregation -- are aired, debated and decided.  Some would argue that gambling in sports is another such issue.  "Broadly speaking, most run-of-the-mill cases should be settled," says public-interest litigator Rob Hager of Washington, D.C.  "There are other cases where you have questions of value, political principle, morality, such as Brown vs.  Board of Education. . . .  There's no way you can settle out these matters of principle."  Indeed, lawyers who bring cases involving constitutional issues generally won't settle.  "Essentially, in constitutional cases the objective of the defendant is to take some power away from the government which the government wants to take away from the individual or the entity," says James Goodale, former general counsel at the New York Times.  "When you settle, you always get half a loaf."  Constitutional issues tend to resurface, sometimes after many years and Mr. Goodale argues that a constitutional case is better off tried -- and lost -- than settled.  The case can be appealed "or when the next case comes along, you can always say it's different from the one you lost," he says.  In the Pentagon Papers case, in which the government tried to prevent the New York Times from printing excerpts from leaked documents, the Justice Department suggested a compromise whereby the paper would present the documents to the department and negotiate about what would be printed.  The Times rejected the proposal and won the case in the Supreme Court.  A settlement, says Mr. Goodale, "would have been terrible and I think that's true of any constitutional case."  More complicated are cases that raise important legal or policy questions but also have major financial consequences for both parties.  Whether to settle or to litigate in an effort to find the truth emerged as a major issue in the suit against Union Carbide over the Dec. 3, 1984, toxic-gas leak at a plant in Bhopal.  While Union Carbide pushed for settlement, some plaintiff groups vehemently opposed any resolution that failed to assess blame and add to the public's knowledge of the toxic effects of the gas that leaked from the pesticide plant.  Still pushing for the Indian Supreme Court to reject the current $470 million settlement plan and mandate a trial instead, Indian public-interest lawyer Indira Jaising says, "Without a trial, nobody will know why the accident occurred."  Union Carbide's lawyer, Mr. Holman, sees it differently, noting that a trial might produce mounds of evidence but possibly nothing so profound as the truth.  "After a trial, do you have absolute truth?  Only God knows if there is absolute truth, and God doesn't tell us."  Criminal cases provide different circumstances because the public has a keen interest in seeing justice done and innocent defendants are extremely reluctant to plead guilty.  But even in the criminal arena, there's a strong bias for settling.  Like most prosecutors, Benito Romano, U.S. Attorney for the Southern District of New York, sees no advantages to taking a case to trial if it can be settled.  In the case of former Goldman, Sachs & Co. arbitrager Robert Freeman, who will plead guilty to one count of mail fraud on Sept. 5, Mr. Romano says a public airing of the facts wasn't a consideration in his office's decision to settle the case.  Mr. Romano's goal, so long as a defendant acknowledges sufficient guilt, is to settle cases quickly so his troops can be deployed on other investigations.  "The public interest is vindicated when we, and the probation department and the sentencing court, in a public process, review openly the relevant facts in sentencing," he says.  Defense attorney Gary Naftalis understands the public's frustration with settlements, especially in high profile cases.  But Mr. Naftalis, who unsuccessfully defended E. Robert Wallach, former attorney to then-attorney general Edwin Meese, in his recent influence-peddling trial, said it doesn't make sense to go to trial "so the public's prurient interest is satisfied."  Stanley Arkin, another defense specialist -- who defended Richard Wigton, the Kidder Peabody Co. trader, against insider-trading charges that were recently dropped -- said that getting a case "off your balance sheet or out of your mind" is a good reason to settle a case if a client is guilty or likely to be found guilty.  In the Rose case, which didn't involve criminal charges, some observers considered the settlement terms surprising in that they didn't include any admission of wrongdoing or contrition on the part of Mr. Rose.  And, at a news conference yesterday, Mr. Rose said, "I didn't bet on baseball."  But others saw the banishment "for life" as significant, even though Mr. Rose can apply for reinstatement in a year.  "Giamatti has come out of it remarkably well.  He basically delivered a very tough reinforcement of the commissioner's powers," said Lee Eisenberg, a founder of Rotisserie League baseball, a simulated baseball league, and editor in chief of Esquire magazine.  The settlement prevented a hearing before Mr. Giamatti on the betting allegations.  Still, a great deal of information about Mr. Rose's alleged actions has already been revealed.  Notes Mr. Eisenberg, "In most cases, a settlement does deprive us of information, but in this case, I can't imagine that there's more that would come out."  The hearing before Mr. Giamatti wouldn't have been public, lawyers say.  It might, however, have produced information that could have been used against Mr. Rose in any possible criminal investigation of his conduct.  He still may face criminal tax-law violations.  Says Chicago litigator Don Reuben, "He doesn't want to go before Giamatti and have a transcript, with possible criminal charges that might be considered.  He needs that like a hole in the head."  ---  @ To Settle or Not to Settle . . .  @ Advantages of Settling  @ -- Avoids high cost of litigating.  @ -- Averts the risk of a worse outcome at trial.  @ -- Keeps the court system from clogging up.  @ Advantage of a trial  @ -- Offers opportunity for complete and public victory.  @ -- Allows facts to be uncovered that might benefit the  @ client and the public.  @ -- Makes an example of a wrongdoer.  Qintex Entertainment Inc., Beverly Hills, Calif., said that it amended the structure of its purchase of MGM/UA Communications Co.'s United Artists studio and related assets but that the new structure won't change the financial terms of the $600 million acquisition.  Under the plan, which Qintex said is designed to "expedite the closing" of the purchase and "provide a more financially efficient structure," MGM/UA will change its name to Qintex America Inc. and will be purchased by Qintex Media B.V., a unit of Australia-based Qintex Australia Ltd. that owns 44% of Qintex Entertainment.  Qintex Entertainment will then be merged with Qintex America, with Qintex America being the surviving, publicly traded company.  The acquisition is scheduled to be completed by Sept. 30.  Industry observers said the new structure was designed for tax purposes.  Qintex Entertainment expects to finance the acquisition with $500 million or more in equity from potential investors in the U.S., Japan, Europe and the U.K.  Medical Care International Inc., Dallas, said it agreed in principle to buy MediVision Inc. of Boston for $45 million in cash and stock.  Medical Care, which owns and operates outpatient surgical centers, said the acquisition will be about half in cash and half in stock.  Medical Care also will assume about $15 million in MediVision long-term debt.  MediVision owns and operates 14 ophthalmic surgical facilities and an equal number of ophthalmic clinics.  In 1988, the closely held company had revenue of $50 million and operating profit of $6.7 million.  The transaction, which is subject to several conditions, is scheduled to close by year's end.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Medical Care closed at $22.25, up $2.625.  Gulf Canada Resources Ltd. said it plans to sell its U.S. oil and gas subsidiary, Home Petroleum Corp., acquired late last year for 213 million Canadian dollars (US$181 million).  Gulf Canada said it hopes to sell the unit for about C$200 million, which will be used to reduce debt.  The Calgary, Alberta, company retained Goldman, Sachs & Co. to seek a buyer for the Denver-based unit.  Gulf Canada said Home Petroleum doesn't fit with its international business strategy of developing less mature petroleum assets in such places as Southeast Asia, North Africa and the North Sea.  At the end of 1988, Home Petroleum had gross proved reserves of 11 million barrels of crude oil and natural gas liquids and 106 billion cubic feet of natural gas, Gulf Canada said.  Gulf Canada is an oil and gas exploration and production company controlled by Olympia & York Developments Ltd., a real estate concern owned by the Reichmann family.  Enron Corp. said it will offer an approximately 10% stake in its Enron Oil & Gas Co. unit through a proposed initial public offering of about eight million common shares of the unit.  Last year Houston-based Enron said it would consider selling the oil and gas unit -- the nation's third largest independent energy company -- which is valued at about $2 billion.  But the receipt of unsatisfactory bids and a glut of properties on the market at that time led the company to change its mind.  Enron is a natural gas transmission concern.  Underwriters for the offering, First Boston Corp., Goldman, Sachs & Co., and Prudential-Bache Capital Funding, have been granted an over-allotment option for about 1.2 million shares.  Enron will retain an 87% or 88% stake in the unit.  Net proceeds of between $115 million and $130 million will be used to repay advances from the parent company.  Action Auto Stores Inc., Flint, Mich., said it agreed to sell 13 of its Michigan auto parts stores to One Liberty Properties Inc., New York, for $9 million.  The auto parts and repair retailer said it will lease the stores for 18 years with two 11-year options.  The transaction, subject to the signing of a definitive agreement and approval by Action Auto's board, marks the third sale and lease-back agreement in a program undertaken by Action Auto this year.  Officials said the deals will raise $25 million, which the company will put toward expansion plans.  ChemDesign Corp., Fitchburg, Mass., said it agreed to increase production of an agricultural chemical for one of its major customers.  The company declined, for proprietary reasons, to identify either the product or the customer.  Under the agreement, ChemDesign will produce more than $20 million of the product over three years.  ChemDesign also said the customer may extend the initial three-year agreement.  Terms called for the customer to finance most of the modifications in ChemDesign's Fitchburg production facility to handle the production increase.  SunGard Data Systems Inc. said it agreed in principle to acquire Dyatron Corp., a Birmingham, Ala., computer services company, in an exchange of stock valued at about $55 million.  Dyatron, a provider of investment management systems, had revenue of $22.3 million and net income of $1.7 million in the first half.  SunGard, based in Wayne, Pa., also provides investment management systems, including shareholder accounting, portfolio management, trust accounting and employee-benefit reporting.  Under the agreement, which must be approved by shareholders of both companies, Dyatron holders would receive about one share of newly issued SunGard common for each common share of Dyatron owned.  Dyatron has about 3.1 million shares outstanding.  If those shares were converted into SunGard stock, the merged company would have about 14 million shares outstanding.  fenced off, under guard, studded with granite warning signs in seven languages to keep people off for 10,000 years.  Scientists are contemplating the possibility of such an eerie future for some of the most contaminated outposts of the nation's nuclear-weapons plants -- those that prove too costly, too dangerous or too impossible to clean up.  As taxpayers begin to spend amounts equaling or exceeding the savings-and-loan bailout, there's a creeping acknowledgment that all the money in the world can't eradicate the nation's nuclear nightmare.  "There may be a few sites where the best thing to do is to leave them right there so you don't just create more problems," says Sen. John Glenn (D., Ohio), though he says "most of the places won't be that way."  The blight was born partly of ignorance of radiation's hazards -- for example, in an experiment the government once deliberately released a huge cloud of radioactive gas in Washington state -- and arrogance.  The government and its contractors operated in secrecy and gave little regard to the effects on human health or the environment as they pressed ahead with bomb production.  The problems began long before Ronald Reagan became president, but they worsened under his laissez-faire style of governing.  The result: an atomic legacy of crippled reactors and contaminated soil and groundwater at 17 major sites in 12 states that will cost scores of billions to repair.  The Congressional Budget Office indicates that the cost of cleaning up the weapons plants and bringing them into compliance with safety and environmental laws could total $100 billion to $150 billion; by comparison, it puts the government's cost of the S&L bailout at more than $100 billion.  The weapons-plant cleanup "is every bit as bad as the S&L crisis, if not worse, in terms of dollars," says Rep. Les AuCoin (D., Ore.).  "In terms of safety, it's in an orbit of its own."  Just as the Reagan administration escaped the big cost of rescuing the sick savings-and-loan industry, the Bush administration will avoid -- in a first term, at least -- the really big bills for removing the decades of radioactive and hazardous wastes at the weapons plants.  It will take time to gear up once a cleanup plan is in place, and the costs will be spread over 20 to 50 years.  Outlays might not hit a peak until fiscal 1995, when spending for building two proposed tritium reactors hits a high just at the start of the cleanup program's fastest growth.  Still, paying for this enormous task is likely to be politically divisive even in the early stages.  The biggest issue will be where to get the money in an era of tight budgets; the biggest battle over whether to raid the Pentagon budget.  "The {political} left will argue to take it from defense.  And the right will say, if you can't find another source, don't do it," says Rep. John Spratt (D., S.C.), who heads a special congressional panel studying problems at the nuclear-weapons plants.  Already liberals have won a small battle: The House cut money from the Strategic Defense Initiative while authorizing an extra $300 million for cleaning up the nuclear defense-production complex, which is run by the Energy Department.  "The public expects the people who have been engineering this arms race we've been in for the last 40 years to clean up after themselves and to find room in the budget so that it can be done," says Rep. AuCoin.  But the Pentagon and its backers will fight fiercely to prevent its programs from being drained for a problem it wants the country to finance elsewhere.  Conservatives are sure to insist that cleaning up the weapons plants not be allowed to threaten U.S. military capabilities.  Sen. Strom Thurmond (R., S.C.) says, "Our top priority must be to keep our nation prepared militarily.  However, we must also include a reasonable amount of funds for environmental cleanup each year until the job is complete."  But how much is a "reasonable amount" is sure to be controversial down the road.  The dilemma for Mr. Bush will be how to look tough on defense spending while living up to his promise to be the environmental president.  The first real test of White House and congressional commitment to cleaning up the nation's atomic legacy will likely come next year when Congress starts debating whether to build a second reactor to produce tritium, a perishable radioactive gas that enhances the power of nuclear bombs.  It's generally agreed that the Energy Department sorely needs one reactor to replace its aging and crippled tritium reactors at Savannah River, S.C.  But many view a second reactor as a luxury, and foresee a test of whether bomb production will win out over bomb cleanup.  Then again, the second reactor can't be easily cut.  It's slated for Idaho, home of Sen. James McClure, the ranking Republican on the Energy and Natural Resources Committee.  The prevailing view is that the total bill for the weapons-plant cleanup will go higher than current projections.  Energy Secretary James Watkins contends the work can be done for less as new technology is discovered.  But even if he's rightand many lawmakers are skeptical -- that won't happen in time to help this administration.  Most policy makers still find it too politically uncomfortable to discuss the cleanup endeavors that the nation may not be able to afford.  The debate, for example, is still years away on whether it's worth an estimated $11 billion to exhume, for long-term burial elsewhere, high-level radioactive wastes in 149 underground tanks at the Hanford reservation in Washington state.  And at an Idaho Falls nuclear lab site, a witches' brew of radioactive and toxic chemicals is spread in burial pits over 1,200 acres, making exhumation or treatment infeasible.  And how do you coax a long-term cleanup commitment out of a Congress that typically thinks one year at a time?  The Senate recently voted to establish a blue-ribbon task group to recommend ways to improve the cleanup effort and to meet the long-term funding needs, among other things.  An increasingly popular option to be considered is a trust fund that would use a dedicated chunk of tax dollars to finance the effort.  But given what many lawmakers consider the government's poor track record in running the plants, some in Congress are calling for added outside supervision to make sure the Energy Department doesn't slip into its old ways.  "Adm.  Watkins is changing things that should have been changed a long time ago," says Sen. Glenn.  "But he's not going to be there forever."  The nostalgia that is fueling comeback tours for rock bands such as the Who and Jefferson Airplane and piling up ratings points for "The Wonder Years" has brought back something else: old commercials.  At least four big advertisers have revived what they call "classic" commercials -- that's reruns to you and me.  And more advertisers are considering doing the same, either by using snippets of old ads or by rerunning the commercials in full.  Most of the spots date from the 1950s or 1960s and look absolutely goofy today; the advertisers using them say they're ideal as campy attention-getters.  The ads are supposed to appeal both to baby-boomer parents and their kids.  They reflect the ad world's discovery that advertising, much like "Leave It to Beaver," is part of the nation's collective memory -- and that that makes old ads one powerful mass-marketing tool.  Sunkist Growers Inc., for example, is reviving animated spots dating from the 1960s featuring Ralph the green monster; the spots began airing this week on Nick at Nite, part of Viacom's MTV Networks.  "The commercials appeal to kids -- yet the parents will remember them as they did when they were kids, so you wind up with a double-barreled approach," says Ray Cole, Sunkist's director of marketing services.  Advertisers on the major networks haven't started airing old commercials in full, but some are splicing bits of their golden oldies into current spots.  A recent Goodyear spot for the tire company's 90th anniversary sale, for example, used MTV-style cuts of old Goodyear commercials dating back to the late 1940s, including one peculiar scene featuring men in business suits trudging down a street with tires draped over their shoulders.  The old footage "is appealing to a generation of people who have been raised on TV," says James K. DeVoe, Goodyear's vice president of advertising.  A new spot for Procter & Gamble's Crest Sparkle toothpaste for kids mixes animation and computer graphics with black-and-white clips of Crest commercials from the 1950s.  In between quick cuts of cartoon "sparkles" and funky graphics, there's Junior brushing his teeth, and of course, toothy sis saying, "Look, Mom, fights cavities]" (In the original she said, "Look, Mom, no cavities]," but that had to be dubbed out because the claim is no longer permitted.)  The old footage looks funky to kids born in, say, 1982.  But for mom and dad, the old commercial scenes can bring back warm and fuzzy memories of childhood, and fit right in with the nostalgia wave sweeping the country, suggests Kenneth Charof, senior vice president of Crest's ad agency, D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles.  "The simpler message, the nicer and sweeter message, seems to be something that people are going back to," he says.  Plenty of advertisers are trying to cash in on the buying public's nostalgia, with blue jeans ads harking back to fin-tailed Buicks and wine ads talking wistfully about Woodstock.  But products that have been around for a while are realizing they don't have to spend money to create nostalgia; they can simply dip into their advertising vault and do it on the cheap.  Clearly leading the "classic" commercial charge is the Nick at Nite network, the nighttime version of Nickelodeon that revels in creaky reruns of "The Donna Reed Show" and "Father Knows Best."  Both Sunkist and Oscar Mayer are running old commercials on the network, and Rich Cronin, director of marketing at Nickelodeon/Nick at Nite, says he expects that number to grow to at least a dozen advertisers by the end of next year.  Nick at Nite is also planning a "classic commercial week," during which every commercial that runs will be an oldie, he says.  Indeed, the network has judged baby-boomer interest in old commercials to be so high that last weekend it aired a special, "We'll Be Right Back," devoted completely to old commercials.  Among the highlights: a psychedelic Frigidaire refrigerator ad from 1968 and a very young Mike Wallace touting Procter & Gamble's Golden Fluffo, "a sensational shortening discovery]"  Brad Flatoff, senior product manager for Philip Morris's Oscar Mayer unit, says the cold cuts company decided to resurrect old ads on Nick at Nite because the ads were "the same era" as the network's reruns.  The ads have been so popular, he says, that the company has gotten letters from customers "saying thank you for bringing back memories."  The most popular spot, he says, was a 1963 animated ad in which cartoon kids march down the sidewalk singing, "Oh, I'd love to be an Oscar Mayer wiener. . . ."  You know the rest.  Certainly, bringing back old ads doesn't work for every product; advertisers who have tried it say they were careful to make sure old messages didn't contradict current marketing campaigns.  Another problem is that using old ads means tracking down the original talent in order to pay out residuals; Sunkist couldn't find them all, so ended up re-recording some cartoon voices and setting up a trust fund just in case other lost talent resurfaced.  Perhaps the biggest drawback, though, will come if too many other advertisers jump on the nostalgia bandwagon.  Says Goodyear's Mr. DeVoe: "If everybody starts doing it, it won't stand out from the clutter -- because it will become the clutter."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Hilton Hotels Corp., Beverly Hills, Calif., awarded its estimated $4 million Flamingo Hilton hotels account to McCann-Erickson, Los Angeles.  McCann-Erickson, a unit of Interpublic Group, has handled the national Hilton Hotels account since 1967.  It's different this time.  But there are some disquieting similarities.  When the Dow Jones Industrial Average established its previous record close of 2722.42 two years ago today, investors were lusting after stocks.  Reflecting the torrid optimism, price-earnings ratios (stock prices divided by companies' earnings per share) were extraordinarily high, at more than 21 for the 30 stocks in the industrial average.  Ominously, interest rates were on the rise.  Those problems, which led to a slide of nearly 1,000 points in the industrial average, have disappeared now.  Today, the biggest threat is a possible recession -- something that few people worried about in mid-1987.  But some investment pros, especially those who use gauges other than P-E ratios, say that stock prices are again unusually high -- and may be riding for a fall.  Market bulls prefer to dwell on the differences from 1987, which are clear and easy to spot.  For the past few months, the trend in interest rates has been downward.  Investors may be bullish, but they're not snorting wildly.  And P-E ratios are sane at around 12.  The market "doesn't look quite as reckless now as it did two years ago," says Nobel Prize-winning economist John Kenneth Galbraith.  "There's somewhat less speculation now."  Even so, Mr. Galbraith, who teaches economics at Harvard University, says, "the market may be ahead of the economy."  Today's subdued P-E ratios are one reason Elaine Garzarelli, the Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. technical analyst who advised investors to put most of their money into cash before the 1987 crash, considers the market reasonably valued now.  In fact, she says, at today's interest rates, the industrial average could reasonably be at 2850 to 3000 -- and she predicts it will reach that level within a couple of months.  Frank Curzio, a newsletter writer in New York who actually predicted the 1987 crash, is delighted with today's interest-rate picture.  "Interest rates are decreasing.  That's the No. 1 fundamental I'm interested in," says Mr. Curzio.  "Now, we only have inflation of about 5%, so I don't think the Fed has to kill the economy to get us to cool down."  As a result, Mr. Curzio says the industrial average could rise to 4000 or more by 1992 -- but only if inflation stays at about 5% or less.  But despite all the differences, the market -- which yesterday saw a new closing high on the industrial average of 2734.64 -- does resemble the market of two years ago in some subtler ways.  For one thing, even though investors may worry more than they did in 1987, most still seem persuaded that the underlying trend is upward.  "To me it looks like August 1987 all over again," says Ben Garside, editor of Garside Forecast, a newsletter published in Irvine, Calif.  "The thing I look for at a market high point is longterm bullish attitudes."  Typically at market tops, Mr. Garside says, people say they expect a correction but then expect the upward journey to resume.  That's just what people were saying in 1987, he says, and it's what they're saying today.  Moreover, some measures other than PE ratios show stocks as expensive, not cheap.  Today's moderate P-E ratios are no comfort to James Stack, editor of InvesTech Market Analyst in Whitefish, Mont.  "Earnings are the most volatile" element of corporate performance, he says.  They jump rapidly in good times but can plummet just as quickly in recessions.  For that reason, Mr. Stack likes to look at other measures to determine whether stocks are overvalued or undervalued.  Two of these compare stock prices with dividends and with book value (companies' assets minus liabilities).  By both of those measures, he says, the stock market is nearly as overvalued now as it was in 1987 -- and in 1929.  Mr. Stack's advice to the average investor: "Protect your past gains" by selling enough stocks to raise a large cash reserve, say 50% or so of portfolio value.  Another way of measuring how expensive stocks are getting is a ratio of stock prices to company sales per share.  According to Kenneth Fisher, a money manager in Woodside, Calif., who popularized this gauge, today's price-sales ratio is only slightly below that of 1987.  All this, say the bears, means that stocks are on the edge of a cliff.  A recession could shove them off, says economist A. Gary Shilling, president of A. Gary Shilling & Co. in New York.  He says he thinks the U.S. is entering a recession now and that other countries will follow in six to nine months.  To maintain their earnings, companies need economic growth of at least 3% a year, Mr. Shilling says.  If he's right about the severity and breadth of a coming recession, he says, "I think we could test the crash lows."  ---  @ Then Vs.  Now  @ Pulse of the Market  @ Six-month change in Dow Jones Industrial Average:  @ 1989: 19.4%  @ 1987: 22.3%  @ Hottest stock groups (six month change):  1989: Lodging +62%, Airlines +52%, Home construction +39%  1987: Mining +75%, Precious metals +56, Steel +51%  @ Coldest stock groups (six-month change):  1989: Computers -8%, Precious metals -7% Mining -3%  1987: Medical & biotechnology -11%, Electric utilities -8%, Savings & Loans -6%  Sources: Dow Jones & Co., Fisher Investments, U.S. Department of Labor  Jose Enrique Menendez was building his dream house, an 8,000-square-foot palace with an elaborate security system on 15 acres along a scenic stretch of Mulholland Drive.  But the project was taking so long that he joked that it would never be finished.  In the meantime, Mr. Menendez snapped up a $4 million Beverly Hills mansion, with six bedrooms, six baths and a tennis court.  There, the Cuban-born executive, the chairman and chief executive of Live Entertainment Inc., lived with his wife, Kitty, and two sons, 21-year-old Lyle and 18-year-old Eric.  To help decorate, Kitty bought a Frederic Remington sculpture of a horse bucking a cowboy.  "It was one big happy family," says John E. Mason, a friend and a Live Entertainment director.  Then, late Sunday evening, the couple were found riddled with bullets in the family's den.  There was no sign of burglary.  Instead, say people familiar with the investigation, it appears that two assailants walked into the home and opened fire.  The murder sent shock waves through Hollywood and through Carolco Pictures Inc., the movie production company that helped to build Live Entertainment and owns 49% of it.  No reason has emerged why anyone would murder Mr. Menendez, a hard-driving but well-respected entertainment executive, or his wife.  But given the brutality of the crime -- a coroner's investigator called it a hit -- questions have arisen about a possible organized-crime connection to the murders.  Investigators are tight-lipped, so any such connection remains a matter of conjecture.  Nevertheless, there is material to fuel such speculation, and there are other mysterious circumstances surrounding the strange case as well.  To begin with, Live Entertainment, a publicly held audio and video distributor and retailer, had just completed the purchase of a company that allegedly had ties to organized-crime figures.  Three years ago, Carolco bought one of Live's divisions from another man with reputed organized-crime links.  And in what may only be a strange coincidence, full-page ads ran in Sunday papers in Los Angeles and New York announcing the opening of "Wired," a controversial film about the late comedian and drug-user John Belushi.  Its producers claim powerful Hollywood executives have tried to prevent the film from opening.  Live Entertainment had bought the home video rights and made a $4 million advance on the video contract, which helped fund distribution costs.  But the day after the killing, several theater chains canceled commitments to show the picture in Los Angeles and New York.  A spokesman for Taurus Entertainment Co., the distributor, explains that "it was a bizarre situation.  The usual support didn't materialize."  The theaters didn't give any reason for the cancellations, he says.  To compound the confusion, Carolco confirmed on the day after the killings that Andrew Vajna, one of its co-chairmen, was negotiating the sale of his 36% stake to Mario Kassar, the other co-chairman, for about $110 million after a 13-year partnership.  One official close to the company says Mr. Vajna is going through a divorce and wants to spend more time in his native Hungary, but a company spokesman also says the divorce isn't a significant factor.  Neither Mr. Vajna nor Mr. Kassar has been available for comment.  The events have focused attention on Carolco, a New York Stock Exchange company, and the manner in which it built itself.  Live Entertainment is a firm that was pieced together by Peter Hoffman, Carolco's president and chief executive, and by Mr. Menendez.  Under Mr. Menendez's reign Live Entertainment grew swiftly, leading some analysts to call it Carolco's most valuable asset.  Mr. Hoffman said Monday that the crime "won't affect us" as a company.  "It's awful.  It's a terrible loss.  But we'll get through it."  Officials of Live Entertainment and friends of Mr. Menendez have repeatedly dismissed the possibility that the deaths may have been related to any brush with organized crime.  The suggestion is "bizarre and offensive," Roger R. Smith, Live's acting president, said on Monday.  The murders, he added, were "in the category of meaningless, unexplained things.  We may find out they had the wrong house."  But a close look at the evolution of Carolco and Live Entertainment uncovers some troubling coincidences.  Carolco was founded in 1976 by Messrs.  Vajna and Kassar, two foreign-film distributors.  The company hit the jackpot after helping to finance "Rambo, First Blood, Part II" and it went public three years ago, becoming known for macho action films such as "Red Heat" and "Rambo III."  The duo hired Mr. Hoffman, a tax attorney, to run the company.  As part of an effort to diversify, Carolco acquired International Video Entertainment Inc., an ailing distributor of home videos, in a series of transactions beginning in 1986.  International Video was owned by Noel C. Bloom.  Mr. Bloom was identified in a 1986 report on organized crime by the California Attorney's General Office as a "major distributor of X-rated movies" and a "former associate of the late Michael Zaffarano of the Bonanno" organized-crime family.  The report also said Mr. Bloom was thought to have received his start in pornography with financial help from another figure connected to organized crime.  Mr. Bloom stayed on at the company as president for 90 to 120 days, according to Mr. Mason.  Mr. Bloom declines to comment.  An attorney for him says "I've only known him as a reputable" video distributor.  In 1987, Mr. Bloom filed suit in Los Angeles superior court alleging that International Video and Carolco had failed to pay him $500,000 due under the sale agreement.  The companies countersued, claiming, among other things, that Mr. Bloom had overstated the value of International Video.  Last year, a referee agreed upon by the two sides found in Mr. Bloom's favor.  Carolco and International Video are appealing that decision.  Mr. Hoffman brought in Mr. Menendez to run the video company after the two were introduced by a mutual friend, Mr. Mason.  Mr. Menendez was a former Coopers & Lybrand CPA who later spent 14 years working at RCA Corp., first at its Hertz subsidiary and then at its record division.  He was upset after another person was brought in to be a senior executive in the record division, Mr. Mason says.  Several friends describe Mr. Menendez, who was 45, as "a straight arrow" who rarely drank and was close to his family.  "In an industry that is prone to excess, he was prone to the straight line," says Ralph King, a close friend and an executive at Enigma Entertainment Corp.  "He was always alert and aware.  He chose not to cloud his vision and judgment."  Mr. Menendez, he says, was "very friendly, very outgoing, very warm and very much a gentleman."  His passion evidently was business.  "He was by far the brightest, toughest businessman I have ever worked with.  He was extremely well-read.  He was always ahead of his competition," says Mr. King, who is also a former executive of International Video.  "Business was a major part of his life."  Live Entertainment officials say Mr. Menendez turned the company around, partly by aggressively pursuing video distribution deals with independent producers.  In early 1988, International Video merged with Lieberman Enterprises Inc., a Minneapolis distributor of recorded music and videocassettes, to become Live Entertainment.  The combined company's earnings soared.  So did its stock price, drawing attention from Wall Street.  Early on, International Video arranged to have much of its distribution of videocassettes handled by a unit of MCA Inc., one of Hollywood's biggest entertainment conglomerates.  MCA -- which has gotten adverse publicity itself in the past year because of dealings with alleged organized-crime figures -- also made a $15 million loan to International Video.  The distribution agreement is due to expire early next year, and International Video has said it might not renew the contract.  For a time, International Video also manufactured videocassettes for the MCA Home Entertainment Group.  "They {Live Entertainment's people} seemed to be making all the right moves," says Andre Blay, an independent producer.  "They were well regarded.  They paid their bills on time and were tough negotiators.  When a deal was struck it was honored.  They were on a roll."  Then in June, Live Entertainment completed its acquisition of BeckZack Corp., which owns the 81-store Strawberries audio and home-video retailing chain in the Northeast.  BeckZack's principal shareholder was Morris Levy, a man who was convicted in May 1988 of conspiring to extort payments from a record wholesaler.  He remains free pending an appeal of his conviction.  An FBI affidavit filed in federal court in New York in connection with an investigation of Mr. Levy quoted an unnamed federal informant as saying that a faction of the Genovese crime family owned an interest in the Strawberries chain.  The affidavit also called Mr. Levy "a lucrative source of cash and property for leaders of the Genovese" crime family.  The assistant U.S. Attorney who handled the Levy prosecution says he can't comment beyond the affidavit.  A lawyer for Mr. Levy denies that his client has any connection with organized crime or knows anything about the Menendez murders.  Live's Mr. Smith says the company spent six months in an exhaustive process of due dilligence before completing the purchase of BeckZack for $40.5 million.  "We engaged lawyers who specialized in white-collar criminal areas.  We found the operation of Strawberries to be whistle clean," Mr. Smith says.  Mr. Levy owned a 90% stake in the company, according to Mr. Smith.  He declines to identify the other owners but insists none of them have any organized-crime ties.  "There was no reason for any suspicion about any of them," Mr. Smithsays.  Mr. Mason, the director, says, "We paid more than a fair price.  It was legitimate.  It was well negotiated.  There wasn't acrimony."  Friends insist Mr. Menedez didn't face any significant business conflicts and didn't have any known enemies.  The company provided Mr. Menendez with two life insurance policies.  One was a $5 million personal life insurance policy, the beneficiaries of which couldn't immediately be learned.  The other was a $15 million keyman life insurance policy the company held.  The Menendez family moved to Beverly Hills last fall from a rented home in Calabassas.  Friends of the family say Eric Menendez had received threats from gang members in Calabassas after he intervened in a fight after a high-school tennis match.  Friends say the family received some threatening phone calls after the incident, and at one point one of its cars was painted and a tire was slashed.  However, they say the threats weren't related to the move to Beverly Hills.  Carolco now is moving quickly to limit the damage to Live Entertainment.  Mr. Hoffman has been named acting chairman and Mr. Smith acting president.  Mr. Menendez had named well-regarded executives to head two of the company's divisions, and some analysts think the company will continue to grow, albeit more slowly.  Live's shares fell about $2.50 after the killings but have stabilized, closing yesterday in over-the-counter trading at $18 a share each, up 37 1/2 cents.  The upheavals come at a time when Carolco has been raising the number of films it has in production.  The company has also been aggressively pursuing acquisitions.  It has been involved in a bitter bidding contest with Italian financier Giancarlo Parretti for the assets of troubled De Laurentiis Entertainment Group, a company that has filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the bankruptcy laws.  Hollywood executives and agents say Carolco has prospered despite turning out a number of pictures that have been box-office and critical disappointments in the U.S., such as "DeepStar Six."  The company's strong suit has been its overseas sales of theatrical and video distribution rights.  "Our strength is finance and sales," says Mr. Hoffman.  Its weakness, he adds, is that it "needs to be better at the institutional process of making movies." (Carolco earned $35 million last year on $164 million in revenue; its stock closed yesterday at $9.50, up 12 1/2 cents.)  Carolco has become known for its largess and its snap decision-making.  Hollywood agents say Carolco frequently makes a hefty offer for a movie deal and then gives agents just one hour or so to take it or leave it.  "We pay more than other people in town," says Mr. Hoffman.  "One thing you never do is leave an offer on the table and let others take potshots at it."  And the company has maintained an image of prosperity.  Messrs.  Vajna and Kassar fly in a private Bac-III jet and drive Rolls-Royces provided by the company.  A filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission shows that the company paid $598,412 in security services for Messrs.  Kassar and Vanja.  The security payments started, according to Mr. Hoffman, when the company produced "Rambo III."  Texas Air Corp. Chairman Frank Lorenzo said the company is considering whether to sell a stake in Continental Airlines, which is its primary operating unit and the nation's fifth-largest airline.  Mr. Lorenzo told a company management conference that Texas Air has had "discussions with parties who have expressed an interest in Continental."  He added that Texas Air "may consider sale of a minority or controlling position."  Mr. Lorenzo made his remarks in response to a question, according to a terse company announcement.  The statement gave no indication of who the interested parties might be, whether they are individuals or corporate investors, and who initiated the talks.  A Texas Air spokesman didn't return phone calls.  The disclosure follows more than three weeks of Wall Street rumors that Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. was out actively trying to measure potential buyer interest in Continental.  In that time span, Texas Air's chronically sluggish stock price jumped nearly a third to close Wednesday at $20.25 a share in American Stock Exchange composite trading, although it fell to $20 yesterday.  In its statement last night, Texas Air confirmed that it has retained Drexel as its investment banker in the matter.  Mr. Lorenzo's comments come at a time of frenzied activity in airline stocks.  An investment group led by Alfred Checchi broke the ice with a $3.5 billion buy-out of NWA Inc. completed last month.  Then, this month, investor Marvin Davis's $6.19 billion bid for UAL Corp., United Airlines' parent, sent most airline stocks flying.  The sudden interest in airlines reflects the emergence of an oligopoly of dominant carriers that many analysts believe will send profits of those survivors into a long climb.  With less competition, "carriers will have a more stable and profitable financial environment than they've had in the past," said consultant George James of Airline Economics Inc. Also, the theory goes, airlines harbor valuable assets, including undervalued real estate, muchsought landing slots and gate facilities, and readily saleable aircraft.  There's some question, however, about how closely Texas Air's Continental unit resembles that profile and thus what kind of price a piece of it might fetch.  Although its 1988 revenue of $4.7 billion makes it slightly smaller than NWA, it is unlikely to be worth the more than $3 billion that carrier just sold for.  Continental has managed only two profitable quarters during the industry's earnings boom of the last 18 months or so.  It is also laden with $2.43 billion of debt.  Reflecting its skimpy profits and huge debt load, it was slow to join the industry trend toward ordering new, efficient aircraft.  While rivals have elbowed their way onto aircraft makers' order books with more than 1,500 orders over the past year, Continental placed its first major order for 60 planes only last month.  Also, Continental doesn't own big numbers of aircraft outright that could be refinanced in sale-leaseback transactions to generate cash.  And it is unclear what effect Continental's intricate financial links with Texas Air and its close association with ailing Eastern Airlines would have on the value of Continental.  There's also some question about Mr. Lorenzo's appetite for selling.  In last night's statement, he said, "While there are some arguments in favor of seeing Continental emerge with new ownership, such as giving the company access to stronger financial or marketplace resources, there are also a number of compelling reasons why a sale of the company may not be advisable."  The main reason not to sell, he said, was that after several years of major losses, Continental "shows real potential for improved financial results."  Continental ran a deficit of $330 million in 1987 and $315 million in 1988.  One potential investor might be Scandinavian Airlines Systems, which already owns 10% of Texas Air.  Many foreign airlines are seeking alliances with U.S. airlines so that they can feed their schedules after European market barriers come down in 1992.  However, foreign carriers can't own more than 25% of a U.S. airline under current regulations.  ---  Randall Smith in New York contributed to this article.  Bell Atlantic Corp. and the Communications Workers of America said they were nearing agreement on matters of local concern that could end the 2 1/2-week strike.  The company, meanwhile, resumed negotiations yesterday with the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers in New Jersey.  "We're hopeful that an agreement can be reached soon," a company spokesman said.  However, he said the IBEW submitted a counterproposal that leaves the two sides far apart on all major issues.  The two sides were scheduled to meet again today.  The CWA reached tentative agreement with the company over local issues for Bell Atlantic phone companies in New Jersey, Maryland, Washington, D.C., Virginia and West Virginia.  But union officials said they were "dismayed by the retrogressive demands still on the table" in Pennsylvania and Delaware.  A union spokesman said those demands included the union giving up certain arbitration cases that were decided in its favor.  The spokesman for Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic, however, said the company believes "significant progress is being made."  CWA, which represents some 41,000 Bell Atlantic workers, agreed last week to a tentative pact covering major issues such as wages and benefits for all Bell Atlantic phone companies.  At Chicago-based Ameritech, talks with the CWA resumed yesterday and were expected to continue today.  The union represents some 40,000 workers at the company's five telephone operating companies.  No progress was reported at New York-based Nynex Corp., where the company and the CWA had only one brief meeting since the strike began Aug. 6.  The CWA represents about 40,000 Nynex workers and the IBEW, which is also on strike, represents 20,000.  A painkilling drug holds promise of relieving an addiction to cocaine, drug-abuse researchers said.  The drug, buprenorphine, successfully suppressed the craving for cocaine among monkey addicts.  This fall the drug will be tested on human addicts.  The trials will be carried out by the federal National Institute on Drug Abuse, or NIDA, because the Procter & Gamble Co. subsidiary that produces the drug in the U.S. has shown little interest in developing it for the treatment of narcotics addiction, a NIDA official said.  Buprenorphine already is known to suppress the craving for heroin in human addicts as well as to block the euphoric effects of heroin.  Thus, researchers said, the painkiller might be an effective treatment for people addicted to both heroin and cocaine as well as to one or the other.  The painkiller works in an unusual way: doses large enough to produce a "high" cancel out any euphoric effects the painkiller might have.  Thus, the researchers said, buprenorphine isn't likely to be a substitute addiction for cocaine in the way that methadone is a substitute addiction for heroin.  The painkiller, used largely in surgery, is sold in the U.S. under the brand name, Buprenex, by Norwich Eaton Pharmaceuticals Inc., a Norwich, N.Y.-based subsidiary of Procter & Gamble.  Norwich was licensed to produce it by Reckitt & Colman, an English drug maker.  It is available only by prescription and only in the injectable form.  A method of administering it by a lozenge that dissolves in the mouth is being developed, a Norwich spokeswoman said.  The spokeswoman said Norwich had discussed with NIDA testing buprenorphine for narcotics addiction but decided it didn't have the resources to carry out such development.  In Bethesda, Md., Marvin Snyder, director of NIDA's new medications development program, said buprenorphine is one of the first medications to be tested under a federal program in which NIDA will do the initial clinical studies of a commercial medication's use in treating drug abuse.  The institute then will seek a pharmaceutical company to market the medication after the government has done most of the development work.  The program was launched because pharmaceutical companies didn't want to develop medications for treating drug abuse, Dr. Snyder said.  "The companies don't want their product lines associated with junkies, and they say there are liability problems," he said.  Buprenorphine's effects in relieving cocaine addiction was reported by researchers at the Alcohol and Drug Abuse Research Center at the Harvard Medical School-McLean Hospital in Belmont, Mass.  They report their findings in this week's issue of the journal, Science.  The Harvard scientists said they had tested buprenorphine on five rhesus monkeys who were addicted to cocaine for six months to a year.  The monkeys were able to self-administer shots of cocaine at certain times of the day by pressing levers in their cages.  Before the monkeys were given buprenorphine, they were "shooting up" an average of about three milligrams of cocaine per kilogram of body weight each day.  This, for a monkey, is about equal to what the average human cocaine abuser uses, the researchers said.  On the first day that the monkeys were given a single shot of buprenorphine at 9:30 a.m., four of the five monkeys cut their cocaine use 50%, the researchers said.  Within two weeks after beginning daily buprenorphine injections, the monkeys' average cocaine usage was down 83%, to 0.98 milligrams per kilogram of body weight, they said.  The daily dose of buprenorphine was then increased.  At the higher dosages, the animals' cocaine use dropped 97% to an average 0.19 milligrams per kilogram of weight.  The effect lasted for about two weeks after buprenorphine injections were stopped.  "These preclinical data suggest that buprenorphine may be an effective pharmacotherapy for cocaine abuse," according to the report by Nancy K. Mello, Jack H. Mendelson, Mark P. Bree and Scott E. Lukas.  The researchers had tested buprenorphine in human heroin addicts and found it had two distinct effects.  It suppressed the craving for heroin and it blocked the euphoric effects of the narcotic.  Dr. Mendelson said the buprenorphine molecule has two parts.  One part stimulates the same cell receptors as the opiate narcotics like heroin; at low doses buprenorphine produces a pleasant feeling but not a euphoric "high."  A second part of the molecule, however, blocks these opiate receptors, preventing the narcotic from having its euphoric effects.  This blocking effect is minor at low dosages but as the user increases the dosage of buprenorphine the blocking effect becomes stronger.  As a result, the addict doesn't get a "high" by increasing the dosage of buprenorphine and, thus, it can't become a "substitute addiction."  The pleasant feeling at low doses makes buprenorphine acceptable to heroin addicts, the researchers said.  They added that it is safer than methadone because the blocking action prevents the addict from taking a lethal overdose.  The researchers said they didn't yet know why buprenorphine suppressed the desire for cocaine.  Cocaine is a stimulant rather than an opiate and works on a different part of the nervous system than does heroin.  The fact that the painkiller affects the use of both cocaine and heroin suggests an interaction between the two parts of the nervous system, the researchers added.  Prime Computer Inc., Natick, Mass., said that based on an unofficial count of proxy votes at its annual meeting, its incumbent board appears to have been re-elected.  After the meeting, Prime said the board elected the nominees of J.H. Whitney & Co. as directors and then resigned, with the exception of John S. Dulaney.  Prime said Mr. Dulaney, a director for 16 years, will remain on the board until Whitney's acquisition of Prime is completed.  About 91% of Prime's fully diluted shares have been tendered to Whitney under its $20-a-share tender offer.  The incumbent slate apparently defeated a dissident slate proposed by Bennett S. Lebow, chairman of MAI Basic Four Inc., which last month dropped its hostile tender offer for Prime in the wake of Whitney's higher friendly offer.  The new board, as planned, named as president and chief executive officer James F. McDonald, formerly chairman of Gould Inc., who also will join the board.  The vote remains to be officially tabulated and verified.  HomeFed Corp. said it adopted a plan to protect shareholder interests in the event of a hostile attempt to acquire control of the company.  Rights will be issued to holders on the basis of one right for each common share outstanding to stock of record Sept. 5.  Under certain circumstances, including the acquisition by a person or group of 15% of HomeFed shares, all other holders will be able to buy newly issued common shares at half price, the San Diego thrift holding company said.  HomeFed isn't currently fighting a hostile takeover bid, but the thrift rescue bill, signed by President Bush this month, makes the company a possible target.  The bill gives banks complete freedom to acquire thrifts for the first time.  HomeFed's main unit is Home Federal Savings & Loan, which has $17.7 billion in assets and 200 branches in California.  A HomeFed spokeswoman wouldn't comment on whether the company has received any purchase offers recently.  Campbell Soup Co., in a move to boost efficiency and compete more effectively, will close four U.S. plants and consolidate operations overseas, eliminating about 2,800 jobs.  The company said the restructuring effort, which will include the closing of its original plant near its headquarters in Camden, N.J., will result in a one-time charge against fiscal 1989 earnings of about $344 million, or about $2.01 a share.  The move is the third restructuring announced this week by a well-known U.S. corporation.  Eastman Kodak Co. is slashing 4,500 jobs and disposing of some businesses, and Holiday Corp. is selling its Holiday Inn unit to Britain's Bass PLC.  For Campbell, the charge could wipe out most or all of its 1989 profit.  For the year ended July 31, 1988, the company earned $274.1 million, or $2.12 a share, on sales of $4.87 billion.  In the first nine months of this fiscal year, the company's net was $207.8 million, or $1.61 a share, on sales of $4.37 billion.  Campbell said it expects to report fourth-quarter and year-end results on Sept. 6.  Analysts welcomed Campbell's consolidation as a way to use capacity more effectively, although many said the move was overdue.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Campbell's stock closed yesterday at $53.50 a share, up 50 cents.  Recently, the company's domestic plants have been functioning at only about 60% of capacity, said Ronald B. Morrow, an analyst with Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  He said he ranks Campbell's performance at 5% to 6% below the food industry average.  The closure last year of several plants in Chicago and other cities suggested that further trimming was in the works.  "The company put away its kid gloves over a year ago," said Marvin Roffman, an analyst with Janney Montgomery Scott.  In the latest restructuring, food-processing plants in Pocomoke City and Crisfield, Md., and in Smyrna, Tenn., will be closed.  Other Campbell plants in Ohio, Texas, California and North Carolina will take up the slack and expand to 24-hour operations.  The company said it wouldn't provide details about overseas closures until various government authorities had been notified.  Campbell estimated that the consolidations will generate immediate savings of about $15 million in fiscal 1990, which began July 31.  Over the next four years or so, the company said it hopes the plan will yield additional savings of about $150 million.  Some of the immediate savings will come from eliminating the considerable fixed overhead costs tied to the Camden, N.J., plant.  Still more savings could come from the anticipated disposal of five additional plants.  Campbell is already setting up a reserve for that disposal, but didn't provide further details about those closures.  "It's a move we need to make," R. Gordon McGovern, Campbell's president and chief executive officer, said in an interview.  He described the restructuring and plant consolidations as part of "an ongoing effort to slim down" and become a more efficient global competitor.  To boost productivity, Mr. McGovern said the company's food-processing plants in Ohio, Texas, California and North Carolina will be retrofitted with new technology and will begin to operate on a 24-hour basis.  He also predicted that the improvements would give Campbell sufficient capacity for another three to six years.  In the meantime, the company will continue to study prototypes for a next generation of plants, which Mr. McGovern said will "still need a major technological breakthrough" to make a difference.  Historically, Campbell has been reluctant to close plants or lay off workers, a reflection of the congenial, family-like atmosphere the company has tried to encourage.  The late John T. Dorrance Jr., son of the company's founder and a longtime chairman, felt a particularly strong sense of loyalty and responsibility to employees.  When he died in April, Mr. Dorrance and other members of his family controlled about 58% of Campbell's stock.  "The corporate policy is to do what the Dorrances suggest," said Mr. Morrow.  Several other analysts said they view the consolidation as a move by management to cool some of the takeover speculation that has driven Campbell's stock price above its generally agreed-upon fundamental value of $32 to $40 a share.  Campbell's Mr. McGovern dismissed the Wall Street view that the company's board has changed its attitude now that Mr. Dorrance is gone.  "That's totally fiction," he said.  Indeed, he said, Mr. Dorrance was an advocate of closing the company plant in Chicago last year.  "He was here when we closed it, making sure we didn't cut orders."  Janney Montgomery's Mr. Roffman said the the plant closings should be viewed next to Campbell's aggressive capital spending plan -- $302 million in fiscal 1989 and $430 million in fiscal 1990.  He said he interprets the moves as a "message that they are really taking steps to be as profitable as they can."  Added Edward Stavetski, an analyst with W.H. Newbold's Son & Co., "Management decided it was time to fix the company up before someone else came in to fix it up for them."  Campbell said workers whose jobs will be affected by the restructuring will be given at least six months' notice, severance pay and benefits.  The company said it has 48,000 workers world-wide.  Petrie Stores Corp., Secaucus, N.J., reported that fiscal second-quarter net income sank 93%, but, excluding a year-earlier special credit, earnings fell 2.8%.  For the quarter ended July 29, the women's specialty retailer earned $3.5 million, or eight cents a share, down from $52.4 million, or $1.12 a share.  The year-earlier period includes a gain of $48.8 million, or $1.04 a share.  The gain stems from Petrie's swap of common stock it held in Toys "R" Us Inc. for two classes of its debentures.  Sales climbed 3% to $293.7 million from $285 million.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Petrie closed at $23.875 a share, up 12.5 cents.  L.A GEAR Inc.'s board approved a 2-for-1 stock split, just three weeks after completing a public offering of nearly 1.2 million common shares at $61.50 each.  The Los Angeles designer of fashion and leisure sneakers, which currently has about 9.6 million common shares outstanding, said the split will be effective and payable to shareholders of record Sept. 5.  L.A. Gear said it expects to mail stock certificates around Sept. 25.  The company's stock price has skyrocketed over the past 52 weeks, from a low of $13.375 to a high of $67.50.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, L.A. Gear shares closed at $60.25, up $1.75.  This country's powerful cocaine barons quickly answered the government's ambitious drug crackdown yesterday with a wave of night bombings and a declaration of "total and absolute war."  One man was killed by bombs that heavily damaged the Medellin headquarters of the Conservative and Liberal parties, the country's two largest political groups.  Bombs also destroyed the summer homes of two politicians there.  Other bombs were defused at the offices of two radio networks in Medellin, the city that is home to Colombia's drug kingpins .  "We declare total and absolute war on the government, on the industrial and political oligarchy, on the journalists who have attacked and ravaged us, on the judges that have sold out to the government, on the extraditing magistrates, on the presidents of the unions, and all those who persecuted and attacked us," said a communique left at one of the radio networks signed by "The Extraditables," a name used by drug traffickers facing extradition to the U.S.  The communique said, "We will not respect the families of those who have not respected our families," and vowed to "burn and destroy the industries, the properties and the mansions of the oligarchy."  A U.S. narcotics expert here told reporters that the Colombian cartels, which control about 80% of the cocaine smuggled into the U.S., felt "cornered" and most likely would continue to lash out in an effort to "bend the will of the government."  At the University of Miami, Bruce Bagley, an expert on Colombia and the cocaine trade, said the nation's drug mafia sees itself as an emergent entrepreneurial class that, despite accumulating an enormous amount of wealth, has been rebuffed in its attempts to join the Colombian establishment.  Its aim, he said, is to force the Colombian government into negotiating its legitimization.  "They want into the system -- not to take it over," said Mr. Bagley.  For its part, the government also seemed prepared to go to the mat.  The assassination last week of Luis Carlos Galan, 45 years old, a presidential candidate who was favored to win his party's nomination and the next election, has forced a harder line and provoked a wave of public revulsion against the country's drug traffickers.  Mr. Galan, who had made his career speaking strongly against drugs and drug-linked corruption, was a charismatic leader many hoped would renew the country's atrophied political system and perhaps lead it out of a miasma of cocaine, death squads and guerrillas.  "It's the death of all illusions that still dare to grow in this rocky place that is Colombia today," wrote Daniel Samper, an influential Colombian newspaper columnist this week.  In the resulting crackdown, Colombian police and army units seized 142 small planes, 20 helicopters and 141 houses, offices, ranches and other property with a total value of more than $200 million allegedly belonging to drug traffickers.  Yesterday, the government decreed that the assets would be given away unless owners could prove within five days they had acquired them with legally obtained funds.  Authorities have detained about 11,000 people, including five men suspected of being Mr. Galan's assassins.  Also detained were an alleged cartel financial wizard, Eduardo Martinez Romero, and four other persons the Colombian government says are wanted in the U.S. on drug charges.  But the cartel's top men have escaped capture and are thought to be in hiding either abroad or in the country's remote jungle regions.  Mr. Bagley believes that Colombia's war on drugs will have little impact on the flow of drugs into the U.S.  Some shipments may be delayed, some routes changed, but the crackdown won't affect the demand for cocaine in the U.S.  "It's a balloon effect," said Mr. Bagley.  "Push on one side and a bulge will come out on the other."  Even if Colombia is able to capture and extradite the top men of the cartel, others would surely take their place, he said.  A less powerful drug dealing organization, the Cali cartel, has been involved for the past year and a half in a bloody battle for supremacy with the "capos" -- the bosses -- of the Medellin group, Mr. Bagley says.  He says a crackdown in Colombia could lead to the vertical integration of the cocaine industries in other Andean countries.  Peru and Bolivia, now the top growers of coca leaf and producers of coca paste, from which cocaine is refined, may now start producing the finished cocaine themselves.  The bulk of refining currently is done in clandestine Colombian labs.  While the world trade in drugs will adjust to the Colombian crackdown, Colombia will still suffer most of the casualties.  Most Colombians expect the impact to be more murders of judges, policemen, journalists and politicians.  At least 220 judges and other officials have already been killed in recent years as the drug cartel attempted to intimidate Colombian society.  Colombian President Virgilio Barco reinstated by decree last Friday a treaty with the U.S. that allows for the extradition of drug traffickers. (A U.S. government plane has been at the Bogota airport since the weekend, reportedly ready to fly extradited drug traffickers to the U.S., officials in Washington told the Associated Press.) It is also by presidential decree that Mr. Barco ordered the confiscation of the properties of the alleged drug dealers.  The legality of these measures will undoubtedly be challenged by lawyers working for the drug dealers.  As in the past, judges will be given the choice of "plata o plomo," a bribe or a bullet, to rule favorably for the traffickers.  One Bogota judge who handles delicate drug cases made his choice yesterday.  Judge Alvaro Medina Moreno resigned, saying he had received numerous death threats against his 14-year-old daughter.  "In legitimate defense of my daughter's life, my decision to quit is irrevocable," he told reporters.  Japan's Nikko Securities Co. named Hideo Suzuki chairman and chief executive officer of its U.S. unit, succeeding Toshio Mori, who is returning to Tokyo.  Tsuneo Iida is to succeed Mr. Suzuki as Nikko Securities Co. International's president.  In Tokyo, Mr. Mori will join the parent company's senior executive management group and be responsible for all of Nikko's relationships and activities with corporate clients.  Mr. Mori is the dean of Japanese securities company executives in the U.S., having served as Nikko's U.S. chairman for the past eight years.  All told, the 55-year-old executive has served four tours with Nikko in the U.S. totaling 20 years, probably the longest of any executive of a Japanese securities company.  He also spent two years in Paris earlier in his career.  During his tenure as chairman, Nikko's U.S. operations grew from 45 to about 300 people currently.  Mr. Mori also created a fixed-income operation that evolved into a primary dealer in U.S. government securities; hired Stephen H. Axilrod, a senior Federal Reserve Board official, as his vice chairman; and created a team of analysts, traders and salespersons involved in a U.S. equity operation.  Considered by peers and competitors a consummate gentleman, Mr. Mori felt very much at home in the American culture.  So much so, in fact, that his son recently graduated from the Philadelphia College of Art and is currently a graphic designer in New York.  He also is known as an honest man who, despite pressure, once refused to tell Japan's Ministry of Finance the details of a Japanese government agency's bond offering being underwritten by Nikko and a group of U.S. firms.  All of Japan's so-called Big Four securities companies -- Nomura Securities Co., Daiwa Securities Co., Yamaichi Securities Co. and Nikko -- have had difficulty in the U.S. market in recent years.  Unable to successfully penetrate the U.S. corporate underwriting market and build distribution networks in the U.S., and whipsawed by Japanese investors' fickle attitude toward U.S. stocks, most have laid off staff in the past 18 months and reordered their priorities.  But when many Japanese brokers soured on the U.S. equity market after the October 1987 crash, Mr. Mori remained a staunch believer in Wall Street's ability to bounce back.  So far, he has been paid back as Japanese investors have bought U.S. shares at a record pace.  "We've been making a good profit each month," he said.  "The company is in better shape."  Nikko recently paid $125 million for a 50% interest in Wells Fargo & Co.'s investment advisory group, which is widely known for its sophisticated, computerized, investment techniques.  Even so, Mr. Mori, a strong proponent of Nikko's need to expand beyond Japan, was often thwarted by what some insiders and competitors describe as an uncertain, inconsistent Tokyo headquarters' approach to the U.S.  "He couldn't satisfy himself with (New York's) development, because he had bad luck and (because of) the less aggressive attitude at headquarters toward promoting American business," said Takuro Isoda, chairman of Daiwa's U.S. unit.  "Nikko's philosophy toward international business was too conservative; Mori's talent wasn't utilized here to its fullest."  Mr. Suzuki, 51, also brings a strong international background to his job.  In the past, he has run Nikko's European operations and been chief operating officer of its Asia and Oceania division.  Having served in the U.S. in the mid-1970s, he has been president of the U.S. unit for the past 11 months.  Mr. Isoda said that Mr. Suzuki also has wide corporate finance experience and "is good at creating new products" -- a direction in which all of the Big Four want to move.  "We've worked with the guy and he understands how to get a deal done," said Daniel M. Schwartz, managing director at Ulmer Brothers Inc., a New York-based investment bank specializing in U.S.-Japanese finance.  Nonetheless, Mr. Isoda said that Mr. Suzuki could become "somewhat uncomfortable" with a "headquarters philosophy (that) changes one day to another."  S&K Famous Brands Inc. said it is "not uncomfortable" with analysts' estimates of fiscal 1990 earnings of around $1.25 a share.  For the fiscal year ended Jan. 28, net income for the specialty retailer of men's clothing jumped 23% to $2.2 million, or $1.05 a share, compared with $1.7 million, or 85 cents a share, a year ago.  Sales for the year totaled $52.4 million, up 22% from $43.1 million a year ago.  Taking into account the company's recent secondary offering of 300,000 newly issued common shares, the per-share projection of $1.25 would indicate net of about $2.8 million.  Stuart C. Siegel, chairman and chief executive officer, didn't make a fiscal 1990 sales forecast of his own, but he characterized as "reasonable" analysts' projections of around $64 million.  "We continue to anticipate compound sales growth of about 20% a year and compound earnings growth of about 30%," he said.  Earlier this week, the company said net rose 7.4% to $835,800, or 41 cents a share, for the six months ended July 29, compared with $778,200, or 38 cents a share, a year ago.  Sales were $25.7 million, up 13% from $22.7 million a year ago.  Since going public in 1983, S&K has grown rapidly by sticking to what Mr. Siegel called a "big fish/small pond strategy."  Except for one store each in Philadelphia and Washington, D.C., the company has steered clear of the 30 largest U.S. markets.  Instead, it has concentrated on middle-tier cities like Macon, Ga., and Albany, N.Y., where rent and advertising costs are generally much lower.  S&K currently operates 77 stores in 17 states in the eastern half of the U.S.  By the end of November, Mr. Siegel said the company plans to open about 14 more stores.  Some will add exposure in such existing markets as Nashville, Tenn., and Birmingham, Ala., while others will provide footholds in Springfield, Ill., and Flint, Grand Rapids and Lansing, Mich.  Mr. Siegel said the company usually spends as much as $60,000 a store on lease-hold improvements and about $200,000 each on initial inventories.  "Our stores are generally profitable in the first reporting quarter," he said.  S&K, which netted about $4 million from a recent stock offering, will use the proceeds to reduce debt, said Robert E. Knowles, chief financial officer.  Mr. Knowles said the company will then tap its revolving-credit line again, spending about $1.8 million for a 50% expansion of its distribution center in Richmond and about $2 million to help open about 14 new stores by Dec. 1.  S&K's total debt, which includes some long-term financing through industrial-development bonds, is expected to decline to about $4 million by the end of January from about $10 million in January 1989, Mr. Knowles said.  Mr. Siegel said the expansion of the distribution center to about 100,000 square feet is needed to support the company's target of having 150 stores in operation by 1992.  By then, he said, S&K would expect to set its site on a wider territory.  "As we grow, it would make sense for us to keep the wagons headed roughly west," Mr. Siegel said.  "Our long-term goal is to be more national."  S&K's approach has been to avoid clothing fads and to cater to the large segment of male customers who have traditional tastes.  In addition to offering brand name suits, the company buys end-of-season inventories of suits and sportcoats from such department stores as Neiman Marcus and Lord & Taylor, displaying the retailers' original labels and price tags along with S&K's own marked-down prices.  "We think that adds credibility," Mr. Siegel said.  "These days, the customer is not easily deceived." 